2
THE
LAST OF THE MOHICANS.
CHAPTER I.
Mine ear is open, and my heart prepared;
The worst is worldly loss thou canst unfold:
Say, is my kingdom lost?
Shakspeare
.
It
was a feature peculiar to the colonial wars of
North America, that the toils and dangers of the
wilderness
were to be encountered, before the adverse
hosts could meet in murderous contact. A wide,
and, apparently, an impervious boundary of forests,
severed the possessions of the hostile provinces of
France and England. The hardy colonist, and the
trained European who fought at his side, frequently
expended months in struggling against the rapids of
the streams, or in effecting the rugged passes of the
mountains, in quest of an opportunity to exhibit
their courage in a more martial conflict. But,
emulating
the patience and self-denial of the practised
native warriors, they learned to overcome every
difficulty
;
and it would seem, that in time, there was
no recess of the woods so dark, nor any secret place
so lovely, that it might claim exemption from the
inroads
of those who had pledged their blood to
satiate
their vengeance, or to uphold the cold and
selfish
policy of the distant monarchs of Europe.
Perhaps no district, throughout the wide extent of
the intermediate frontiers, can furnish a livelier
picture
of the cruelty and fierceness of the savage
warfare
of those periods, than the country which lies
between the head waters of the Hudson and the
adjacent
lakes.
The facilities which nature had there offered to
the march of the combatants, were too obvious to be
neglected. The lengthened sheet of the Champlain
stretched from the frontiers of Canada, deep within
the borders of the neighbouring province of
New-York
,
forming a natural passage across half the
distance
that the French were compelled to master in
order to strike their enemies. Near its southern
termination, it received the contributions of another
lake, whose waters were so limpid, as to have been
exclusively selected by the Jesuit missionaries, to
perform the typical purification of baptism, and to
obtain for it the appropriate title of Saint Sacr
ement
.
The less zealous English thought they
conferred
a sufficient honour on its unsullied fountains,
when they bestowed the name of their
reigning
prince, the second of the House of Hanover.
The two united to rob the untutored possessors of its
wooded scenery of their native right to perpetuate
its original appellation of Horican.
Winding its way among countless islands, and
imbedded
in mountains, the holy lake extended a
dozen
leagues still farther to the south. With the
high plain that there interposed itself to the
further
passage of the water, commenced a portage
of as many miles, which conducted the adventurer
to the banks of the Hudson, at a point, where, with
the usual obstructions of the rapids, or rifts, as they
were then termed in the language of the country,
the river became navigable to the tide.
While, in the pursuit of their daring plans of
annoyance
,
the restless enterprise of the French even
attempted the distant and difficult gorges of the
Alleghany
,
it may easily be imagined that their
proverbial
acuteness would not overlook the natural
advantages
of the district we have just described. It
became
,
emphatically, the bloody arena, in which most
of the battles for the mastery of the colonies were
contested. Forts were erected at the different points
that commanded the facilities of the route, and
were taken and retaken, rased and rebuilt, as
victory
smiled, or expediency dictated. While the
husbandmen
shrunk back from the dangerous passes,
within the safer boundaries of the more ancient
settlements
,
armies larger than those that had often
disposed of the sceptres of the mother countries,
were seen to bury themselves in these forests,
whence they never re-issued but in skeleton bands,
that were haggard with care, or dejected by defeat.
Though the arts of peace were unknown to this
fatal
region, its forests were alive with men; its glades
and glens rang with the sounds of martial music, and
the echoes of its mountains threw back the laugh,
or repeated the wanton cry, of many a gallant and
reckless youth, as he hurried by them, in the
noontide
of his spirits, to slumber in a long night of
forgetfulness
.
It was in this scene of strife and bloodshed, that
the incidents we shall attempt to relate occurred,
during the third year of the war which England and
France last waged, for the possession of a country,
that, happily, neither was destined to retain.
The imbecility of her military leaders abroad, and
the fatal want of energy in her councils at home,
had lowered the character of Great Britain from the
proud elevation on which it had been placed by the
talents and enterprise of her former warriors and
statesmen. No longer dreaded by her enemies, her
servants were fast losing the salutary confidence of
self respect. In this mortifying abasement, the
colonists
,
though innocent of her imbecility, and too
humble to be the agents of her blunders, were but the
natural participators. They had recently seen a chosen
army, from that country, which, reverencing as a
mother, they had fondly believed invinciblean
army led by a chief who had been selected from
a crowd of trained warriors for his rare military
endowments
,
disgracefully routed by a handful of
French and Indians, and only saved from annihilation
by the coolness and spirit of a Virginian boy, whose
riper fame has since diffused itself, with the steady
influence of moral truth, to the uttermost confines of
Christendom. A wide frontier had been laid naked
by this unexpected disaster, and more substantial
2*
evils were preceded by a thousand fanciful and
imaginary dangers. The alarmed colonists believed
that the yells of the savages mingled with every fitful
gust of wind that issued from the interminable forests
of the west. The terrific character of their
merciless
enemies, increased, immeasurably, the natural
horrors of warfare. Numberless recent massacres
were still vivid in their recollections; nor was there
any ear, in the provinces, so deaf as not to have drunk
in with avidity the narrative of some fearful tale of
midnight murder, in which the natives of the forests
were the principal and barbarous actors. As the
credulous and excited traveller related the hazardous
chances of the wilderness, the blood of the timid
curdled
with terror, and mothers cast anxious glances
even at those children which slumbered within the
security of the largest towns. In short, the
magnifying
influence of fear began to set at nought the
calculations
of reason, and render those who should have
remembered their manhood, the slaves of the basest
of passions. Even the most confident and the
stoutest hearts, began to think the issue of the contest
was becoming doubtful; and that abject class was
hourly increasing in numbers, who thought they
foresaw all the possessions of the English crown in
America, subdued by their Christian foes, or laid
waste by the inroads of their relentless allies.
When, therefore, intelligence was received at the
fort which covered the southern termination of the
portage between the Hudson and the lakes, that
Montcalm had been seen moving up the Champlain
with an army numerous as the leaves on the
trees, its truth was admitted with more of the
craven reluctance of those who court the arts of
peace, than with the stern joy that a warrior should
feel, in finding an enemy within reach of his blow.
The news had been brought towards the decline of
a day in midsummer, by an Indian runner, that also
bore an urgent request from Munro, who
commanded
the work on the shore of the holy lake, for
a speedy and powerful reinforcement. It has
already
been mentioned, that the distance between these
two posts was less than five leagues. The rude
path which originally formed their line of
communication
,
had been widened for the passage of
wagons, so that the distance which had been
travelled
by the son of the forest in two hours, might
easily be effected by a detachment of troops, with
their necessary baggage, between the rising and
setting
of a summer sun. The loyal servants of the
British crown had given to one of these forest
fastnesses
the name of William Henry, and to the other
that of Fort Edward; calling each after a favourite
prince of the reigning family. The veteran
Scotchman
,
just named, held the first, with a regiment of
regulars and a few provincials, a force, really, by
far too small to make head against the formidable
power that Montcalm was leading to the foot of
his earthen mounds. At the latter, however, lay
Gen. Webb, who commanded the armies of the king
in the northern provinces, with a body of more than
five thousand men. By uniting the several
detachments
of his command, this officer might have
arrayed nearly double that number of combatants
against the enterprising Frenchman, who had
ventured
so far from his reinforcements, with an army
but little superior in numbers.
But, under the influence of their degraded
fortunes
,
both officers and men appeared better
disposed
to await the approach of their formidable
antagonist
within their works, than to resist the
progress
of their march, by emulating the successful
example
of the French at Fort du Quesne, and striking
a blow on their advance.
After the first surprise of the intelligence had a
little abated, a rumour was spread through the
intrenched
camp, which stretched along the margin of
the Hudson, forming a chain of outworks to the body
of the fort itself, that a chosen detachment of
fifteen hundred men was to depart with the dawn
for William Henry, the post at the northern
extremity
of the portage. That which at first was only
rumour, soon became certainty, as orders passed
from the quarters of the commander-in-chief to the
several corps he had selected for this service, to
prepare
for their speedy departure. All doubt as to the
intention of Webb now vanished, and an hour or two
of hurried footsteps and anxious faces succeeded.
The novice in the military art flew from point to
point, retarding his own preparations by the excess
of his violent and somewhat distempered zeal; while
the more practised veteran made his arrangements
with a deliberation that scorned every appearance
of haste; though his sober lineaments, and anxious
eye, sufficiently betrayed that he had no very strong
professional relish for the, as yet, untried and dreaded
warfare of the wilderness. At length the sun set
in a flood of glory behind the distant western hills,
and as darkness drew its veil around the secluded
spot, the sounds of preparation diminished; the last
light finally disappeared from the log cabin of
some officer; the trees cast their deeper shadows
over the mounds, and the rippling stream, and
a silence soon pervaded the camp, as deep as that
which reigned in the vast forest by which it was
environed.
According to the orders of the preceding night,
the heavy sleep of the army was broken by the
rolling of the warning drums, whose rattling echoes
were heard issuing, on the damp morning air, out of
every vista of the woods, just as day began to draw
the shaggy outlines of some tall pines of the vicinity,
on the opening brightness of a soft and cloudless
eastern sky. In an instant, the whole camp was in
motion; the meanest soldier arousing from his lair
to witness the departure of his comrades, and to
share in the excitement and incidents of the hour.
The simple array of the chosen band was soon
completed
.
While the regular and trained hirelings of
the king marched with ready haughtiness to the right
of the line, the less pretending colonists took their
humbler position on its left, with a docility that long
practice had rendered easy. The scouts departed;
strong guards preceded and followed the
lumbering
vehicles that bore the baggage; and before
the gray light of the morning was mellowed by
the rays of the rising sun, the main body of the
combatants
wheeled into column, and left the
encampment
with a show of high military bearing, that
served
to drown the slumbering apprehensions of many a
novice, who was now about to make his first essay
in arms. While in view of their admiring comrades,
the same proud front and ordered array was
observed
,
until the notes of their fifes growing fainter
in distance, the forest at length appeared to swallow
up the living mass which had slowly entered its
bosom.
The deepest sounds of the retiring and invisible
column had ceased to be borne on the breeze to the
listeners
,
and the latest straggler had already disappeared
in pursuit, but there still remained the signs of
another
departure, before a log cabin of unusual size and
accommodations, in front of which those sentinels
paced their rounds, who were known to guard the
person
of the English general. At this spot were
gathered
some half dozen horses, caparisoned in a manner
which showed that two, at least, were destined to bear
the persons of females, of a rank that it was not usual
to meet so far in the wilds of the country. A third
wore the trappings and arms of an officer of the
staff; while the rest, from the plainness of the
housings, and the travelling mails with which they
were encumbered, were evidently fitted for the
reception
of as many menials, who were, seemingly,
already awaiting the convenience or pleasure of
those they served. At a respectful distance from
this unusual show, were gathered divers groupes of
curious idlers; some admiring the blood and bone of
the high-mettled military charger, and others gazing
at the preparations with the dull wonder of vulgar
curiosity. There was one man, however, who, by
his countenance and actions, formed a marked
exception
to those who composed the latter class of
spectators
,
being neither idle, nor seemingly very ignorant.
The person of this remarkable individual was to
the last degree ungainly, without being in any
particular
manner deformed. He had all the bones and
joints of other men, without any of their proportions.
Erect, his stature surpassed that of his fellows;
though, seated, he appeared reduced within the
ordinary
limits of our race. The same contrariety in
his members, seemed to exist throughout the whole
man. His head was large; his shoulders narrow;
his arms long and dangling; while his hands were
small, if not delicate. His legs and thighs were thin
nearly to emaciation, but of extraordinary length;
and his knees would have been considered
tremendous
,
had they not been outdone by the broader
foundations on which this false superstructure of
blended
human orders, was so profanely reared. The
ill-assorted and injudicious attire of the individual only
served to render his awkwardness more
conspicuous
.
A sky-blue coat, with short and broad skirts
and low cape, exposed a long thin neck, and longer
and thinner legs, to the worst animadversions of the
evil disposed. His nether garment was of yellow
nankeen, closely fitted to the shape, and tied at his
bunches of knees by large knots of white ribbon, a
good deal sullied by use. Clouded cotton stockings,
and shoes, on one of the latter of which was a plated
spur, completed the costume of the lower extremity of
this figure, no curve or angle of which was concealed,
but, on the other hand, studiously exhibited, through
the vanity or simplicity of its owner. From beneath
the flap of an enormous pocket of a soiled vest of
embossed silk, heavily ornamented with tarnished
silver lace, projected an instrument, which, from
being seen in such martial company, might have
been easily mistaken for some mischievous and
unknown implement of war. Small as it was, this
uncommon engine had excited the curiosity of most
of the Europeans in the camp, though several of the
provincials were seen to handle it, not only without
fear, but with the utmost familiarity. A large civil
cocked hat, like those worn by clergymen within the
last thirty years, surmounted the whole, furnishing
dignity to a good natured, and somewhat vacant
countenance, that apparently needed such artificial
aid to support the gravity of some high and
extraordinary
trust.
While the common herd stood aloof from the
gathering group of travellers, in deference to the
sacred precincts of the quarters of Webb, the figure
we have described stalked into the centre of the
domestics, who were in waiting with the horses,
freely expressing his censures or commendations on
the merits of the latter, as by chance they displeased
or satisfied his judgment.
This beast, I rather conclude, friend, is not of
home raising, but is from foreign lands, or perhaps from
the little island itself, over the blue water? he said,
in a voice as remarkable for the softness and
sweetness
of its tones, as was his person for its rare
proportions
:
I may speak of these things and be no
braggart, for I have been down at both havens; that
which is situate at the mouth of Thames, and is
named after the capital of Old England, and that
which is called `Haven,' with the addition of the
word `New;' and have seen the snows and
brigantines
collecting their droves, like the gathering to the
ark, being outward bound to the island of Jamaica,
for the purpose of barter and traffic in four-footed
animals; but never before have I beheld a beast
which verified the true scripture war-horse like this;
`He paweth in the valley, and rejoiceth in his
strength; he goeth out to meet the armed men.'
`He saith among the trumpets, ha ha! and he
smelleth the battle afar off; the thunder of the
captains
and the shouting.'It would seem that the
stock of the horse of Israel has descended to our own
time; would it not, friend?
Receiving no reply to this extraordinary appeal,
which, in truth, as it was delivered with all the vigour
of full and sonorous tones, merited some sort of
notice
,
he who had thus sung forth the language of the
holy book, turned to the silent figure to whom
he had unwittingly addressed himself, and found a
new and more powerful subject of admiration in the
object that encountered his gaze. His eyes fell on
the still, upright, and rigid form of the Indian
runner
,
who had borne to the camp the unwelcome
tidings of the preceding evening. Although in a
state of perfect repose, and apparently disregarding,
with characteristic stoicism, the excitement and
bustle around him, there was a sullen fierceness
mingled with the quiet of the savage, that was likely
3
to arrest the attention of much more experienced
eyes, than those which now scanned him, in
unconcealed
amazement. The native bore both the
tomahawk
and knife of his tribe; and yet his appearance
was not altogether that of a warrior. On the
contrary
,
there was an air of neglect about his person,
like that which might have proceeded from great
and recent exertion, which he had not yet found
leisure
to repair. The colours of the war-paint had
blended in dark confusion about his fierce
countenance
,
and rendered his swarthy lineaments still
more savage and repulsive, than if art had
attempted
an effect, which had been thus produced by
chance. His eye, alone, which glistened like a fiery
star amid lowering clouds, was to be seen in its state
of native wildness. For a single instant, his
searching
,
and yet wary glance, met the wondering look of
the other, and then changing its direction, partly in
cunning, and partly in disdain, it remained fixed,
as if penetrating the distant air.
It is impossible to say what unlooked for remark
this short and silent communication, between two
such singular men, might have elicited from the
tall white man, had not his active curiosity been
again drawn to other objects. A general
movement
amongst the domestics, and a low sound of
gentle
voices, announced the approach of those whose
presence was wanted, in order to enable the
cavalcade to move. The simple admirer of the
war-horse instantly fell back to a low, gaunt,
switch-tailed
mare, that was unconsciously gleaning the
faded herbage of the camp, nigh by, where, leaning
with one elbow on the blanket that concealed an
apology
for a saddle, he became a spectator of the
departure
,
while a foal was quietly making its morning
repast, on the opposite side of the same animal.
A young man, in the livery of the crown,
conducted
to their steeds two females, who, it was apparent
by their dresses, were prepared to encounter the
fatigues of a journey in the woods. One, and she
was the most juvenile in her appearance, though
both were young, permitted glimpses of her dazzling
complexion, fair golden hair, and bright blue eyes,
to be caught, as she artlessly suffered the morning
air to blow aside the green veil, which descended low
from her beaver. The flush which still lingered above
the pines in the western sky, was not more bright
nor delicate than the bloom on her cheek; nor was the
opening day more cheering than the animated smile
which she bestowed on the youth, as he assisted her
into the saddle. The other, who appeared to share
equally in the attentions of the young officer,
concealed
her charms from the gaze of the soldiery with a
studious care, that seemed better fitted to the
experience
of four or five additional years. It could
be seen, however, that her person, though moulded
with the same exquisite proportions, of which none
of the graces were lost by the travelling dress she
wore, was rather fuller and more mature than that of
her companion.
No sooner were these females seated, than their
attendant
sprang lightly into the saddle of the
war-horse
,
when the whole three bowed to Webb, who,
in courtesy, awaited their parting on the threshold
of his cabin, and turning their horses' heads, they
proceeded at a slow amble, followed by their train,
towards the northern entrance of the encampment.
As they traversed that short distance, not a voice was
heard amongst them; but a slight exclamation
proceeded
from the younger of the females, as the
Indian
runner glided by her, unexpectedly, and led the
way along the military road in her front. Though
this sudden and startling movement of the Indian,
produced no sound from the other, in the surprise,
her veil also was allowed to open its folds, and
betrayed
an indescribable look of pity, admiration and
horror, as her dark eye followed the easy motions of
the savage. The tresses of this lady were shining
and black, like the plumage of the raven. Her
complexion
was not brown, but it rather appeared
charged with the colour of the rich blood, that
seemed ready to burst its bounds. And yet there
was neither coarseness, nor want of shadowing, in a
countenance that was exquisitely regular and
dignified
,
and surpassingly beautiful. She smiled, as if in
pity at her own momentary forgetfulness, discovering
by the act a row of teeth that would have shamed,
by their dazzling whiteness, the purest ivory; when,
replacing the veil, she bowed her face, and rode in
silence, like one whose thoughts were abstracted
from the scene around her.
CHAPTER II.
Sola, sola, wo ha, ho, sola!
Shakspeare
.
While
one of the lovely beings we have so cursorily
presented to the reader, was thus lost in thought, the
other quickly recovered from the slight alarm which
induced the exclamation, and, laughing at her own
weakness, she inquired playfully of the youth who
rode by her side
Are such spectres frequent in the woods,
Heyward
;
or is this sight an especial entertainment,
ordered
in our behalf. If the latter, gratitude must
close our mouths; but if the former, both Cora and
I shall have need to draw largely on that stock of
hereditary
courage of which we boast, even before we
are made to encounter the redoubtable Montcalm.
Yon Indian is a `runner' of our army, and, after
the fashion of his people, he may be accounted a
hero, returned the young officer, to whom she
addressed
herselfHe has volunteered to guide us to
the lake, by a path but little known, sooner than if
we followed the tardy movements of the column; and,
by consequence, more agreeably.
I like him not, said the lady, shuddering, partly
3*
in assumed, yet more in real terror. You know him,
Duncan, or you would not trust yourself so freely to
his keeping?
Say, rather, Alice, that I would not trust you,
returned the young man, impressively; I do know
him, or he would not have my confidence, and
least of all, at this moment. He is said to be a
Canadian
,
too; and yet he served with our friends the
Mohawks, who, as you know, are one of the six allied
nations. He was brought amongst us, as I have heard,
by some strange accident, in which your father was
interested
,
and in which the savage was rigidly dealt by
but I forget the idle tale; it is enough, that he is
now our friend.
If he has been my father's enemy, I like him still
less! exclaimed the now really anxious maiden.
Will you not speak to him, Major Heyward, that I
may hear his tones? Foolish though it may be, you
have often heard me avow my faith in the tones of the
human voice!
It would be in vain; and answered, most
probably
,
by an ejaculation. Though he may understand
it, he affects, like most of his people, to be ignorant
of the English; and least of all, will he condescend to
speak it, now that war demands the utmost exercise
of his dignity. But he stops; the private path by
which we are to journey is, doubtless, at hand.
The conjecture of Major Heyward was true.
When they reached the spot where the Indian stood,
pointing into the thicket that fringed the military
road, a narrow and blind path, which might, with
some little inconvenience, receive one person at a
time, became visible.
Here, then, lies our way, said the young man, in
a low voice. Manifest no distrust, or you may
invite
the danger you appear to apprehend.
Cora, what think you? asked the reluctant fair
one. If we journey with the troops, though we may
find their presence irksome, shall we not feel better
assurance of our safety?
Being little accustomed to the practices of the
savages, Alice, you mistake the place of real danger,
said Heyward. If enemies have reached the portage
at all, a thing by no means probable, as our scouts
are abroad, they will surely be found skirting the
column, where scalps abound the most. The route of
the detachment is known, while ours, having been
determined
within the hour, must still be secret.
Should we distrust the man, because his manners
are not our manners, and that his skin is dark!
coldly asked Cora.
Alice hesitated no longer; but giving her
Narraganset
a smart cut of the whip, she was the first to dash
aside the slight branches of the bushes, and to follow
the runner along the dark and tangled path-way.
The young man regarded the last speaker in open
admiration, and even permitted her fairer, though
certainly not more beautiful companion, to proceed
unattended, while he sedulously opened a way
himself
,
for the passage of her who has been called Cora.
It would seem that the domestics had been
previously
instructed; for, instead of penetrating the
thicket, they followed the route of the column; a
measure, which Heyward stated, had been dictated
by the sagacity of their guide, in order to diminish the
marks of their trail, if, haply, the Canadian savages
should be lurking so far in advance of their army.
For many minutes, the intricacy of their route
admitted
of no further dialogue; after which they emerged
from the broad border of underbrush, which grew
along the line of the highway, and entered under the
high, but dark arches of the forest. Here, their
progress
was less interrupted; and the instant their guide
perceived that the females could command their
steeds, he moved on, at a pace between a trot and a
walk; and at a rate which kept the sure-footed and
peculiar animals they rode, at a fast, and yet easy
amble. The youth had turned, to speak to the
dark-eyed
Cora, when the distant sounds of horses' hoofs,
clattering over the roots of the broken way in his rear,
caused him to check his charger; and as his
companions
drew their reins at the same instant, the whole
party came to a halt, in order to obtain an
explanation
of the unlooked for interruption.
In a few moments, a colt was seen gliding, like a
fallow deer, amongst the straight trunks of the pines;
and in another instant, the person of the ungainly
man, described in the preceding chapter, came into
view, with as much rapidity as he could excite his
meager beast to endure, without coming to an open
rupture. In their short passage from the quarters of
Webb to their attendants, no opportunity had been
furnished the travellers to look upon the personage
who now approached them. If he possessed the power
to arrest any wandering eye, when exhibiting the
glories of his altitude on foot, his equestrian graces
were quite as observable. Notwithstanding a
constant
application of his one armed heel to the flanks
of the mare, the most confirmed gait that he could
establish, was a Canterbury gallop with the hind legs,
in which those more forward assisted for doubtful
moments, though generally content to maintain a
lopeing trot. Perhaps the rapidity of the changes
from one of these paces to the other, created an
optical
illusion, which might thus magnify the powers of
the beast; for it is certain that Heyward, who
possessed
a true eye for the merits of a horse, was unable,
with his utmost ingenuity, to decide, by what sort of
movement his pursuer worked his sinuous way on
his foot-steps, with such persevering hardihood.
The industry and movements of the rider were
not less remarkable than those of the ridden. At
each change in the evolutions of the latter, the former
raised his tall person in the stirrups; producing, in
this manner, by the undue elongation of his legs, such
sudden growths and diminishings of the stature, as
baffled every conjecture that might be made as to his
character. If to this be added the fact, that in
consequence
of the ex parte application of the spur, one
side of the mare appeared to journey faster than the
other; and that the aggrieved flank was resolutely
indicated
,
by unremitted flourishes of her bushy tail,
we finish the picture of both horse and man.
The frown which had gathered around the handsome,
open, and manly brow of Heyward, gradually relaxed,
and his lips curled into a slight smile, as he regarded
the stranger. Alice made no very powerful effort to
control her merriment; and even the dark,
thoughtful
eye of Cora, lighted with a humour that, it would
seem, the habit, rather than the nature of its mistress,
repressed.
Seek you any here? demanded Heyward, when
the other had arrived sufficiently nigh to abate his
speed; I trust you are no messenger of evil
tidings.
Even so, replied the stranger, making diligent
use of his triangular castor, to produce a circulation
in the close air of the woods, and leaving his hearers
in doubt, to which of the young man's questions he
responded; when, however, he had cooled his face,
and recovered his breath, he continued, I hear you
are riding to William Henry; as I am journeying
thitherward myself, I concluded good company would
seem consistent to the wishes of both parties.
The division of voices would appear to be
unjustly
measured, returned Heyward; We are
three, whilst you have no one to consult but yourself.
Not more unjustly, than that one gallant should
be charged with the care and keeping of two youthful
ladies, said the other, with a manner divided between
simplicity and vulgar repartee. If, however, he be a
true man, and they true women, they will despite
each other's humour, and come over to his opinion,
in all matters of contradictory opinions; so you have
no more to consult than I!
The fair maiden dropped her laughing eyes to the
bridle of her filly, and the slight flush on her cheek
deepened to a rich bloom; while the glowing tints of
her companion's colour altered even to paleness, as
she slowly rode ahead, like one who already tired of
the interview.
If you journey to the lake, you have mistaken
your route, said Heyward, haughtily; the
highway
thither is at least half-a-mile behind you.
Even so, returned the stranger, nothing daunted
by this cold reception; I have tarried at `Edward'
a week, and I should be dumb, not to have inquired
the road I was to journey; and if dumb, there would
be an end to my calling. After simpering in a small
way, like one whose modesty prohibited a more open
expression of his admiration of a witticism, that was
perfectly unintelligible to his hearers, he continued,
with becoming gravity, It is not prudent for one of
my profession to be too familiar with those he has to
instruct; for which reason, I follow not the line of
the army: besides which, I conclude that a
gentleman
of your character, has the best judgment in
matters
of way-faring; I have therefore decided to join
company, in order that the ride may be made
agreeable
,
and partake of social communion.
A most arbitrary, if not a hasty decision!
exclaimed
Heyward, undecided whether to give vent to
his growing anger, or to laugh aloud in the other's face.
But you speak of instruction, and of a profession;
are you an adjunct to the provincial corps, as a
master
of the noble science of defence and offence? or,
perhaps, you are one who draws lines and angles, under
the pretence of expounding the mathematics?
The stranger regarded his interrogator a moment,
in open wonder; and then, losing every mark of
self-satisfaction
in an expression of solemn humility, he
answered:
Of offence, I hope there is none, to either party:
of defence, I make noneby God's good mercy,
having committed no palpable sin, since last
entreating
his pardoning grace. I understand not your
allusions about lines and angles; and I leave
expounding
,
to those who have been called and set
apart for that holy office. I lay claim to no higher
gift, than a small insight into the glorious art of
petition
and thanksgiving, as practised in psalmody.
The man is, most manifestly, a disciple of Apollo,
cried the amused Alice, who had recovered from her
momentary embarrassment, and I take him under my
own especial protection. Nay, throw aside that frown,
Heyward, and, in pity to my longing ears, suffer him
to journey in our train. Besides, she added, in a
low and hurried voice, casting a glance at the distant
Cora, who slowly followed the footsteps of their silent
but sullen guide, it may be a friend added to our
strength in time of need.
Think you, Alice, that I would trust those I love
by this secret path, did I imagine such need could
happen?
Nay, nay, I think not of it now; but this strange
man amuses me; and if he `hath music in his soul,'
let us not churlishly reject his company. She
pointed persuasively along the path, with her riding
whip, while their eyes met in a look, which the young
man lingered a moment to prolong, then, yielding to
her gentle influence, he clapt his spurs into his
charger
,
and in a few bounds, was again at the side of Cora.
I am glad to encounter thee, friend, continued
the maiden, waving her hand to the stranger to
proceed
,
as she urged her Narraganset to renew its amble.
Partial relatives have almost persuaded me, that I
am not entirely worthless in a duette myself; and we
may enliven our way-faring, by indulging in our
favourite
pursuit. It might be of signal advantage to
one, ignorant as I, to hear the opinions and
experience
of a master in the art.
It is refreshing both to the spirits and to the body, to
indulge in psalmody, in befitting seasons, returned
the master of song, unhesitatingly complying with her
intimation to follow; and nothing would relieve
the mind more, than such a consoling communion.
But four parts are altogether necessary to the
perfection
of melody. You have all the manifestations
of a soft and rich treble; I can, by especial aid, carry
a full tenor to the highest letter; but we lack counter
and bass! Yon officer of the king, who hesitated to
admit me to his company, might fill the latter, if
one may judge from the intonations of his voice in
common dialogue.
Judge not too rashly, from hasty and deceptive
appearances, said the lady, smiling; though
Major Heyward can assume such deep notes, on
occasion
,
believe me, his natural tones are better fitted
for a mellow tenor, than the bass you heard.
Is he, then, much practised in the art of
psalmody
?
demanded her simple companion.
Alice felt disposed to laugh, though she succeeded in
suppressing the sounds of her merriment, ere she
answered
,
Vol. I. 4
I apprehend that he is rather addicted to profane
song. The turmoils and chances of a soldier's life,
are but little fitted for the encouragement of more
sober inclinations.
Man's voice is given to him, like his other talents,
to be used, and not to be abused, said her
companion
.
None can say they have ever known me
neglect my gifts! I am thankful that, though my
boyhood
may be said to have been set apart, like the
youth of the royal David, for the purposes of music,
no syllable of rude verse has ever profaned my lips.
You have, then, limited your efforts to sacred
song?
Even so. As the psalms of David exceed all
other language, so does the psalmody that has been
fitted to them by the divines and sages of the land,
surpass all vain poetry. Happily, I may say, that I
utter nothing but the thoughts and the wishes of the
King of Israel himself; for though the times may call
for some slight changes, yet does this version, which
we use in the colonies of New-England, so much
exceed
all other versions, that, by its richness, its
exactness
,
and its spiritual simplicity, it approacheth, as near
as may be, to the great work of the inspired writer.
I never abide in any place, sleeping or waking,
without
an example of this gifted work. 'Tis the
six-and-twentieth
edition, promulgated at Boston, Anno
Domini, 1744; and is entitled, `The Psalms, Hymns,
and Spiritual Songs of the Old and New Testaments;
faithfully translated into English Metre, for the Use,
Edification, and Comfort of the Saints in Public and
Private, especially in New-England.'
During this eulogium on the rare production of
his native poets, the stranger had drawn the book
from his pocket, and fitting a pair of iron-rimmed
spectacles to his nose, had opened the volume with a
care and veneration suited to its sacred purposes.
Then, without circumlocution or apology, first
pronouncing
the magical word, Standish, and placing
the unknown engine, already described, to his mouth,
from which he drew a high, shrill sound, that was
followed
by an octave below, from his own voice, he
commenced singing the following words, in full, sweet,
and melodious tones, that set the music, the poetry,
and even the uneasy motion of his ill-trained beast, at
defiance:
How good it is, O see,
And how it pleaseth well,
Together, e'en in unity,
For brethren so to dwell.
It's like the choice ointment,
From head to th' beard did go:
Down Aaron's beard, that downward went,
His garment's skirts unto.
The delivery of these skilful rhymes was
accompanied
,
on the part of the stranger, by a regular rise and
fall of his right hand, which terminated at the
descent
,
by suffering the fingers to dwell a moment on
the leaves of the little volume; and on the ascent, by
such a flourish of the member, as none but the
initiated
may ever hope to imitate. It would seem, that
long practice had rendered this manual
accompaniment
necessary; for it did not cease, until the
significant
preposition which the poet had so judiciously
selected for the close of his verse, had been duly
delivered
in the fullest dignity of a word of two syllables.
Such an innovation on the silence and retirement
of the forest, could not fail to enlist the ears of those
who journeyed at so short a distance in advance.
The Indian muttered a few words in broken English,
to Heyward, who, in his turn, spoke to the stranger;
at once interrupting, and, for the time, closing his
musical
efforts.
Though we are not in danger, common prudence
would teach us to journey through this wilderness in
as quiet a manner as is convenient. You will, then,
pardon me, Alice, should I diminish your enjoyments
for a time, by requesting this gentleman to postpone
his chant until a safer opportunity.
You will diminish them, indeed, returned the
arch maiden, for never did I hear a more unworthy
conjunction of execution and language, than that to
which I have been listening; and I was far gone in
a learned inquiry into the causes of such an
unfitness
between sound and sense, when you broke the
charm of my musings by that bass of yours,
Duncan
!
I know not what you call my bass, said
Heyward
,
evidently piqued at her remark, but I know
that your safety, and that of Cora, is far dearer to me
than could be any orchestra of Handel's music. He
paused, and turned his head quickly towards a thicket,
and then bent his eyes suspiciously on their guide,
who continued his steady pace in undisturbed gravity.
The young man smiled contemptuously to himself, as
he believed he had mistaken some shining herry of the
woods, for the glistening eye-balls of a prowling
savage
,
and he rode forward, continuing the
conversation
which had been thus interrupted by the passing
thought.
Major Heyward was mistaken only in suffering his
youthful and generous pride to suppress for a single
moment his active watchfulness. The cavalcade had
not long passed, before the branches of the bushes that
formed the thicket, were cautiously moved asunder,
and a human visage, as fiercely wild as savage art and
unbridled passions could make it, peered out on the
retiring footsteps of the travellers. A gleam of
exultation
shot across the darkly painted lineaments of
the inhabitant of the forest, as he traced the route of
his intended victims, who rode unconsciously onward;
the light and graceful forms of the females waving
among the trees, in the curvatures of their path,
followed
at each bend by the manly figure of Heyward;
until, finally, the shapeless person of the singing
master
was concealed behind the numberless trunks of
trees, that rose in dark lines in the intermediate
space.
4*
CHAPTER III.
Before these fields were shorn and tilled;
Full to the brim our rivers flowed;
The melody of waters filled
The fresh and boundless wood;
And torrents dashed, and rivulets played,
And fountains spouted in the shade.
Bryant
.
Leaving
the unsuspecting Heyward, and his
confiding
companions, to penetrate still deeper into a forest
that contained such treacherous inmates, we must use
an author's privilege, and shift the scene a few miles
to the westward of the place where we have last seen
them.
On that day, two men might be observed,
lingering
on the banks of a small but rapid stream, within
an hour's journey of the encampment of Webb, like
those who awaited the appearance of an absent
person
,
or the approach of some expected event. The
vast canopy of woods spread itself to the margin of
the river, overhanging the water, and shadowing its
dark glassy current with a deeper hue. The rays of
the sun were beginning to grow less fierce, and the
intense heat of the day was lessened, as the cooler
vapours of the springs and fountains rose above their
leafy beds, and rested in the atmosphere. Still that
breathing silence, which marks the drowsy sultriness
of an American landscape in July, pervaded the
secluded
spot, interrupted, only, by the low voices of
the men in question, an occasional and lazy tap of a
reviving wood-pecker, the discordant cry of some
gaudy jay, or a swelling on the ear, from the dull
roar of a distant water-fall.
These feeble and broken sounds were, however,
too familiar to the foresters, to draw their attention
from the more interesting matter of their dialogue.
While one of these loiterers showed the red skin and
wild accoutrements of a native of the woods, the
other exhibited, through the mask of his rude and
nearly savage equipments, the brighter, though
sun-burnt
and long-faded complexion of one who might
claim descent from an European parentage. The
former was seated on the end of a mossy log, in a
posture
that permitted him to heighten the effect of his
earnest language, by the calm but expressive gestures
of an Indian, engaged in debate. His body, which
was nearly naked, presented a terrific emblem of
death, drawn in intermingled colours of white and
black. His closely shaved head, on which no other
hair than the well known and chivalrous scalping tuft
was preserved, was without ornament of any kind,
with the exception of a solitary Eagle's plume, that
crossed his crown, and depended over the left
shoulder
.
A tomahawk and scalping-knife, of English
manufacture
,
were in his girdle; while a short military
rifle, of that sort with which the policy of the
whites armed their savage allies, lay carelessly
across his bare and sinewy knee. The expanded
chest, full-formed limbs, and grave countenance of
this warrior, would denote that he had reached the
vigour of his days, though no symptoms of decay
appeared
to have yet weakened his manhood.
The frame of the white man, judging by such parts
as were not concealed by his clothes, was like that of
one who had known hardships and exertion from his
earliest youth. His person, though muscular, was
rather attenuated than full; but every nerve and
muscle appeared strung and indurated, by unremitted
exposure and toil. He wore a hunting-shirt of
forest-green
,
fringed with faded yellow, and a summer cap,
of skins which had been shorn of their fur. He
also
bore a knife in a girdle of wampum, like that
which confined the scanty garments of the Indian, but
no tomahawk. His moccasins were ornamented after
the gay fashion of the natives, while the only part of
his under dress which appeared below the
hunting-frock
,
was a pair of buckskin leggings, that laced at
the sides, and were gartered above the knees, with
the sinews of a deer. A pouch and horn completed
his personal accoutrements, though a rifle of a great
length, which the theory of the more ingenious
whites had taught them, was the most dangerous of
all fire-arms, leaned against a neighbouring sapling.
The eye of the hunter, or scout, whichever he might
be, was small, quick, keen, and restless, roving while
he spoke, on every side of him, as if in quest of game,
or distrusting the sudden approach of some lurking
enemy. Notwithstanding these symptoms of habitual
suspicion, his countenance was not only without guile,
but at the moment at which he is introduced was
charged with an expression of sturdy honesty.
Even your traditions make the case in my
favour
,
Chingachgook, he said, speaking in the
tongue which was known to all the natives who
formerly
inhabited the country between the Hudson and
the Potomack, and of which we shall give a free
translation for the benefit of the reader;
endeavouring
,
at the same time, to preserve some of the
peculiarities
,
both of the individual and of the language.
Your fathers came from the setting sun, crossed the
big river, fought the people of the country, and took
the land; and mine came from the red sky of the
morning, over the salt lake, and did their work much
after the fashion that had been set them by yours;
then let God judge the matter between us, and friends
spare their words!
My fathers fought with the naked red-man!
returned
the Indian, sternly, in the same language;
Is there no difference, Hawk-eye, between the
stone-headed arrow of the warrior, and the leaden
bullet with which you kill?
There is reason in an Indian, though nature has
made him with a red skin! said the white man,
shaking his head, like one on whom such an appeal
to his justice was not thrown away. For a moment
he appeared to be conscious of having the worst of the
argument, then rallying again, he answered to the
objection of his antagonist in the best manner his
limited information would allow: I am no scholar,
and I care not who knows it; but judging from what
I have seen at deer chaces, and squirrel hunts, of the
sparks below, I should think a rifle in the hands of
their grandfathers, was not so dangerous as a hickory
bow, and a good flint-head might be, if drawn with
Indian judgment, and sent by an Indian eye.
You have the story told by your fathers,
returned
the other, coldly waving his hand, in proud
disdain
.
What say your old men? do they tell the
young warriors, that the pale-faces met the red-men,
painted for war and armed with the stone hatchet or
wooden gun?
I am not a prejudiced man, nor one who vaunts
himself on his natural privileges, though the worst
enemy I have on earth, and he is an Iroquois, daren't
deny that I am genuine white, the scout replied,
surveying, with secret satisfaction, the faded colour
of his bony and sinewy hand; and I am willing
to own that my people have many ways, of which, as
an honest man, I can't approve. It is one of their
customs
to write in books what they have done and seen,
instead of telling them in their villages, where the lie
can be given to the face of a cowardly boaster, and
the brave soldier can call on his comrades to witness
for the truth of his words. In consequence of this bad
fashion, a man who is too conscientious to mispend
his days among the women, in learning the names of
black marks, may never hear of the deeds of his
fathers, nor feel a pride in striving to outdo them.
For myself, I conclude all the Bumppos could shoot;
for I have a natural turn with a rifle, which must have
been handed down from generation to generation, as
our holy commandments tell us, all good and evil
gifts are bestowed; though I should be loth to answer
for other people in such a matter. But every story
has its two sides; so I ask you, Chingachgook, what
passed when our fathers first met?
A silence of a minute succeeded, during which the
Indian sat mute; then, full of the dignity of his office,
he commenced his brief tale, with a solemnity that
served to heighten its appearance of truth.
Listen, Hawk-eye, and your ears shall drink no
lies. 'Tis what my fathers have said, and what the
Mohicans have done. He hesitated a single instant,
and bending a cautious glance towards his companion,
he continued in a manner that was divided between
interrogation and assertiondoes not this stream at
our feet, run towards the summer, until its waters
grow salt, and the current flows upward!
It can't be denied, that your traditions tell you
true in both these matters, said the white man; for
I have been there, and have seen them; though, why
water, which is so sweet in the shade, should become
bitter in the sun, is an alteration for which I have
never been able to account.
And the current! demanded the Indian, who
expected his reply with that sort of interest that a
man feels in the confirmation of testimony, at which
he marvels even while he respects it; the fathers
of Chingachgook have not lied!
The Holy Bible is not more true, and that is the
truest thing in nature. They call this up-stream
current
the tide, which is a thing soon explained, and
clear enough. Six hours the waters run in, and six
hours they run out, and the reason is this; when
there is higher water in the sea than in the river, it
runs in, until the river gets to be highest, and then it
runs out again.
The waters in the woods, and on the great lakes,
run downward until they lie like my hand, said the
Indian, stretching the limb horizontally before him,
and then they run no more.
No honest man will deny it, said the scout, a
little
nettled at the implied distrust of his explanation
of the mystery of the tides; and I grant that it is true
on the small scale, and where the land is level. But
every thing depends on what scale you look at things.
Now, on the small scale, the 'arth is level; but on
the large scale it is round. In this manner, pools
and ponds, and even the great fresh water lakes, may
be stagnant, as you and I both know they are, having
seen them; but when you come to spread water over
a great tract, like the sea, where the earth is round,
how in reason can the water be quiet? You might as
well expect the river to lie still on the brink of those
black rocks a mile above us, though your own ears
tell you that it is tumbling over them at this very
moment!
If unsatisfied by the philosophy of his companion,
the Indian was far too dignified to betray his unbelief.
He listened like one who was convinced, and
resumed
his narrative in his former solemn manner.
We came from the place where the sun is hid at
night, over great plains where the buffaloes live, until
we reached the big river. There we fought the
Alligewi
,
till the ground was red with their blood.
From the banks of the big river to the shores of the
salt lake, there were none to meet us. The
Maquas
followed at a distance. We said the country
should be ours from the place where the water runs
up no longer, on this stream, to a river, twenty suns'
journey toward the summer. The land we had taken
like warriors, we kept like men. We drove the
Maquas
into the woods with the bears. They only
tasted salt at the licks; they drew no fish from the
great lake: we threw them the bones.
All this I have heard and believe, said the
white man, observing that the Indian paused; but
it was long before the English came into the
country
.
A pine grew then, where this chestnut now stands.
The first pale faces who came among us spoke no
English. They came in a large canoe, when my
fathers
had buried the tomahawk with the red men
around them. Then, Hawk-eye, he continued,
betraying
his deep emotion, only by permitting his voice
to fall to those low, guttural tones, which render his
language, as spoken at times, so very musical; then,
Hawk-eye, we were one people, and we were happy.
The salt lake gave us its fish, the wood its deer, and
the air its birds. We took wives who bore us
children
;
we worshipped the Great Spirit; and we kept
the Maquas beyond the sound of our songs of
triumph
!
Know you any thing of your own family, at that
time? demanded the white. But you are a just
man for an Indian! and as I suppose you hold their
gifts, your fathers must have been brave warriors, and
wise men at the council fire.
My tribe is the grandfather of nations, said the
5
native, but I am an unmixed man. The blood of
chiefs is in my veins, where it must stay for ever.
The Dutch landed, and gave my people the
fire-water
;
they drank until the heavens and the earth
seemed to meet, and they foolishly thought they had
found the Great Spirit. Then they parted with their
land. Foot by foot, they were driven back from the
shores, until I, that am a chief and a Sagamore, have
never seen the sun shine but through the trees, and
have never visited the graves of my fathers.
Graves bring solemn feelings over the mind,
returned the scout, a good deal touched at the calm
suffering of his companion; and often aid a man in
his good intentions, though, for myself, I expect to
leave my own bones unburied, to bleach in the woods,
or to be torn asunder by the wolves. But where are
to be found your race, which came to their kin in
the Delaware country, so many summers since?
Where are the blossoms of those summers!
fallen
,
one by one: so all of my family departed, each
in his turn, to the land of spirits. I am on the hill-top,
and must go down into the valley; and when Uncas
follows in my footsteps, there will no longer be any
of the blood of the Sagamores, for my boy is the last
of the Mohicans.
Uncas is here! said another voice, in the same
soft, guttural tones, near his elbow; who wishes
Uncas
?
The white man loosened his knife in its leathern
sheath, and made an involuntary movement of the
hand towards his rifle, at this sudden interruption,
but the Indian sat composed, and without turning his
head at the unexpected sounds.
At the next instant, a youthful warrior passed
between
them, with a noiseless step, and seated himself
on the bank of the rapid stream. No exclamation of
surprise escaped the father, nor was any question
made or reply given for several minutes, each
appearing
to await the moment, when he might speak,
without betraying a womanish curiosity or childish
impatience. The white man seemed to take counsel
from their customs, and relinquishing his grasp of the
rifle, he also remained silent and reserved. At length
Chingachgook turned his eyes slowly towards his son,
and demanded
Do the Maquas dare to leave the print of their
moccasins in these woods?
I have been on their trail, replied the young
Indian
,
and know that they number as many as the
fingers of my two hands; but they lie hid like
cowards
.
The thieves are outlying for scalps and plunder!
said the white man, whom we shall call Hawk-eye,
after the manner of his companions. That busy
Frenchman, Montcalm, will send his spies into our
very camp, but he will know what road we travel!
'Tis enough! returned the father, glancing his
eye towards the setting sun; they shall be driven
like deer from their bushes. Hawk-eye, let us eat
to-night, and show the Maquas that we are men
tomorrow
.
I am as ready to do the one as the other,
replied
the scout; but to fight the Iroquois, 'tis necessary
to find the skulkers; and to eat, 'tis necessary to get
the gametalk of the devil and he will come; there
is a pair of the biggest antlers I have seen this
season
,
moving the bushes below the hill! Now,
Uncas
,
he continued in a half whisper, and laughing
with a kind of inward sound, like one who had learnt
to be watchful, I will bet my charger three times
full of powder, against a foot of wampum, that I take
him atwixt the eyes, and nearer to the right than to
the left.
It cannot be! said the young Indian, springing
to his feet with youthful eagerness; all but the tips
of his horns are hid!
He's a boy! said the white man, shaking his head
while he spoke, and addressing the father. Does
he think when a hunter sees a part of the creatur, he
can't tell where the rest of him should be!
Adjusting his rifle, he was about to make an
exhibition of that skill, on which he so much valued
himself, when the warrior struck up the piece with
his hand, saying,
Hawk-eye! will you fight the Maquas?
These Indians know the nature of the woods, as
it might be by instinct! returned the scout,
dropping
his rifle, and turning away like a man who was
convinced of his error. I must leave the buck to
your arrow, Uncas, or we may kill a deer for them
thieves, the Iroquois, to eat.
The instant the father seconded this intimation by
an expressive gesture of the hand, Uncas threw
himself
on the ground, and approached the animal with
wary movements. When, within a few yards of the
cover, he fitted an arrow to his bow with the utmost
care, while the antlers moved, as if their owner
snuffed
an enemy in the tainted air. In another moment
the twang of the bow was heard, a white streak was
seen glancing into the bushes, and the wounded buck
plunged from the cover, to the very feet of his hidden
enemy. Avoiding the horns of the infuriated animal,
Uncas darted to his side, and passed his knife across
the throat, when bounding to the edge of the river, it
fell, dying the waters with its blood to a great
distance
.
'Twas done with Indian skill, said the scout,
laughing inwardly, but with vast satisfaction; and
was a pretty sight to behold! Though an arrow is a
near shot, and needs a knife to finish the work.
Hugh! ejaculated his companion, turning
quickly
,
like a hound who scented his game.
By the Lord, there is a drove of them!
exclaimed
the hunting scout, whose eyes began to glisten
with the ardour of his usual occupation; if they come
within range of a bullet, I will drop one, though the
whole Six Nations should be lurking within sound!
What do you hear, Chingachgook? for to my ears the
woods are dumb.
There is but one deer, and he is dead, said the
Indian, bending his body, till his ear nearly touched
the earth. I hear the sounds of feet!
Perhaps the wolves have driven that buck to
shelter, and are following in his trail.
No. The horses of white men are
coming
!
returned the other, raising himself with
dignity
,
and resuming his seat on the log with all his
5*
former composure. Hawk-eye, they are your
brothers; speak to them.
That will I, and in English that the king
needn't be ashamed to answer, returned the hunter,
speaking in the language of which he boasted; but
I see nothing, nor do I hear the sounds of man or
beast; 'tis strange that an Indian should understand
white sounds better than a man, who, his very
enemies
will own, has no cross in his blood, although he
may have lived with the red skins long enough to be
suspected! Ha! there goes something like the
cracking
of a dry stick, toonow I hear the bushes move
yes, yes, there is a tramping that I mistook for the
fallsandbut here they come themselves; God
keep them from the Iroquois!
CHAPTER IV.
Well, go thy way; thou shalt not from this grove,
Till torment thee for this injury.
Mid. Sum. Night's Dream
.
The
words were still in the mouth of the scout,
when the leader of the party, whose approaching
footsteps had caught the vigilant ear of the Indian,
came openly into view. A beaten path, such as
those made by the periodical passage of the deer,
wound through a little glen at no great distance, and
struck the river at the point where the white man
and his red companions had posted themselves.
Along this track the travellers, who had produced a
surprise so unusual in the depths of the forest,
advanced
slowly towards the hunter, who was in front
of his associates, in readiness to receive them.
Who comes? demanded the scout, throwing
his rifle carelessly across his left arm, and keeping
the fore finger of his right hand on the trigger, though
he avoided all appearance of menace in the act
Who comes hither, among the beasts and dangers
of the wilderness?
Believers in religion, and friends to the law and
to the king, returned he who rode foremost of the
party. Men who have journeyed since the rising
sun, in the shades of this forest, without
nourishment
,
and are sadly tired of their wayfaring.
You are, then, lost, interrupted the hunter,
and have found how helpless 'tis not to know
whether
to take the right hand or the left?
Even so; sucking babes are not more
dependent
on those who guide them, than we who are of
larger growth, and who may now be said to possess
the stature without the knowledge of men. Know
you the distance to a post of the crown called
William
Henry?
Hoot! shouted the scout, who did not spare
his open laughter, though, instantly checking the
dangerous sounds, he indulged his merriment at
less risk of being overheard by any lurking enemies.
You are as much off the scent as a hound would
be, with Horican atwixt him and the deer! William
Henry, man! if you are friends to the king, and
have business with the army, your better way would
be to follow the river down to Edward, and lay the
matter before Webb; who tarries there, instead of
pushing into the defiles, and driving this saucy
Frenchman
back across Champlain, into his den again.
Before the stranger could make any reply to this
unexpected proposition, another horseman dashed
the bushes aside, and leaped his charger into the
pathway in front of his companion.
What, then, may be our distance from Fort
Edward
?
demanded a new speaker; the place you
advise us to seek we left this morning, and our
destination
is the head of the lake.
Then you must have lost your eyesight afore
losing your way, for the road across the portage is
cut to a good two rods, and is as grand a path, I
calculate
,
as any that runs into London, or even before
the palace of the king himself.
We will not dispute concerning the excellence
of the passage, returned Heyward, smiling, for, as
the reader has anticipated, it was he. It is enough,
for the present, that we trusted to an Indian guide to
take us by a nearer, though blinder path, and that
we are deceived in his knowledge. In plain words,
we know not where we are.
An Indian lost in the woods! said the scout,
shaking his head doubtingly; when the sun is
scorching the tree tops, and the water courses are
full; when the moss on every beech he sees, will tell
him in which quarter the north star will shine at
night! The woods are full of deer paths which run
to the streams and licks, places well known to every
body; nor have the geese done their flight to the
Canada waters, altogether! 'Tis strange that an
Indian
should be lost atwixt Horican and the bend in
the river! Is he a Mohawk?
Not by birth, though he is adopted in that tribe;
I think his birth place was farther north, and he is
one of those you call a Huron.
Hugh! exclaimed the two companions of the
scout, who had continued until this part of the
dialogue
,
seated, immoveable, and apparently indifferent
to what passed, but who now sprang to their feet
with an activity and interest that had evidently gotten
the better of their reserve, by surprise.
A Huron! repeated the sturdy scout, once
more shaking his head in open distrust; they are
a thievish race, nor do I care by whom they are
adopted; you can never make any thing of them
but skulks and vagabonds. Since you trusted
yourself
to the care of one of that nation, I only wonder
that you have not fallen in with more.
Of that there is little danger, since William
Henry is so many miles in our front. You forget
that I have told you our guide is now a Mohawk, and
that he serves with our forces as a friend.
And I tell you that he who is born a Mingo will
die a Mingo, returned the other, positively. A
Mohawk! No, give me a Delaware or a Mohican
for honesty; and when they will fight, which they
won't all do, having suffered their cunning enemies,
the Maquas, to make them womenbut when they
will fight at all, look to a Delaware or a Mohican for
a warrior!
Enough of this, said Heyward, impatiently; I
wish not to inquire into the character of a man that
I know, and to whom you must be a stranger. You
have not yet answered my question; what is our
distance
from the main army at Edward?
It seems that may depend on who is your guide.
One would think such a horse as that might get
over a good deal of ground atwixt sun-up and
sun-down
.
I wish no contention of idle words with you,
friend, said Heyward, curbing his dissatisfied
manner
,
and speaking in a more gentle voice; if you
will tell me the distance to Fort Edward, and
conduct
me thither, your labour shall not go without its
reward.
And in so doing, how know I that I don't guide
an enemy, and a spy of Montcalm, to the works of
the army? It is not every man who can speak the
English tongue that is an honest subject.
If you serve with the troops of whom I judge
you to be a scout, you should know of such a
regiment
of the king as the 60th.
The 60th! you can tell me but little of the
Royal Americans that I don't know, though I do
wear a hunting shift, instead of a scarlet jacket.
Well, then, among other things, you may know
the name of its major?
Its major! interrupted the hunter, elevating
his body like one who was proud of his trust. If
there is a man in the country who knows Major
Effingham
,
he stands before you.
It is corps which has many majors; the
gentleman
you name is the senior, but I speak of the
junior of them all; he who commands the
companies
in garrison at William Henry.
Yes, yes, I have heard that a young gentleman of
vastriches, from one of the provinces far south, has got
the place. He is over young, too, to hold such rank,
and to be put above men whose heads are beginning
to bleach; and yet they say he is a soldier in his
knowledge, and a gallant gentleman!
Whatever he may be, or however he may be
qualified for his rank, he now speaks to you, and of
course can be no enemy to dread.
The scout regarded Heyward a moment in
surprise
,
and then lifting his cap, he answered, in a tone
less confident than beforethough still expressing
doubt
I have heard a party was to leave the
encampment
,
this morning, for the lake shore?
You have heard the truth; but I preferred a
nearer route, trusting to the knowledge of the
Indian
I mentioned.
And he deceived you, and then deserted?
Neither, as I believe; certainly not the latter,
for he is to be found in the rear.
I should like to look at the creatur; if it is a
true Iroquois I can tell him by his knavish look, and
by his paint, said the scout, stepping past the charger
of Heyward, and entering the path behind the mare
of the singing master, whose foal had taken
advantage
of the halt to exact the maternal contributions.
After shoving aside the bushes, and proceeding a few
paces, he encountered the females, who awaited the
result of the conference with anxiety, and not
entirely
without apprehension. Behind these, again,
the runner leaned against a tree, where he stood the
close examination of the scout with an air unmoved,
though with a look so dark and savage, that it might
in itself excite fear. Satisfied with his scrutiny, the
hunter soon left him. As he repassed the females,
he paused a moment to gaze upon their beauty,
answering
to the smile and nod of Alice with a look of
open pleasure. Thence he went to the side of the
motherly animal, and spending a minute in a fruitless
inquiry into the character of her rider, he shook his
head and returned to Heyward. A Mingo is a
Mingo, and God having made him so, neither the
Mohawks nor any other tribe can alter him, he
said, when he had regained his former position. If
we were alone, and you would leave that noble
horse at the mercy of the wolves to night, I could
show you the way to Edward myself within an hour,
for it lies only about an hour's journey hence; but
with such ladies in your company, 'tis impossible!
And why? they are fatigued, but are quite equal
to a ride of a few more miles.
'Tis a natural impossibility! repeated the
scout, with a determined air. I wouldn't walk a
mile in these woods after night gets into them, in
company with that runner, for the best rifle in the
colonies. They are full of outlying Iroquois, and
your mongrel Mohawk knows where to find them too
well, to be my companion.
Think you so, said Heyward, leaning forward
in the saddle, and dropping his voice nearly to a
whisper; I confess I have not been without my
own suspicions, though I have endeavoured to
conceal them, and affected a confidence I have not
always felt, on account of my companions. It was
because I suspected him, that I would follow no
longer; making him, as you see, follow me.
I knew he was one of the cheats as soon as I
laid eyes on him! returned the scout, placing his
finger on his nose in sign of caution. The thief
is leaning against the foot of the sugar sapling that
you can see over them bushes; his right leg is in a
Vol. I. 6
line with the bark of the tree, and, tapping his rifle,
I can take him, from where I stand, between the
ankle
and the knee, with a single shot, putting an end of
his tramping through the woods for at least a month
to come. If I should go back to him, the cunning
varmint would suspect something, and be dodging
through the trees like any frightened deer.
It will not do. He may be innocent, and I
dislike
the act. Though, if I felt confident of his
treachery
'Tis a safe thing to calculate on the knavery of an
Iroquois, said the scout, throwing his rifle forward,
by a sort of instinctive movement.
Hold! interrupted Heyward; it will not do
we must think of some other scheme;and yet I
have much reason to believe the rascal has deceived
me.
The hunter, who had already abandoned his
intention
to maim the runner, at the orders of his superior,
mused a moment, and then made a gesture, which
instantly
brought his two red companions to his side.
They spoke together earnestly in the Delaware
language
,
though in an under tone, and by the gestures
of the white man, which were frequently directed
towards
the top of the sapling, it was evident he
pointed
out the situation of their hidden enemy. His
companions were not long in comprehending his
wishes, and laying aside their fire-arms, they parted,
taking opposite sides of the path, and burying
themselves
in the thicket, with such cautions movements,
that their steps were inaudible.
Now go you back, said the hunter, speaking
again to Heyward, and hold the imp in talk;
these Mohicans here, will take him, without breaking
his paint.
Nay, said Heyward, proudly, I will seize him
myself.
Hist! what could you do, mounted, against an
Indian, in the bushes?
But I will dismount.
And, think you, when he saw one of your feet
out of the stirrup, he would wait for the other to be
free! Whoever comes into the woods to deal with
the natives, must use Indian fashions, if he would
wish to prosper in his undertakings. Go, then; talk
openly to the miscreant, and seem to believe him
the truest friend you have on 'arth.
Heyward prepared to comply, though with strong
disgust at the nature of the office he was compelled
to execute. Each moment, however, pressed upon
him a conviction of the critical situation in which he
had suffered his invaluable trust to be involved,
through his own fearless confidence. The sun had
already disappeared, and the woods, suddenly
deprived
of his light, were assuming a dusky hue, which
keenly reminded him, that the hour the savage
usually
chose for his most barbarous and remorseless
acts of vengeance or hostility, was speedily drawing
at hand. Stimulated by these quickened
apprehensions
,
he left the scout, without reply, who
immediately
entered into a loud conversation with the
stranger that had so unceremoniously enlisted
himself
in the party of the travellers that morning. In
passing his gentler companions, Heyward uttered a
few words of encouragement, and was pleased to
find that, though fatigued with the exercise of the
day, they appeared to entertain no suspicion that
their present embarrassment was other than the
result
of accident. Giving them reason to believe he
was merely employed in a consultation concerning
their future route, he spurred his charger, and drew
the reins again when the animal had carried him
within a few yards of the place, where the sullen
runner
still stood leaning against the tree.
You may see, Magua, he said, endeavouring
to assume an air of freedom and confidence, that
the night is closing around us, and yet we are no
nearer to William Henry than when we left the
encampment
of Webb, with the sun. You have missed
the way, nor have I been more fortunate. But,
happily
,
we have fallen in with a hunter, he whom
you hear talking to the singer, that is acquainted
with the deer-paths and by-ways of the woods, and
who promises to lead us to a place where we may
rest securely till the morning.
The Indian riveted his glowing eyes on Heyward
as he asked, in his imperfect English, Is he alone?
Alone! hesitatingly answered Heyward, to
whom deception was too new to be assumed without
embarrassment. Oh! not alone, surely, Magua,
for you know that we are with him.
Then le Renard Subtil will go, returned the
runner, coolly raising his little wallet from the place
where it had lain at his feet; and the pale faces will
see none but their own colour.
Go! Whom call you le Renard?
'Tis the name his Canada fathers have given to
Magua, returned the runner, with an air that
manifested
his pride at the distinction, though probably
quite ignorant of the character conveyed by the
appellation. Night is the same as day to le Subtil,
when Munro waits for him.
And what account will le Renard give the chief
of William Henry concerning his daughters? will he
dare to tell the hot-blooded Scotsman that his
children
are left without a guide, though Magua
promised
to be one?
The gray head has a loud voice, and a long arm,
but will le Renard hear him or feel him in the
woods? returned the wary runner.
But what will the Mohawks say! They will
make him petticoats, and bid him stay in the
wigwam
with the women, for he is no longer to be
trusted with the business of a man.
Le Subtil knows the path to the great lakes,
and can find the bones of his fathers, was the
answer
of the unmoved runner.
Enough, Magua, said Heyward; are we not
friends! why should there be bitter words between
us? Munro has promised you a gift for your services
when performed, and I shall be your debtor for
another
.
Rest your weary limbs, then, and open your
wallet to eat. We have a few moments to spare; let
us not waste them in talk like wrangling women.
When the ladies are refreshed we will proceed.
The pale faces make themselves dogs to their
women, muttered the Indian, in his native language.
6*
and when they want to eat, their warriors must lay
aside the tomahawk to feed their laziness.
What say you, Renard?
Le Subtil says it is good.
The Indian then fastened his eyes keenly on the
open countenance of Heyward, but meeting his
glance, he turned them quickly away, and seating
himself deliberately on the ground, he drew forth the
remnant of some former repast, and began to eat,
though not without first bending his looks slowly and
cautiously around him.
This is well, continued Heyward; and le
Renard
will have strength and sight to find the path in
the morning;he paused, for sounds like the
snapping
of a dried stick, and the rustling of leaves, rose
from the adjacent bushes, but recollecting himself
instantly continuedwe must be moving before the
sun is seen, or Montcalm may lie in our path, and
shut us out from the fortress.
The hand of Magua dropped from his mouth to
his side, and though his eyes were fastened on the
ground, his head was turned aside, his nostrils
expanded
,
and his ears seemed even to stand more erect
than usual, giving to him the appearance of a statue
that was made to represent intense attention.
Heyward, who watched his movements with a
vigilant eye, carelessly extricated one of his feet
from the stirrup, while he passed a hand towards the
bear-skin covering of his holsters. Every effort to
detect
the point most regarded by the runner, was
completely
frustrated by the tremulous glances of his
organs
,
which seemed not to rest a single instant on any
particular object, and which, at the same time, could
be hardly said to move. While he hesitated how to
proceed, le Subtil cautiously raised himself to his feet.
though with a motion so slow and guarded, that not
the slightest noise was produced by the change.
Heyward felt it had now become incumbent on him to
act; throwing his leg over the saddle, he dismounted,
with a determination to advance and seize his
treacherous
companion, trusting the result to his own
manhood
.
In order, however, to prevent unnecessary
alarm, he still preserved an air of calmness and
friendship.
Le Renard Subtil does not eat, he said, using
the appellation he had found most flattering to the
vanity of the Indian. His corn is not well
parched
,
and seems dry. Let me examine; perhaps
something
may be found among my own provisions that
will help his appetite.
Magua held out the wallet to meet the proffer of
the other. He even suffered their hands to meet,
without betraying the least emotion, or varying his
riveted attitude of attention. But when he felt the
fingers of Heyward moving gently along his own
naked arm, he struck up the limb of the young man,
and uttering a piercing cry, as he darted beneath
it, plunged, at a single bound, into the opposite
thicket. At the next instant, the form of
Chingachgook
appeared from the bushes, looking like a
spectre
in its paint, and glided across the path in swift
pursuit. Next followed the shout of Uncas, when
the woods were lighted by a sudden flash, that was
accompanied by the sharp report of the hunter's rifle.
CHAPTER V.
In such a night,
Did Thisbe fearfully o'ertrip the dew;
And saw the lion's shadow ere himself.
Merchant of Venice
.
The
suddenness of the flight of his guide, and the
wild cries of the pursuers, caused Heyward to
remain
fixed, for a few moments, in inactive surprise.
Then recollecting the importance of securing the
fugitive, he dashed aside the surrounding bushes, and
pressed eagerly forward to lend his aid in the chase.
Before he had, however, proceeded a hundred yards,
he met the three foresters already returning from
their unsuccessful pursuit.
Why so soon disheartened! he exclaimed; the
scoundrel must be concealed behind some of these
trees, and may yet be secured. We are not safe
while he goes at large.
Would you set a cloud to chase the wind?
returned
the disappointed scout; I heard the imp,
brushing over the dry leaves, like a black snake, and
blinking a glimpse of him, just over ag'in you big
pine, I pulled as it might be on the scent; but
'twouldn't do! and yet for a reasoning aim, if any
body but myself had touched the trigger, I should
call it a quick sight; and I may be accounted to have
experience in these matters, and one who ought
to know. Look at this sumach; its leaves are
red, though every body knows the fruit is in the
yellow
blossom, in the month of July!
'Tis the blood of le Subtil! he is hurt, and may
yet fall!
No, no, returned the scout, in decided
disapprobation
of this opinion, I rubbed the bark off a limb.
perhaps, but the creatur leaped the longer for it. A
rifle bullet acts on a running animal, when it barks
him, much the same as one of your spurs on a horse;
that is, it quickens motion, and puts life into the flesh,
instead of taking it away. But when it cuts the
ragged
hole, after a bound or two, there is,
commonly
,
a stagnation of further leaping, be it Indian or be
it deer!
We are four able bodies, to one wounded man!
Is life grievous to you? interrupted the scout.
Yonder red devil would draw you within swing of
the tomahawks of his comrades, before you were
heated in the chase. It was an unthoughtful act, in
a man who has so often slept with the war-hoop
ringing in the air, to let off his piece, within sound
of an ambushment! But, then it was a natural
temptation
!
'twas very natural! Come, friends, let us
move our station, and in such a fashion, too, as will
throw the cunning of a Mingo on a wrong scent, or
our scalps will be drying in the wind in front of
Montcalm's
marquee, ag'in this hour to-morrow's
sun-down
.
This appalling declaration, which the scout uttered
with the cool assurance of a man who fully
comprehended
,
while he did not fear to face the danger,
served to remind Heyward of the importance of the
charge with which he himself had been intrusted.
Glancing his eyes around, with a vain effort to pierce
the gloom that was thickening beneath the leafy arches
of the forest, he felt as if, cut off from all human aid,
his unresisting companions would soon lay at the
entire
mercy of their barbarous enemies, who, like
beasts of prey, only waited till the gathering darkness
might render their blows more fatally certain. His
awakened imagination, deluded by the deceptive light,
converted each waving bush, or the fragment of some
fallen tree, into human forms, and twenty times he
fancied he could distinguish the horrid visages of his
lurking foes, peering from their hiding places, in
neverceasing
watchfulness of the movements of his party.
Looking upward, he found that the thin fleecy clouds,
which evening had painted on the blue sky, were
already
losing their faintest tints of rose-colour, while
the embedded stream which glided past the spot where
he stood, was to be traced only by the dark boundary
of its wooded banks.
What is then to be done? he said, feeling the
utter helplessness of doubt in such a pressing strait;
desert me not, for God's sake! remain to defend
those I escort, and freely name your own reward!
His companions, who conversed apart in the
language
of their tribe, heeded not this sudden and
earnest appeal. Though their dialogue was
maintained
in low and cautious sounds, but little above a
whisper, Heyward, who now approached, could easily
distinguish the earnest tones of the younger warrior.
from the more deliberate speeches of his senior.
It was evident, that they debated on the propriety of
some measure, that nearly concerned the welfare of
the travellers. Yielding to his powerful interest in
the subject, and impatient of a delay that seemed
fraught with so much additional danger, Heyward
drew still nigher to the dusky groupe, with an
intention
of making his offers of compensation more
definite
,
when the white man, motioning with his hand
as if he conceded the disputed point, turned away,
saying in a sort of soliloquy, and in the English
tongue:
Uncas is right! it would not be the act of men,
to leave such harmless things to their fate, even
though it breaks up the harbouring place for ever. If
you would save these tender blossoms from the fangs
of the worst of sarpents, gentleman, you have neither
time to lose nor resolution to throw away!
How can such a wish be doubted! have I not
already offered
Offer your prayers to Him, who can give us
wisedom
to carcumvent the cunning of the devils who fill
these woods, calmly interrupted the scout, but
spare your offers of money, which neither you may
live to realize, nor I to profit by. These Mohicans
and I, will do what man's thoughts can invent, to
keep such flowers, which, though so sweet, were never
made for the wilderness, from harm, and that without
hope of any other recompense but such as God always
gives to upright dealings. First, you must promise two
things, both in your own name, and for your friends, or
without serving you, we shall only injure ourselves!
Name them.
The one is to be still as these sleeping woods,
let what will happen; and the other, is to keep the
place where we shall take you forever a secret from
all mortal men.
I will do my utmost to see both these conditions
fulfilled.
Then follow, for we are losing moments that are
as precious as the heart's blood to a stricken deer!
Heyward could distinguish the impatient gesture of
the scout, through the increasing shadows of the
evening, and moved in his footsteps, swiftly, towards
the place where he had left the remainder of his
party. When they rejoined the expecting and anxious
females, he briefly acquainted them with the
conditions
of their new guide, and with the necessity that
existed for their hushing every apprehension, in
instant
and serious exertions. Although his alarming
communication was not received without much secret
terror by the listeners, his earnest and impressive
manner, aided perhaps by the nature of their
danger
,
succeeded in bracing their nerves to undergo
some unlooked for and unusual trial. Silently, and
without a moment's delay, they permitted him to assist
them from their saddles, when they descended,
quickly, to the water's edge, where the scout had
collected
the rest of the party, more by the agency of
his expressive gestures than by any use of words.
What to do with these dumb creaturs!
muttered
the white man, on whom the sole control of
their future movements appeared to devolve; it
would be time lost to cut their throats, and cast them
into the river; and to leave them here, would be to
tell the Mingoes that they have not far to seek to
find their owners!
Then give them their bridles, and let them range
the woods! Heyward ventured to suggest.
No; it would be better to mislead the imps, and
make them believe they must equal a horse's speed
to run down their chase. Ay, ay, that will blind their
fire-balls of eyes! ChingachHist! what stirs the
bush?
The colt.
That colt, at least, must die, muttered the
scout, grasping at the mane of the nimble beast,
which easily eluded his hand; Uncas, your arrows!
Hold! exclaimed the proprietor of the
condemned
animal, aloud, without regard to the
whispering
tones used by the others; spare the foal of
Miriam
!
it is a comely offspring of a faithful dam, and
would, willingly, injure naught.
When men struggle for the single life God has
given them, said the scout, sternly, even their
own kind seem no more than the beasts of the wood.
If you speak again, I shall leave you to the mercy of
the Maquas! Draw to your arrow's head, Uncas;
we have not time for second blows!
The low, muttering sounds of his threatening voice,
were still audible, when the wounded foal, first
rearing
on its hinder legs, plunged forward to its knees.
It was met by Chingachgook, whose knife passed
across its throat quicker than thought, and then
precipitating
the motion of the struggling victim, he
dashed it into the river, down whose stream it glided
Vol. I. 7
away, gasping audibly for breath with its ebbing life.
This deed of apparent cruelty, but of real necessity,
fell upon the spirits of the travellers, like a terrific
warning of the peril in which they stood, heightened,
as it was, by the calm though steady resolution of the
actors in the scene. The sisters shuddered, and
clung closer to each other, while Heyward,
instinctively
,
laid his hand on one of the pistols he had just
drawn from their holsters, as he placed himself
between
his charge and those dense shadows, that
seemed
to draw an impenetrable veil before the bosom
of the forest.
The Indians, however, hesitated not a moment,
but taking the bridles, they led the frightened and
reluctant horses down into the bed of the river.
At a short distance from the shore, they turned,
and were soon concealed by the projection of the
bank, under the brow of which they moved, in a
direction
opposite to the course of the waters. In the
mean time, the scout drew a canoe of bark from its
place of concealment beneath some low bushes,
whose branches were waving with the eddyings of the
current, into which he silently motioned the
females
to enter. They complied without hesitation,
though many a fearful and anxious glance was thrown
behind them, towards the thickening gloom, which
now lay like a dark barrier along the margin of the
stream.
So soon as Cora and Alice were seated, the scout,
without regarding the element, directed Heyward to
support one side of the frail vessel, and posting
himself
at the other, they bore it up against the stream,
followed by the dejected owner of the dead foal. In
this manner they proceeded, for many rods, in a
silence
that was only interrupted by the rippling of
the water, as its eddies played around them, or the
low dash made by their own cautious footsteps.
Heyward
yielded the guidance of the canoe, implicitly,
to the scout, who approached or receded from the
shore, to avoid the fragments of rocks, or deeper parts
of the river, with a readiness that showed his
knowledge
of the route they held. Occasionally he would
stop; and in the midst of a breathing stillness, that
the dull but increasing roar of the waterfall only
served
to render more impressive, he would listen with
painful intenseness to catch any living sounds that
might arise from the slumbering forest. When
assured
that all was still, and unable to detect, even by
the aid of his practised senses, any sign of approaching
foes, he would deliberately resume his slow and
guarded progress. At length they reached a point in
the river, where the roving eye of Heyward became
riveted on a cluster of black objects, which had
collected
at a spot where the high bank threw a deeper
shadow than usual on the dark waters. Hesitating
to advance, he pointed out the place to the attention
of his companion.
Ay, returned the composed scout, the Indians
have hid the beasts with the judgment of natives!
Water leaves no trail, and an owl's eyes would be
blinded by the darkness of such a hole.
The whole party was soon reunited, and another
consultation was held between the scout and his new
comrades, during which, they, whose fates depended
on the faith and ingenuity of these unknown foresters,
had a little leisure to observe their situation more
minutely.
The river was confined between high and cragged
rocks, one of which impended above the spot where
the canoe rested. As these, again, were surmounted
by tall trees, which appeared to totter on the brows
of the precipice, it gave the stream the appearance of
running through a deep and narrow dell. All
beneath
the fantastic limbs and ragged tree-tops, which
were, here and there, dimly painted against the starry
zenith, lay alike in shadowed obscurity. Behind
them, the curvature of the banks soon bounded the
view, by the same dark and wooded outline; but in
front, and apparently at no great distance, the water
seemed piled against the heavens, whence it tumbled
into caverns, out of which issued those sullen sounds,
that had loaded the evening atmosphere. It seemed,
in truth, to be a spot devoted to seclusion, and the
sisters imbibed a soothing impression of increased
security, as they gazed upon its romantic, though not
unappalling beauties. A general movement among
their conductors, however, soon recalled them from
a contemplation of the wild charms that night
had assisted to lend the place, to a painful sense of
their real peril.
The horses had been secured to some scattering
shrubs that grew in the fissures of the rocks, where,
standing in the water, they were left to pass the night.
The scout directed Heyward and his disconsolate
fellow travellers to seat themselves in the forward end
of the canoe, and took possession of the other
himself
,
as erect and steady as if he floated in a vessel of
much firmer materials. The Indians warily retraced
their steps towards the place they had left, when the
scout, placing his pole against a rock, by a powerful
shove, sent his frail bark directly into the centre of the
turbulent stream. For many minutes the struggle
between the light bubble in which they floated, and the
swift current, was severe and doubtful. Forbidden
to stir even a hand, and almost afraid to breathe, lest
they should expose the frail fabric to the fury of the
stream, the anxious passengers watched the
glancing
waters in feverish suspense. Twenty times they
thought the whirling eddies were sweeping them to
destruction, when the master-hand of their pilot would
bring the bows of the canoe to stem the rapid, and
their eyes glanced over a confused mass of the
murmuring
elementso swift was the passage between it and
their little vessel. A long, a vigorous, and, as it
appeared to the females, a desperate effort, closed the
scene. Just as Alice veiled her eyes in horror,
under the impression that they were about to be swept
within the vortex at the foot of the cataract, the
canoe
floated, stationary, at the side of a flat rock, that
lay on a level with the water.
Where are we? and what is next to be done?
demanded Heyward, perceiving that the exertions of
the scout had ceased.
You are at the foot of Glenn's, returned the other,
speaking aloud, without fear of consequences, within
the roar of the cataract; and the next thing is to
make a steady landing, lest the canoe upsets, and you
7*
should go down again the hard road we have
travelled
,
faster than you came up it; 'tis a hard rift to stem,
when the river is a little swelled; and five is an
unnatural
number to keep dry in the hurry-skurry, with a
little birchen bark, and gum. There, go you all on
the rock, and I will bring up the Mohicans with the
venison. A man had better sleep without his scalp,
than famish in the midst of plenty.
His passengers gladly complied with these
directions
.
As the last foot touched the rock, the
canoe
whirled from its station, when the tall form of
the scout was seen, for an instant, gliding above the
waters, before it disappeared in the impenetrable
darkness that rested on the bed of the river. Left by
their guide, the travellers remained a few minutes in
helpless ignorance, afraid even to move along the
broken rocks, lest a false step should precipitate them
down some one of the many deep and roaring
caverns
,
into which the water seemed to tumble, on
every side of them. Their suspense, however, was
soon relieved; for, aided by the skill of the natives,
the canoe shot back into the eddy, and floated again
at the side of the low rock, before they thought the
scout had even time to rejoin his companions.
We are now fortified, garrisoned, and
provisioned
,
cried Heyward, cheerfully, and may set
Montcalm and his allies at defiance. How, now, my
vigilant sentinel, can you see any thing of those you
call the Iroquois on the main land?
I call them Iroquois, because to me every native,
who speaks a foreign tongue, is accounted an enemy,
though he may pretend to serve the king! If Webb
wants faith and honesty in a Indian, let him bring out
the tribes of the Delawares, and send these greedy
and lying Mohawks and Oneidas, with their six nations
of varlets, where in nature they belong, among the
outlandish Frenchmen!
We should then exchange a warlike for a useless
friend! I have heard that the Delawares have laid
aside the hatchet, and are content to be called
women
!
Ay, shame on the Hollanders and Iroquois, who
carcumvented them by their deviltries into such a
treaty! But I have known them for twenty years, and
will call him liar, that says cowardly blood runs in the
veins of a Delaware. You have driven their tribes
from the sea-shore, and would now believe what their
enemies say, that you may sleep at night upon an
easy pillow. No, no; to me, every Indian who
speaks a foreign tongue is an Iroquois, whether the
castle of his tribe be in Canada or be in York.
Heyward perceiving that the stubborn adherence
of the scout to the cause of his friends the Delawares
or Mohicans, for they were branches of the same
numerous
people, was likely to prolong a useless
discussion
,
adroitly changed the subject.
Treaty or no treaty, I know full well, that your
two companions are brave and cautious warriors! have
they then heard or seen any thing of our enemies?
An Indian is a mortal to be felt afore he is seen,
returned the scout, ascending the rock, and throwing
the deer carelessly down. I trust to other signs
than such as come in at the eye, when I am outlying
on the trail of the Mingoes.
Do your ears tell you that they have traced our
retreat?
I should be sorry to think they had, though this
is a spot that stout courage might hold for a smart
skrimmage. I will not deny, however, but the horses
cowered when I passed them, as though they scented
the wolves; and a wolf is a beast that is apt to hover
about an Indian ambushment, craving the offals of the
deer the savages kill.
You forget the buck at your feet! or, may we
not owe their visit to the dead colt? Ha! what
noise is that!
Poor Miriam, murmured the stranger, uttering
less equivocal sounds; thy foal was foreordained to
become a prey to ravenous beasts! Then suddenly
lifting his voice amid the eternal din of the waters, he
sang aloud
First born of Egypt, smite did he,
Of mankind, and of beast also;
O Egypt! wonders sent 'midst thee,
On Pharaoh and his servants too!
The death of the colt sits heavy on the heart of
its owner, said the scout; but it's a good sign to see
a man account upon his dumb friends. He has the
religion of the matter, in believing what is to happen
will happen; and with such a consolation, it wont be
long afore he submits to the rationality of killing a
four-footed beast, to save the lives of human men. It
may be as you say, he continued, reverting to the
purport
of Heyward's last remark; and the greater the
reason why we should cut our steaks, and let the
carcass
drive down the stream, or we shall have the pack
howling along the cliffs, begrudging every mouthful
we swallow. Besides, though the Delaware tongue is
the same as a book to the Iroquois, the cunning
varlets
are quick enough at understanding the reason of
a wolf's howl.
The scout, whilst making his remarks, was busied
in collecting certain necessary implements; as he
concluded, he moved silently by the groupe of
travellers
,
accompanied by the Mohicans, who seemed
to comprehend his intentions with instinctive
readiness
,
when the whole three disappeared in succession,
seeming to vanish against the dark face of a
perpendicular
rock, that rose to the height of a few yards,
within as many feet of the water's edge.
CHAPTER VI.
Those strains that once did sweet in Zion glide;
He wales a portion with judicious care;
And let us worship God, he says, with solemn air.
Burns
.
Heyward
, and his female companions, witnessed
this mysterious movement with secret uneasiness;
for, though the conduct of the white man had
hitherto
been above reproach, his rude equipments, blunt
address, and strong antipathies, together with the
character of his silent associates, were all causes for
exciting distrust in minds that had been so recently
alarmed by Indian treachery. The stranger alone
disregarded the passing incidents. He seated
himself on a projection of the rocks, whence he gave
no other signs of consciousness, than by the struggles
of his spirit, as manifested in frequent and heavy sighs.
Smothered voices were next heard, as though men
called to each other in the bowels of the earth, when
a sudden light flashed upon the vision of those
without
,
and laid bare the much prized secret of the place.
At the farther extremity of a narrow, deep, cavern
in the rock, whose length appeared much extended
by the perspective and the nature of the light by
which it was seen, was seated the scout, holding a
blazing knot of pine. The strong glare of the fire
fell full upon his sturdy, weather-beaten countenance
and forest attire, lending an air of romantic wildness
to the aspect of an individual, who, seen by the sober
light of day, would have exhibited the peculiarities
of a man remarkable for the strangeness of his
dress, the iron-like inflexibility of his frame, and the
singular compound of quick, vigilant sagacity, and of
exquisite simplicity, that by turns usurped the
possession
of his muscular features. At a little distance in
advance stood Uncas, his whole person thrown
powerfully
into view by its situation and proximity.
The travellers anxiously regarded the upright, flexible
figure of the young Mohican, graceful and
unrestrained
in the attitudes and movements of nature. Though
his person was more than usually skreened by a green
and fringed hunting shirt, like that of the white man,
there was no concealment to his dark, glancing,
fearless
eye, alike terrible and calm; the bold outline of
his high, haughty features, pure in their native red;
or to the dignified elevation of his receding forehead,
together with all the finest proportions of a noble
head, bared to the generous scalping tuft.* It was
the first opportunity possessed by Duncan and his
companions, to view the marked lineaments of either of
their Indian attendants, and each individual of the party
felt relieved from a burthen of doubt, as the proud and
determined, though wild, expression of the features of
the young warrior forced itself on their notice. They
felt it might be a being partially benighted in the vale
of ignorance, but it could not be one who would
willingly
devote his rich natural gifts to the purposes of
wanton treachery. The ingenuous Alice gazed at his
free air and proud carriage, as she would have
looked upon some precious relic of the Grecian
chisel
,
to which life had been imparted, by the
intervention
of a miracle; while Heyward, though
accustomed
to see the perfection of form which abounds
among the uncorrupted natives, openly expressed his
admiration at such an unblemished specimen of the
noblest proportions of man.
I could sleep in peace, whispered Alice, in
reply
,
with such a fearless and generous looking
youth for my sentinel. Surely, Duncan, those cruel
murders, those terrific scenes of torture, of which we
read and hear so much, are never acted in the
presence
of such as he!
This, certainly, is a rare and brilliant instance of
those natural qualities, in which these peculiar
people
are said to excel, he answered. I agree with
you, Alice, in thinking that such a front and eye were
formed rather to intimidate than to deceive; but let
us not practise a deception on ourselves, by
expecting
any other exhibition of what we esteem virtue,
than according to the fashion of a savage. As bright
examples of great qualities are but too uncommon
among christians, so are they singular and solitary
with the Indians; though, for the honour of our
common
nature, neither are incapable of producing them.
Let us then hope, that this Mohican may not
disappoint
our wishes, and prove, what his looks assert
him to be, a brave and constant friend.
Now Major Heyward speaks, as Major Heyward
should, murmured Cora; who, that looks at this
creature of nature, remembers the shades of his
skin!
A short, and apparently an embarrassed, silence
succeeded this characteristic remark, which was
interrupted
by the scout calling to them aloud, to enter.
This fire begins to show too bright a flame, he
continued, as they complied, and might light the
Mingoes to our undoing. Uncas, drop the blanket, and
show the knaves its dark side. This is not such a
supper as a major of the royal Americans has a right to
expect, but I've known stout detachments of the corps
glad to eat their venison raw, and without a relish too.
Here, you see, we have plenty of salt, and can make
a quick broil. There's fresh saxafrax boughs for the
ladies to sit on, which may not be as proud as their
my-hog-guinea chairs, but which sends up a sweeter
flavour than the skin of any hog can do, be it of
Guinea
,
or be it of any other land. Come, friend, dont
be mournful for the colt; 'twas an innocent thing, and
had not seen much hardship. Its death will save the
creatur many a sore back and weary foot!
Uncas did as the other had directed, and when
the voice of Hawk-eye ceased, the roar of the
cataract
sounded like the rumbling of distant thunder.
Are we quite safe in this cavern? demanded
Heyward. Is there no danger of surprise? A
single
Vol. I. 8
armed man, at its entrance, would hold us at his
mercy.
A spectral looking figure stalked from out the
darkness
behind the scout, and seizing a blazing brand,
held it towards the further extremity of their place of
retreat. Alice uttered a faint shriek, and even Cora
rose to her feet, as this appalling object moved into
the light; but a single word from Heyward calmed
them, with the assurance it was only their attendant,
Chingachgook, who, lifting another blanket, discovered
that the cavern had two outlets. Then, holding the
brand, he crossed a deep, narrow chasm in the rocks,
which ran at right angles with the passage they were
in, but which, unlike that, was open to the heavens,
and entered another cave, answering to the
description
of the first, in every essential particular.
Such old foxes as Chingachgook and myself, are
not often caught in a burrow with one hole, said
Hawk-eye, laughing; you can easily see the cunning
of the placethe rock is black limestone, which
every body knows is soft; it makes no uncomfortable
pillow, where brush and pine wood is scarce; well,
the fall was once a few yards below us, and I dare
to say was, in its time, as regular and as handsome a
sheet of water as any along the Hudson. But old
age is a great injury to good looks, as these sweet
young ladies have yet to l'arn! The place is sadly
changed! These rocks are full of cracks, and in
some places, they are softer than at othersome, and
the water has worked out deep hollows for itself,
until
it has fallen back, ay, some hundred feet, breaking
here, and wearing there, until the falls have neither
shape nor consistency.
In what part of them are we? asked Heyward.
Why, we are nigh by the spot that Providence
first placed them at, but where, it seems, they were
too rebellious to stay. The rock proved softer on
either side of us, and so they left the centre of the
river bare and dry, first working out these two little
holes for us to hide in.
We are then on an island?
Ay! there are the falls on two sides of us, and
the river above and below. If you had daylight, it
would be worth the trouble to step up on the height
of this rock, and look at the perversity of the water
It falls by no rule at all; sometimes it leaps, sometimes
it tumbles; there, it skips; here, it shoots; in one
place 'tis white as snow, and in another 'tis green as
grass; hereabouts, it pitches into deep hollows, that
rumble and quake the 'arth; and thereaway, it ripples
and sings like a brook, fashioning whirlpools and
gullies
in the old stone, as if 'twas no harder than trodden
clay. The whole design of the river seems
disconcerted
.
First it runs smoothly, as if meaning to go down
the descent as things were ordered; then it angles
about and faces the shores; nor are there places
wanting, where it looks backward, as if unwilling to
leave the wilderness, to mingle with the salt! Ay,
lady, the fine cobweb-looking cloth you wear at your
throat, is coarse, and like a fish net, to little spots I
can show you, where the river fabricates all sorts of
images, as if, having broke loose from order, it would
try its hand at every thing. And yet what does it
amount to! After the water has been suffered to
have its will for a time, like a headstrong man, it is
gathered together by the hand that made it, and a few
rods below you may see it all, flowing on steadily
towards
the sea, as was foreordained from the first
foundation of the 'arth!
While his auditors received a cheering assurance
of the security of their place of concealment, from
this untutored description of Glenn's, they were much
inclined to judge differently from Hawk-eye, of its
wild beauties. But they were not in a situation to
suffer their thoughts to dwell on the charms of
natural
objects; and, as the scout had not found it
necessary
to cease his culinary labours while he spoke,
unless
to point out, with a broken fork, the direction of
some particularly obnoxious point in the rebellious
stream, they now suffered their attention to be drawn
to the necessary though more vulgar consideration of
their supper.
The repast, which was greatly aided by the
addition
of a few delicacies, that Heyward had the
precaution
to bring with him, when they left their horses,
was exceedingly refreshing to the wearied party.
Uncas acted as attendant to the females, performing
all the little offices within his power, with a mixture
of dignity and anxious grace, that served to amuse
Heyward, who well knew that it was an utter
innovation
on the Indian customs, which forbid their
warriors to descend to any menial employment,
especially
in favour of their women. As the rites of
hospitality were, however, considered sacred among
them, this little departure from the dignity of
manhood
excited no audible comment. Had there been
one there sufficiently disengaged to become a close
observer, he might have fancied that the services of
the young chief were not entirely impartial. That,
while he tendered to Alice the calabash of sweet
water, and the venison in a trencher, neatly carved
from the knot of the pepperage, with sufficient
courtesy
,
in performing the same offices to her sister,
his dark eye lingered on her rich, speaking,
countenance
,
with a softness that banished the bright gleams
of pride, that were usually glancing there, entirely
from their expression. Once or twice he was
compelled
to speak, to command the attention of those
he served. In such cases, he made use of English,
broken and imperfect, but sufficiently intelligible, and
which he rendered so mild and musical, by his* deep,
guttural voice, that it never failed to cause both
ladies
to look up in admiration and astonishment. In
the course of these civilities, a few sentences were
exchanged, that served to establish the appearance
of an amicable intercourse between the parties.
In the meanwhile, the gravity of Chingachgook
remained
immovable. He had seated himself more
within the circle of light, where the frequent, uneasy
glances of his guests were better enabled to separate
the natural expression of his face, from the artificial
terrors of the war-paint. They found a strong
resemblance
between father and son, with the difference
that might be expected from age and hardships.
The fierceness of his countenance now seemed to
8*
slumber, and in its place was to be seen the quiet,
vacant composure, which distinguishes an Indian
warrior
,
when his faculties are not required for any of
the greater purposes of his existence. It was, however,
easy to be seen, by the occasional gleams that shot
across his swarthy visage, that it was only necessary
to arouse his passions in order to give full effect to
the terrific device which he had adopted to
intimidate
his enemies. On the other hand, the quick,
roving
eye of the scout seldom rested. He ate and
drank with an appetite that no sense of danger could
disturb, but his vigilance seemed never to desert him.
Twenty times the calabash or the venison was
suspended
before his lips, while his head was turned
aside, as though he listened to some distant and
distrusted
soundsa movement that never failed to
recall
his guests from regarding the novelties of their
situation, to a recollection of the alarming reasons
that had driven them to seek it. As these frequent
pauses were never followed by any remark, the
momentary
uneasiness they created quickly passed away,
and was, for a time, forgotten.
Come, friend, said Hawk-eye, drawing out a
keg from beneath a cover of leaves, towards the close
of the repast, and addressing the stranger who sat at
his elbow, doing great justice to his culinary skill,
try a little spruce; 'twill wash away all thoughts of
the colt, and quicken the life in your bosom. I drink
to our better friendship, hoping that a little horseflesh
may leave no heart-burnings atween us. How do
you name yourself?
GamutDavid Gamut, returned the singing.
master, mechanically wiping his mouth, preparatory
to washing down his sorrows, in a powerful draught
of the woodman's high-flavoured and well-laced
compound
.
A very good name, returned the other, taking
breath after a draught, whose length announced how
much he admired his own skill in brewing, and, I
dare say, handed down from honest forefathers. I'm
an admirator of names, though the Christian fashions
fall far below savage customs in this particular. The
biggest coward I ever knew was called Lyon; and his
wife, Patience, would scold you out of hearing in less
time than a hunted deer would run a rod. With an
Indian
'tis a matter of conscience; what he calls himself,
he generally isnot that Chingachgook, which
signifies
big sarpent, is really a snake, big or little; but that
he understands the windings and turnings of human
natur, and is silent, and strikes his enemies when
they least expect him. What may be your calling?
I am an unworthy instructor in the art of
psalmody
.
Anan!
I teach singing to the youths of the Connecticut
levy.
You might be better employed. The young
hounds go laughing and singing too much already
through the woods, when they ought not to breathe
louder than a fox in his cover. Can you use the
smooth bore, or handle the rifle?
Praised be God, I have never had occasion to
meddle with such murderous implements!
Perhaps you understand the compass, and lay
down the water courses and mountains of the
wilderness
on paper, in order that they who follow may find
places by their given names?
I practise no such employment.
You have a pair of legs that might make a long
path seem short! you journey sometimes, I fancy,
with tidings for the general.
Never; I follow no other than my own high
vocation
,
which is instruction in sacred music!
'Tis a strange calling! muttered Hawk-eye,
with an inward laugh, to go through life, like a
cat-bird
,
mocking all the ups and downs that may happen
to come out of other men's throats. Well, friend, I
suppose it is your gift, and mustn't be denied any
more than if 'twas shooting, or some other better
inclination
.
Let us hear what you can do in that way;
'twill be a friendly manner of saying good night, for
'tis time these ladies should be getting strength for a
hard and a long push, in the pride of the morning,
afore the Maquas are stirring.
With joyful pleasure do I consent, said David,
adjusting his iron-rimmed spectacles again, and
producing
his beloved little volume, which he
immediately
tendered to Alice. What can be more
fitting
and consolatory, than to offer up evening praise
after a day of such exceeding jeopardy!
Alice smiled; but regarding Heyward, she blushed
and hesitated.
Indulge yourself, he whispered; ought not
the suggestion of the worthy namesake of the
Psalmist
to have its weight at such a moment?
Encouraged by his opinion, Alice did what both
her pious inclinations and her keen relish for gentle
sounds, had before so strongly urged upon her. The
book was open at a hymn not ill adapted to their
situation
,
and in which the poet, no longer goaded by his
desire
to excel the inspired King of Israel, had discovered
some chastened and respectable powers. Cora
betrayed
a disposition to support her sister, and the
sacred
song proceeded, after the indispensable
preliminaries
of the pitch-pipe and the tune had been duly
attended to by the methodical David.
The air was solemn and slow. At times it rose to
the fullest compass of the rich voices of the sweet
maidens, who hung over their little book in holy
excitement
,
and again it sunk so low, that the rushing of
the waters ran through their melody like a hollow
accompaniment
.
The natural taste and true ear of
David, governed and modified the sounds to suit their
confined cavern, every crevice and cranny of which
was filled with the thrilling notes of their flexib
voices. The Indians riveted their eyes on the rocks,
and listened with an attention that seemed to turn them
into stone. But the scout, who had placed his chin
in his hand, with an expression of cold indifference,
gradually suffered his rigid features to relax, until, as
verse succeeded verse, he felt his iron nature
subdued
,
while his recollection was carried back to his
boyhood, when his ears had been accustomed to
listen
to similar, though far less sweet, sounds of praise,
in the settlements of the colony. His roving eyes
began
to moisten, and before the hymn was ended,
large, scalding tears rolled out of fountains that had long
seemed dry, and followed each other down those
cheeks that had oftener felt the storms of heaven,
than any testimonials of weakness. The singers
were dwelling on one of those low, dying chords, which
the ear devours with such greedy rapture, as if
conscious
that it is about to lose them, when a cry, that
seemed neither human, nor earthly, rose in the
outward
air, penetrating not only the recesses of the
cavern
,
but to the inmost hearts of all who heard it. It
was followed by a stillness apparently as deep as if
the waters had been checked in their furious progress
at such a horrid and unusual interruption?
What is it? murmured Alice, after a few
moments
of terrible suspense.
What is it? repeated Heyward, aloud.
Neither Hawk-eye, nor the Indians, made any
reply
.
They listened, as if expecting the sound would
be repeated, with a manner that expressed their own
astonishment. At length, they spoke together,
earnestly
,
in the Delaware language, when Uncas,
passing
by the inner and most concealed aperture,
cautiously
left the cavern. When he had gone, the scout
first spoke in English.
What it is, or what it is not, none here can tell;
though two of us have ranged the woods for more
than thirty years! I did believe there was no cry that
Indian or beast could make, that my ears had not
heard; but this has proved that I was only a vain
and conceited mortal.
Was it not, then, the shout the warriors make
when they wish to intimidate their enemies? asked
Cora, who stood drawing her veil about her person,
with a calmness to which her agitated sister was a
stranger.
No, no; this was bad, and shocking, and had a
sort of unhuman sound; but when you once hear the
war-whoop, you will never mistake it for any thing
else! Well, Uncas! speaking in the Delaware to
the young chief as he re-entered, what see you? do
our lights shine through the blankets?
The answer was short, and apparently decided,
being given in the same tongue.
There is nothing to be seen without, continued
Hawk-eye, shaking his head in discontent; and our
hiding-place is still in darkness! Pass into the other
cave, you that need it, and seek for sleep; we must
be afoot long before the sun, and make the most of
our time to get to Edward, while the Mingoes are
taking their morning nap.
Cora set the example of compliance, with a
steadiness
that taught the more timid Alice the necessity of
obedience. Before leaving the place, however, she
whispered a request to Duncan that he would follow.
Uncas raised the blanket for their passage, and as the
sisters turned to thank him for this act of attention,
they saw the scout seated again before the dying
embers
,
with his face resting on his hands, in a manner
which showed how deeply he brooded on the
unaccountable
interruption, which had broken up their
evening devotions.
Heyward took with him a blazing knot, which
threw a dim light through the narrow vista of their new
apartment. Placing it in a favourable position, he
joined the females, who now found themselves alone
with him, for the first time since they had left the
friendly ramparts of fort Edward.
Leave us not, Duncan, said Alice; we cannot
sleep in such a place as this, with that horrid cry still
ringing in our ears!
First let us examine into the security of your
fortress, he answered, and then we will speak of
rest.
He approached the farther end of the cavern, to
an outlet, which, like the others, was concealed by
blankets, and removing the thick skreen, breathed
the fresh and reviving air from the cataract. One
arm of the river flowed through a deep, narrow
ravine, which its current had worn in the soft rock,
directly beneath his feet, forming an effectual
defence
,
as he believed, against any danger from that
quarter; the water, a few rods above them, plunging,
glancing, and sweeping along, in its most violent and
broken manner.
Nature has made an impenetrable barrier on this
side, he continued, pointing down the perpendicular
declivity into the dark current, before he dropped the
blanket; and as you know that good men and true,
are on guard in front, I see no reason why the advice
of our honest host should be disregarded. I am
certain
Cora will join me in saying, that sleep is
necessary
to you both!
Cora may submit to the justice of your opinion,
though she cannot put it in practice, returned the
elder sister, who had placed herself by the side of
Alice, on a couch of sassafras; there would be other
causes to chase away sleep, though we had been
spared
the shock of this mysterious noise. Ask yourself,
Heyward, can daughters forget the anxiety a father
must endure, whose children lodge, he knows not
where or how, in such a wilderness, and in the midst
of so many perils!
He is a soldier, and knows how to estimate the
chances of the woods.
He is a father, and cannot deny his nature.
How kind has he ever been to all my follies! how
tender and indulgent to all my wishes! sobbed
Alice. We have been selfish, sister, in urging our
visit at such hazard!
I may have been rash in pressing his consent in a
moment of so much embarrassment, but I would have
proved to him, that however others might neglect
him, in his strait, his children were faithful!
When he heard of your arrival at Edward, said
Heyward, kindly, there was a powerful struggle in his
bosom between fear and love; though the latter,
heightened
,
if possible, by so long a separation, quickly
prevailed. `It is the spirit of my noble minded Cora
that leads them, Duncan,' he said, `and I will not
balk it. Would to God, that he who holds the
honour of our royal master in his guardianship, would
show but half her firmness.'
And did he not speak of me, Heyward?
demanded
Alice, with jealous affection. Surely, he
forgot not altogether his little Elsie!
That were impossible, after having known her so
well, returned the young man; he called you by a
thousand endearing epithets, that I may not presume
to use, but to the justice of which I can warmly testify.
Once, indeed, he said
Duncan ceased speaking; for while his eyes were
Vol. I. 9
rivetted on those of Alice, who had turned towards
him with the eagerness of filial affection, to catch his
words, the same strong, horrid cry, as before, filled
the air, and rendered him mute. A long, breathless
silence succeeded, during which, each looked at the
others in fearful expectation of hearing the sound
repeated
.
At length, the blanket was slowly raised, and
the scout stood in the aperture with a countenance
whose firmness evidently began to give way, before a
mystery that seemed to threaten some unknown
danger
,
against which all his cunning and experience
might prove of no avail.
CHAPTER VII.
They do not sleep.
On yonder cliffs, a grisly band,
I see them sit.
Gray
.
'
Twould
be neglecting a warning that is given for
our good, to lie hid any longer, said Hawk-eye,
when such sounds are raised in the forest! These
gentle ones may keep close, but the Mohicans and I
will watch upon the rock, where I suppose a major
of the 60th would wish to keep us company.
Is then our danger so pressing? asked Cora.
He who makes strange sounds, and gives them
out for man's information, alone knows our danger. I
should think myself wicked unto rebellion against his
will, was I to burrow with such warnings in the air!
Even the weak soul, who passes his days in singing,
is stirred by the cry, and, as he says, is `ready to go
forth to the battle.' If'twere only a battle, it would
be a thing understood by us all, and easily managed;
but I have heard that when such shrieks are atween
heaven and 'arth, it betokens another sort of
warfare
!
If all our reasons for fear, my friend, are confirmed
to such as proceed from supernatural causes, we have
but little occasion to be alarmed, continued the
undisturbed
maiden; are you certain that our
enemies
have not invented some new and ingenious
method
to strike us with terror, that their conquest may
become more easy?
Lady, returned the scout, solemnly, I have
listened to all the sounds of the woods for thirty
years, as a man will listen, whose life and death
depend
so often on the quickness of his ears. There
is no whine of the partner; no whistle of the
cat-bird
;
nor any invention of the devilish Mingoes, that
can cheat me! I have heard the forest moan like
mortal men, in their affliction; often, and again, have
I listened to the wind playing its music in the
branches of the girdled trees; and I have heard the
lightning cracking in the air, like the snapping of
blazing
brush, as it spitted forth sparks and forked flames;
but never have I thought that I heard more than the
pleasure of him, who sported with the things of his
hand. But neither the Mohicans, nor I, who am a white
man without a cross, can explain the cry just heard.
We, therefore, believe it a sign given for our good.
It is extraordinary! exclaimed Heyward, taking
his pistols from the place where he had laid them, on
entering; be it a sign of peace, or a signal of war,
it must be looked to. Lead the way, my friend; I
follow.
On issuing from their place of confinement, the
whole party instantly experienced a grateful
renovation
of their spirits, by exchanging the pent air of
their hiding place, for the cool and invigorating
atmosphere
,
which played around the whirlpools and
pitches of the cataract. A heavy evening breeze swept
along the surface of the river, and seemed to drive
the roar of the falls into the recesses of their own
caverns
,
whence it issued heavily and constant, like
thunder rumbling beyond the distant hills. The moon
had risen, and its light was already glancing here and
there on the waters above them; but the extremity
of the rock where they stood still lay in deep
shadow
.
With the exception of the sounds produced by
the rushing waters, and an occasional breathing of
the air, as it murmured past them, in fitful currents,
the scene was as still as night and solitude could
make it. In vain were the eyes of each individual
bent along the opposite shores, in quest of some
signs of life, that might explain the nature of the
interruption they had heard. Their anxious and eager
looks were baffled by the deceptive light, or rested
only on naked rocks, or straight and immovable trees.
Here is nothing to be seen but the gloom and
quiet of a lovely evening, whispered Duncan;
how much should we prize such a scene, and all
this breathing solitude, at any other moment, Cora!
Fancy yourselves in security, and what now, perhaps,
increases your terror, may be made conductive to
enjoyment
Listen! interrupted Alice.
The caution was unnecessary. Once more the
same sound arose, as if from the bed of the river, and
having broken out of the narrow bounds of the cliffs,
was heard undulating through the forest, in distant
and dying cadences.
Can any here give a name to such a cry?
demanded
9*
Hawk-eye, when the last echo was lost in the
woods; if so, let him speak; for myself, I judge it
not to belong to 'arth!
Here, then, is one who can undeceive you, said
Duncan; I know the sound full well, for often have I
heard it on the field of battle, and in situations which
are frequent in a soldier's life. 'Tis the horrid
shriek that a horse will give in his agony; oftener
drawn from him in pain, though sometimes in his
terror. My charger is either a prey to the beasts of
the forest, or he sees his danger without the power to
avoid it. The sound might deceive me in the
cavern
,
but in the open air I know I cannot be wrong.
The scout and his companions listened to this
simple
explanation with the interest of men, who imbibe
new ideas, at the same time that they get rid of old
ones, which had proved disagreeable inmates. The
two latter uttered their usual and expressive
exclamation
,
hugh! as the truth first glanced upon their
minds, while the former, after a short musing pause,
took on himself to reply.
I cannot deny your words, he said; for I am
little skilled in horses, though born where they
abound. The wolves must be hovering above their
heads on the bank, and the timorsome creatures are
calling on man for help, in the best manner they are
able. Uncashe spoke in DelawareUncas,
drop down in the canoe, and whirl a brand among the
pack; or fear may do what the wolves can't get at to
perform, and leave us without horses in the morning,
when we shall have so much need to journey
swiftly
.
The young native had already descended to the
water, to comply, when a long howl was raised on
the edge of the river, and was borne swiftly off into
the depths of the forest, as though the beasts, of their
own accord, were abandoning their prey, in sudden
terror. Uncas, with instinctive quickness, receded,
and the three foresters held another of their low,
earnest conferences.
We have been like hunters who have lost the
points of the heavens, and from whom the sun has been
hid for days, said Hawk-eye, turning away from his
companions; now we begin again to know the signs
of our course, and the paths are cleared from briars!
Seat yourselves in the shade, which the moon throws
from yonder beach'tis thicker than that of the
pinesand let us wait for that which the Lord may
choose to send next. Let all your conversation be
in whispers; though it would be better, and perhaps,
in the end, wiser, if each one held discourse with his
own thoughts for a time.
The manner of the scout was seriously
impressive
,
though no longer distinguished by any signs of
unmanly apprehension. It was evident, that his
momentary
weakness had vanished with the explanation
of a mystery, which his own experience had not
served
to fathom; and though he now felt all the realities
of their actual condition, that he was prepared to
meet them with the fullest energy of his hardy nature.
This feeling seemed also common to the natives,
who placed themselves in positions which commanded
a full view of both shores, while their own persons
were effectually concealed from observation. In
such circumstances, common prudence dictated that
Heyward, and his companions, should imitate a
caution
that proceeded from so intelligent a source. The
young man drew a pile of the sassafras from the cave,
and placing it in the chasm which separated the two
caverns, it was occupied by the sisters; who were thus
protected by the rocks from any missiles, while their
anxiety was relieved by the assurance that no danger
could approach without a warning. Heyward
himself
was posted at hand, so near that he might
communicate
with his companions without raising his voice
to a dangerous elevation; while David, in imitation
of the woodsmen, bestowed his person in such a
manner
among the fissures of the rocks, that his ungainly
limbs were no longer offensive to the eye.
In this manner, hours passed by without further
interruption. The moon reached the zenith, and shed
its mild light, perpendicularly, on the lovely sight of
the sisters, slumbering peacefully in each other's arms.
Duncan cast the wide shawl of Cora before a
spectacle
he so much loved to contemplate, and then suffered
his own head to seek a pillow on the rock. David
began to utter sounds that would have shocked his
delicate organs in more wakeful moments; in short, all
but Hawk-eye and the Mohicans lost every idea of
consciousness, in uncontrollable drowsiness. But
the watchfulness of these vigilant protectors, neither
tired nor slumbered. Immovable as that rock, of
which each appeared to form a part, they lay, with
their eyes roving, without intermission, along the
dark margin of trees that bounded the adjacent shores
of the narrow stream. Not a sound escaped them;
the most subtle examination could not have told they
breathed. It was evident, that this excess of caution
proceeded, from an experience, that no subtlety on
the part of their enemies could deceive. It was,
however, continued without any apparent
consequences
,
until the moon had set, and a pale streak
above the tree tops, at a bend of the river, a little
below, announced the approach of day.
Then, for the first time, Hawk-eye was seen to
stir. He crawled along the rock, and shook Duncan
from his heavy slumbers.
Now is the time to journey, he whispered;
awake the gentle ones, and be ready to get into the
canoe when I bring it to the landing place.
Have you had a quiet night, said Heyward;
for myself, I believe sleep has gotten the better of
my vigilance.
All is yet still as midnight. Be silent, but be
quick.
By this time Duncan was thoroughly awake, and
he immediately lifted the shawl from the sleeping fair
ones. The motion caused Cora to raise her hand as
if to repulse him, while Alice murmured, in her soft,
gentle voice, No, no, dear father, we were not
deserted
;
Duncan was with us.
Yes, sweet innocence, whispered the delighted
youth; Duncan is here, and while life continue,
or danger remain, he will never quit thee. Cora!
Alice! awake! The hour has come to move!
A loud shriek from the younger of the sisters, and
the form of the other standing upright before him, in
bewildered horror, was the unexpected answer he
received
.
While the words were still on the lips of
Heyward, there had arisen such a tumult of yells
and cries, as served to drive the swift currents of his
own youthful blood, back from its bounding course
into the fountains of his heart. It seemed, for near
a minute, as if the demons of hell had possessed
themselves of the air about them, and were
venting
their savage humours in barbarous sounds.
The cries came from no particular direction, though
it was evident they filled the woods, and, as the
appalled listeners easily imagined, the caverns of
the falls, the rocks, the bed of the river, and the
upper air. David raised his tall person in the midst
of the infernal din, with a hand on either ear,
exclaiming
Whence comes this discord! Has hell broke
loose, that man should utter sounds like these!
The bright flashes, and the quick reports of a dozen
rifles, from the opposite banks of the stream,
followed
this incautious exposure of his person, and left
the unfortunate singing master, senseless, on that
rock where he had been so long slumbering. The
Mohicans boldly sent back the intimidating yell of
their enemies, who raised a shout of savage triumph
as they witnessed the fall of Gamut. The flash of
rifles was then quick and close between them, but
either party was too well skilled to leave even a
limb exposed to the hostile aim. Duncan listened
with intense anxiety for the strokes of the paddle,
believing that flight was now their only refuge. The
river glanced by with its ordinary velocity, but the
canoe was no where to be seen on its dark waters. He
had just fancied they were cruelly deserted by the
scout, as a stream of flame issued from the rock
beneath
him, and a fierce yell, blended with a shriek
of agony, announced that the messenger of death,
hurled from the fatal weapon of Hawk-eye, had
found a victim. At this slight repulse the assailants
instantly withdrew and, gradually, the place became
still as before the sudden tumult.
Duncan seized the favourable moment to spring
to the body of Gamut, which he bore within the
shelter of the narrow chasm that protected the
sisters
.
In another minute the whole party was
collected
in this spot of comparative safety.
The poor fellow has saved his scalp, said
Hawk-eye, coolly passing his hand over the head of
David; but he is a proof that a man may be born
with too long a tongue! 'Twas downright madness
to show six feet of flesh and blood, on a naked rock,
to the raging savages; and I only wonder he has
escaped
with life.
Is he not dead! demanded Cora, in a voice
whose husky tones showed how powerfully, natural
horror struggled with her assumed firmness. Can
we do aught to assist the wretched man?
No, no! the life is in his heart yet, and after he
has slept awhile he will come to himself, and be a
wiser man for it, till the hour of his real time
shall come, returned Hawk-eye, casting another
oblique glance at the insensible body, while he filled his
charger with admirable nicety. Carry him in,
Uncas
,
and lay him on the saxafrax. The longer his nap
lasts the better it will be for him; as I doubt whether
he can find a proper cover for such a shape on these
rocks; and singing won't do any good with the
Iroquois
.
You believe, then, the attack will be renewed?
asked Heyward.
Do I expect a hungry wolf will satisfy his craving
with a mouthful! They have lost a man, and 'tis
their fashion, when they meet a loss, and fail in the
surprise, to fall back; but we shall have them on
again, with new expedients to circumvent us, and
master our scalps. Our main hope, he continued,
raising his rugged countenance, across which a shade
of anxiety just then passed like a darkening cloud,
will be to keep the rock until Munro can send a
party to our help! God send it may be soon, and under
a leader that well knows the Indian customs!
You hear our probable fortunes, Cora, said
Duncan; and you know we have every thing to
hope from the anxiety and experience of your father.
Come, then, with Alice, into this cavern, where you,
at least, will be safe from the murderous rifles of our
enemies, and where you may bestow a care suited
to your gentle natures, on our unfortunate comrade.
The sisters followed him into the outer cave, where
David was beginning, by his sighs, to give symptoms of
returning consciousness, and, then, commending the
wounded man to their attention, he immediately
prepared
to leave them.
Duncan! said the tremulous voice of Cora,
when he had reached the mouth of the cavern,
immediately
arresting the steps of the youth. He
turned, and beheld the speaker, whose rich colour
had changed to a deadly paleness, and whose lip
quivered with her emotion, gazing after him, with an
expression of interest which immediately recalled
him to her side. Remember, Duncan, how
necessary
your safety is to our ownhow you bear a
father's sacred trusthow much depends on your
discretion and carein short, she added, while
the tell-tale blood stole over her features, crimsoning
her very temples, how very deservedly dear you are
to all of the name of Munro.
If any thing could add to my own base love of
life, said Heyward, suffering his unconscious eyes to
wander to the youthful form of the silent Alice; it
would be so kind an assurance. As major of the 60th,
our honest host will tell you I must take my share of
the fray; but our task will be easy; it is merely to
keep these blood-hounds at bay for a few hours.
Without waiting for any reply, he tore himself
from the presence of the sisters, and joined the scout
and his companions, who still lay within the
protection
of the little chasm, between the two caves.
I tell you, Uncas, said the former, as Heyward
joined them, you are wasteful of your powder,
and the kick of the rifle disconcerts your aim!
Little
powder, light lead, and a long arm, seldom fail or
bringing the death screech from a Mingo! At least,
such has been my experience with the creaturs.
Come, friends; let us to our covers, for no man can
tell when or where a Maqua will strike his blow!
The Indians silently repaired to their appointed
stations, which were fissures in the rocks, whence
they could command the approaches to the foot of the
falls. In the centre of the little island, a few short
Vol. I. 10
and stinted pines had found root, forming a thicket,
into which Hawk-eye darted, with the swiftness of a
deer, followed by the active Duncan. Here they
secured themselves, as well as circumstances would
permit, among the shrubs and fragments of stone that
were scattered about the place. Above them was a
bare, rounded rock, on either side of which the water
played its gambols, and plunged into the abysses
beneath
,
in the manner already described. As the day
had now dawned, the opposite shores no longer
presented
a confused outline, but they were able to look
into the woods, and distinguish objects, beneath the
dark canopy of gloomy pines and bushes.
A long and anxious watch succeeded, but
without
any further evidences of a renewed attack,
and Duncan began to hope that their fire had
proved
more fatal than was supposed, and that their
enemies had been effectually repulsed. When he
ventured to utter this impression to his companion,
it was met by Hawk-eye with an incredulous shake
of the head, as he answered
You know not the nature of a Maqua, if you think
he is so easily beaten back, without a scalp! If there
was one of the imps yelling this morning, there were
forty! and they know our number and quality too
well to give up the chase so soon. Hist! look into
the water above, just where it breaks over the rocks.
I am no mortal, if the risky devils haven't swam
down upon the very pitch, and as bad luck would
have it, they have hit the head of the island! Hist!
man, keep close! or the hair will be off your crown
in the turning of a knife!
Heyward lifted his head from the cover, and beheld
what he justly considered a prodigy of rashness and
skill. The river had worn away the edge of the
soft rock in such a manner, as to render its first pitch
less abrupt and perpendicular, than is usual at
waterfalls
.
With no other guide than the ripple of the
stream where it met the head of the island, a party
of their insatiable foes had ventured into the current,
and swam down upon this point, knowing the ready
access it would give them, if successful, to their
intended victims. As Hawk-eye ceased speaking,
four human heads could be seen peering above a
few logs of drift wood, that had lodged on these naked
rocks, and which had probably suggested the idea of
the practicability of the hazardous undertaking. At
the next moment, a fifth form was seen floating over
the green edge of the fall, a little from the true line
of the island. The savage struggled powerfully to
gain the point of safety, and favoured by the glancing
water, he was already stretching forth an arm to meet
the grasp of his companions, when he shot away again
with the whirling current, appeared to rise into the
air, with uplifted arms, and starting eye-balls, and then
fell, with a sullen plunge, into that deep and yawning
abyss over which he hovered. A single, wild,
despairing
shriek, rose from the cavern, above the dull roar of
the cataract, and all was hushed again as the grave.
The first generous impulse of Duncan, was to rush
to the rescue of the hapless wretch, but he felt
himself
bound to the spot, by the iron grasp of the
immoveable
scout.
Would ye bring certain death upon us, by telling
the Mingoes where we lie? demanded Hawk-eye,
sternly; 'tis a charge of powder saved, and
ammunition
is as precious now as breath to a worried deer!
Freshen the priming of your pistolsthe mist of the
falls is apt to dampen the brimstoneand stand firm
for a close struggle, while I fire on their rush.
He placed his finger in his mouth, and drew a long,
shrill whistle, which was answered from the rocks
below
,
that were guarded by the Mohicans.
Duncan
caught glimpses of heads above the scattered
drift wood, as this signal rose on the air, but they
disappeared again as suddenly as they had glanced
upon his sight. A low, rustling sound, next drew his
attention behind him, and turning his head, he beheld
Uncas within a few feet, creeping to his side.
Hawk-eye
spoke to him in Delaware, when the young chief
took his position with singular caution, and
undisturbed
coolness. To Heyward this was a moment of
feverish and impatient suspense; though the scout
saw fit to select it as a fit occasion to read a lecture to
his more youthful associates, on the art of using
firearms
with discretion.
Of all we'pons, he commenced, the long
barrelled
,
true grooved, soft metalled rifle, is the most
dangerous in skillful hands, though it wants a strong
arm, a quick eye, and great judgment in charging, to
put forth all its beauties. The gunsmiths can have
but little insight into their trade, when they make their
fowling-pieces and short horsemens'
He was interrupted by the low, but expressive
hugh of Uncas.
I see them, boy, I see them! continued
Hawk-eye
;
they are gathering for their rush, or they
would keep their dingy backs below the logs. Well,
let them, he added, examining his flint; the
leading
man certainly comes on to his death, though it
should be Montcalm himself!
At that moment the woods were filled with another
burst of cries, and, at the signal, four savages sprang
from the cover of the drift wood. Heyward felt a
burning desire to rush forward to meet them, so
intense
was the delirious anxiety of the moment, but he
was restrained by the deliberate examples of the
scout and Uncas. When their foes, who leaped over
the black rocks that divided them, with long bounds,
uttering the wildest yells, were within a few rods,
the rifle of Hawk-eye slowly rose among the shrubs, and
poured out its fatal contents. The foremost Indian
bounded like a stricken deer, and fell headlong among
the clefts of the island.
Now, Uncas! cried the scout, drawing his long
knife, while his quick eyes began to flash with ardour,
take the screeching imp behind; of the other two
we are sartain!
He was obeyed; and but two enemies remained to
be overcome. Heyward had given one of his pistols
to Hawk-eye, and together they rushed down a little
declivity towards their foes; they discharged their
weapons at the same instant, and equally without
success.
I know'd it! and I said it! muttered the scout,
whirling the despised little implement over the
falls, with bitter disdain. Come on, ye bloody
minded hell-hounds! ye meet a man without a cross!
10*
The words were barely uttered, when he
encountered
a savage of gigantic stature, and of the fiercest
mien. At the same moment, Duncan found himself
engaged with the other, in a similar contest of hand
to hand. With ready skill, Hawk-eye and his
antagonist
each grasped that uplifted arm of the other,
which held the dangerous knife. For near a minute,
they stood looking one another in the eye, and
gradually
exerting the power of their muscles for the
mastery. At length, the toughened sinews of the white
man prevailed over the less practised limbs of the
native
.
The arm of the latter slowly gave way before
the increasing force of the scout, who suddenly
wresting
his armed hand from the grasp of his foe, drove the
sharp weapon through his naked bosom to the heart.
In the meantime, Heyward had been pressed in a
more deadly struggle. His slight sword was snapped
in the first encounter. As he was destitute of any
other means of defence, his safety now depended
entirely
on bodily strength and resolution. Though
deficient in neither of these qualities, he had met an
enemy every way his equal. Happily, he soon
succeeded
in disarming his adversary, whose knife fell on
the rock at their feet, and from this moment it became
a fierce struggle, who should cast the other over the
dizzy height, into a neighbouring cavern of the falls.
Every successive struggle brought them nearer to the
verge, where Duncan perceived the final and
conquering
effort must be made. Each of the
combatants
threw all his energies into that effort, and the
result was, that both tottered on the brink of the
precipice
.
Heyward felt the grasp of the other at his
throat, and saw the grim smile the savage gave, under
the revengeful hope that he hurried his enemy to a
fate similar to his own, as he felt his body slowly
yielding
to a resistless power, and the young man
experienced
the passing agony of such a moment in all its
horrors
.
At that instant of extreme danger, a dark hand and
glancing knife appeared before him; the Indian
released
his hold, as the blood flowed freely from around
the severed tendons of his wrist; and while Duncan
was drawn backward by the saving arm of Uncas, his
charmed eyes were still riveted on the fierce and
disappointed
countenance of his foe, who fell sullenly
and disappointed down the irrecoverable precipice.
To cover! to cover! cried Hawk-eye, who
just then had despatched his enemy; to cover, for
your lives! the work is but half ended!
The young Mohican gave a loud shout of triumph,
and followed by Duncan, he glided up the acclivity
they had descended to the combat, and sought the
friendly shelter of the rocks and shrubs.
CHAPTER VIII.
They linger yet,
Avengers of their native land.
Gray
.
The
warning call of the scout was not uttered
without occasion. During the occurrence of the
deadly encounter just related, the roar of the falls was
unbroken by any human sound whatever. It would
seem, that interest in the result had kept the natives,
on the opposite shores, in breathless suspense, while
the quick evolutions and swift changes in the positions
of the combatants, effectually prevented a fire, that
might prove dangerous alike to friend and enemy. But
the moment the struggle was decided, a yell arose, as
fierce and savage as wild and revengeful passions
could throw into the air. It was followed by the
swift flashes of the rifles, which sent their leaden
messengers across the rock in vollies, as though the
assailants would pour out their impotent fury on the
insensible scene of the fatal contest.
A steady, though deliberate, return was made from
the rifle of Chingachgook, who had maintained his
post throughout the fray with unmoved resolution.
When the triumphant shout of Uncas was borne to his
ears, the gratified father had raised his voice in a
single
responsive cry, after which his busy piece alone
proved that he still guarded his pass with unwearied
diligence. In this manner many minutes flew by with
the swiftness of thought; the rifles of the assailants
speaking, at times, in rattling vollies, and at others,
in occasional, scattering shots. Though the rock,
the trees, and the shrubs, were cut and torn in a
hundred
places around the besieged, their cover was so
close, and so rigidly maintained, that, as yet, David had
been the only sufferer in their little band.
Let them burn their powder, said the
deliberate
scout, while bullet after bullet whizzed by the place
where he so securely lay; there will be a fine
gathering
of lead when it is over, and I fancy the imps
will tire of the sport, afore these old stones cry out
for mercy! Uncas, boy, you waste the kernels by
overcharging; and a kicking rifle never carries a true
bullet. I told you to take that loping miscreant
under the line of white paint; now, if your bullet went
a hair's breadth, it went two inches above it. The
life lies low in a Mingo, and humanity teaches us to
make a quick end of the sarpents.
A quiet smile lighted the haughty features of the
young Mohican, betraying his knowledge of the
English
language, as well as of the others meaning, but
he suffered it to pass away without vindication or reply.
I cannot permit you to accuse Uncas of want of
judgment or of skill, said Duncan; he saved my life
in the coolest and readiest manner, and he has made
a friend who never will require to be reminded of the
debt he owes.
Uncas partly raised his body, and offered his hand
to the grasp of Heyward. During this act of
friendship
,
the two young men exchanged looks of
intelligence
,
which caused Duncan to forget the character
and condition of his wild associate. In the
meanwhile
,
Hawk-eye, who looked on this burst of
youthful
feeling with a cool but kind regard, made the
following
calm reply:
Life is an obligation which friends often owe to
each other in the wilderness. I dare say I may have
served Uncas some such turn myself before now;
and I very well remember, that he has stood between
me and death five different times: three times from
the Mingoes, once in crossing Horican, and
That bullet was better aimed than common!
exclaimed
Duncan, involuntarily shrinking from a shot
which struck on the rock at his side with a smart
rebound.
Hawk-eye laid his hand on the shapeless metal,
and shook his head, as he examined it, saying,
Falling
lead is never flattened! had it come from the
clouds this might have happened!
But the rifle of Uncas was deliberately raised toward
the heavens, directing the eyes of his companions to a
point, where the mystery was immediately explained.
A ragged oak grew on the right bank of the river,
nearly opposite to their position, which, seeking the
freedom of the open space, had inclined so far
forward
,
that its upper branches overhung that arm
of the stream which flowed nearest to its own shore.
Among the topmost leaves, which scantily concealed
the gnarled and stinted limbs, a dark looking savage
was nestled, partly concealed by the trunk of the
tree, and partly exposed, as though looking down
upon
them, to ascertain the effect produced by his
treacherous aim.
These devils will scale heaven to circumvent us
to our ruin, said Hawk-eye; keep him in play,
boy, until I can bring `kill-deer' to bear, when we
will try his metal on each side of the tree at once.
Uncas delayed his fire until the scout uttered the
word. The rifles flashed, the leaves and bark of the
oak flew into the air, and were scattered by the
wind, but the Indian answered their assault by a
taunting
laugh, sending down upon them another bullet in
return, that struck the cap of Hawk-eye from his head.
Once more the savage yells burst out of the woods,
and the leaden hail whistled above the heads of the
besieged, as if to confine them to a place where they
might become easy victims to the enterprise of the
warrior who had mounted the tree.
This must be looked to! said the scout,
glancing
about him with an anxious eye. Uncas, call
up your father; we have need of all our we'pons to
bring the cunning varment from his roost.
The signal was instantly given; and, before
Hawk-eye
had reloaded his rifle, they were joined by
Chingachgook
.
When his son pointed out to the
experienced
warrior the situation of their dangerous
enemy
,
the usual exclamatory hugh, burst from his
lips; after which, no further expression of surprise
or alarm was suffered to escape from him.
Hawk-eye
and the Mohicans conversed earnestly together in
Delaware for a few moments, when each quietly took
his post, in order to execute the plan they had speedily
devised.
The warrior in the oak had maintained a quick,
though ineffectual, fire, from the moment of his
discovery
.
But his aim was interrupted by the vigilance of
his enemies, whose rifles instantaneously bore on any
part of his person that was left exposed. Still
his bullets fell in the centre of the crouching party.
The clothes of Heyward, which rendered him
peculiarly
conspicuous, were repeatedly cut, and once
blood was drawn from a slight wound in his arm.
At length, emboldened by the long and patient
watchfulness of his enemies, the Huron attempted a
better and more fatal aim. The quick eyes of the
Mohicans caught the dark line of his lower limbs
incautiously exposed through the thin foliage, a few
inches
from the trunk of the tree. Their rifles made a
common report, when, sinking on his wounded limb,
part of the body of the savage came into view. Swift
as thought, Hawk-eye seized the advantage, and
discharged
his fatal weapon into the top of the oak. The
leaves were unusually agitated; the dangerous rifle
fell from its commanding elevation, and after a few
moments of vain struggling, the form of the savage
was seen swinging in the wind, while he grasped a
ragged
and naked branch of the tree with his hands
clenched in desperation.
Give him, in pity, give him, the contents of
another
rifle! cried Duncan, turning away his eyes in
horror from the spectacle of a fellow creature in such
awful jeopardy.
Not a karnel! exclaimed the obdurate
Hawk-eye
;
his death is certain, and we have no powder
to spare, for Indian fights, sometimes, last for days;
'tis their scalps, or ours!and God, who made us,
has put into our natures the craving after life!
Against this stern and unyielding morality,
supported
,
as it was, by such visible policy, there was
no appeal. From that moment the yells in the forest
once more ceased, the fire was suffered to decline,
and all eyes, those of friends, as well as enemies,
became
fixed on the hopeless condition of the wretch,
who was dangling between heaven and earth. The
body yielded to the currents of air, and though no
murmur or groan escaped the victim, there were
instants
when he grimly faced his foes, and the
anguish
of cold despair might be traced, through the
intervening distance, in possession of his swarthy
lineaments. Three several times the scout raised his
piece in mercy, and as often prudence getting the
better
of his intention, it was again silently lowered.
At length, one hand of the Huron lost its hold, and
dropped exhausted to his side. A desperate and
fruitless struggle to recover the branch succeeded,
and then the savage was seen for a fleeting instant,
grasping wildly at the empty air. The lightning is
not quicker than was the flame from the rifle of
Hawk-eye; the limbs of the victim trembled and
contracted
,
the head fell to the bosom, and the body
parted
the foaming waters, like lead, when the element
closed above it, in its ceaseless velocity, and every
vestige of the unhappy Huron was lost for ever.
No shout of triumph succeeded this important
advantage
,
but the Mohicans gazed at each other in
silent horror. A single yell burst from the woods,
Vol. I. 11
and all was again still. Hawk-eye, who alone
appeared
to reason on the occasion, shook his head,
at his own momentary weakness, even uttering his
self-disapprobation aloud.
'Twas the last charge in my horn, and the last
bullet in my pouch, and 'twas the act of a boy! he
said; what mattered it whether he struck the rock
living or dead! feeling would soon be over. Uncas,
lad, go down to the canoe, and bring up the big horn;
it is all the powder we have left, and we shall need
it to the last grain, or I am ignorant of the Mingo
nature.
The young Mohican instantly complied, leaving
the scout turning over the useless contents of his
pouch, and shaking the empty horn with renewed
discontent. From this unsatisfactory examination,
however, he was soon called by a loud and piercing
exclamation from Uncas, that sounded even to the
unpractised ears of Duncan, as the signal of some
new and unexpected calamity. Every thought
filled with apprehension for the precious treasure he
had concealed in the cavern, the young man started
to his feet, totally regardless of the hazard he incurred
by such an exposure. As if actuated by a common
impulse
,
his movement was imitated by his companions,
and, together, they rushed down the pass to the
friendly chasm, with a rapidity that rendered the
scattering fire of their enemies perfectly harmless.
The unwonted cry had brought the sisters, together
with the wounded David, from their place of refuge,
and the whole party, at a single glance, was made
acquainted
with the nature of the disaster, that had
disturbed
even the practised stoicism of their youthful
Indian protector.
At a short distance from the rock, their little bark
was to be seen floating across the eddy, towards the
swift current of the river, in a manner which proved
that its course was directed by some hidden agent.
The instant this unwelcome sight caught the eye of the
scout, his rifle was levelled, as by instinct, but the
barrel gave no answer to the bright sparks of the flint.
'Tis too late, 'tis too late! Hawk-eye
exclaimed
,
dropping the useless piece, in bitter
disappointment
;
the miscreant has struck the rapid, and had
we powder, it could hardly send the lead swifter than
he now goes!
As he ended, the adventurous Huron raised his head
above the shelter of the canoe, and while it glided
swiftly down the stream, waved his hand, and gave
forth the shout, which was the known signal of
success
.
His cry was answered by a yell, and a laugh
from the woods, as tauntingly exulting as if fifty
demons
were uttering their blasphemies at the fall of
some Christian soul.
Well may you laugh, ye children of the devil!
said the scout, seating himself on a projection of the
rock, and suffering his gun to fall neglected at his feet,
for the three quickest and truest rifles in these
woods, are no better than so many stalks of mullen,
or the last year's horns of a buck!
What, then, is to be done? demanded Duncan,
losing the first feeling of disappointment, in a more
manly desire for exertion; what will become of
us?
Hawk-eye made no other reply than by passing
his finger around the crown of his head, in a manner
so significant, that none who witnessed the action
could mistake its meaning.
Surely, surely, our case is not so desperate!
exclaimed the youth; the Hurons are not here; we
may make good the caverns; we may oppose their
landing.
With what? coolly demanded the scout.
The arrows of Uncas, or such tears as women shed!
No, no; you are young, and rich, and have friends,
and at such an age I know it is hard to die! but,
glancing his eyes at the Mohicans, let us
remember
,
we are men without a cross, and let us teach
these natives of the forest, that white blood can run
as freely as red, when the appointed hour is come.
Duncan turned quickly in the direction indicated by
the other's eyes, and read a confirmation of his worst
apprehensions in the conduct of the Indians.
Chingachgook
,
placing himself in a dignified posture on
another fragment of the rock, had already laid aside
his knife and tomahawk, and was in the act of taking
the eagle's plume from his head, and smoothing the
solitary tuft of hair, in readiness to perform its last
and revolting office. His countenance was
composed
,
though thoughtful, while his dark, gleaming eyes,
were gradually losing the fierceness of the combat in
an expression better suited to the change he expected,
momentarily, to undergo.
Our case is not, cannot, be so hopeless! said
Duncan; even at this very moment succour may
be at hand. I see no enemies! they have sickened.
of a struggle, in which they risk so much with so
little prospect of gain?
It may be a minute, or it may be an hour, afore
the wily sarpents steal upon us, and its quite in natur
for them to be lying within hearing at this very
moment
,
said Hawk-eye; but come they will, and
in such a fashion as will leave us nothing to hope!
Chingachgookhe spoke in Delawaremy
brother
,
we have fought our last battle together, and the
Maquas will triumph in the death of the sage man of
the Mohicans, and of the pale face, whose eyes can
make night as day, and level the clouds to the mists of
the springs!
Let the Mingo women go weep over their slain!
returned the Indian, with characteristic pride, and
unmoved firmness; the great snake of the
Mohicans
has coiled himself in their wigwams, and has
poisoned their triumph with the wailings of children,
whose fathers have not returned! Eleven warriors
lie hid from the graves of their tribe, since the snows
have melted, and none will tell where to find them,
when the tongue of Chingachgook shall be silent! Let
them draw the sharpest knife, and whirl the swiftest
tomahawk, for their bitterest enemy is in their hands.
Uncas, my boy, topmost branch of a noble trunk, call
on the cowards to hasten, or their hearts will soften,
and they will change to women!
They look among the fishes for their dead!
returned
the low, soft voice of the youthful chieftain;
the Hurons float with the slimy eels! They drop
from the oaks like fruit that is ready to be eaten! and
the Delawares laugh!
Ay, ay, muttered the scout, who had listened to
11*
this peculiar burst of the natives with deep attention;
they have warmed their Indian feelings, and they'll
soon provoke the Maquas to give them a speedy end.
As for me, who am of the whole blood of the whites,
it is befitting that I should die as becomes my colour,
with no words of scoffing in my mouth, and without
bitterness at the heart!
Why die at all! said Cora, advancing from the
place where natural horror had, until this moment,
held her riveted to the rock; the path is open on
every side; fly, then, to the woods, and call on God
for succour! Go, brave men, we owe you too much
already; let us no longer involve you in our hapless
fortunes!
You but little know the craft of the Iroquois,
lady, if you judge they have left the path open to the
woods! returned Hawk-eye, who, however,
immediately
added in his simplicity; the down stream
current
,
it is certain, might soon sweep us beyond the
reach of their rifles, or the sounds of their voices.
Then try the river. Why linger, to add to the
number of the victims of our merciless enemies?
Why! repeated the scout, looking about him
proudly, because it is better for a man to die at
peace with himself, than to live haunted by an evil
conscience! What answer could we give to Munro,
when he asked us, where and how we left his
children
?
Go to him, and say, that you left them with a
message to hasten to their aid, returned Cora,
advancing
nigher to the scout, in her generous ardour;
that the Hurons bear them into the northern wilds,
but that by vigilance and speed they may yet be
rescued
;
and if, after all, it should please heaven, that
his assistance come too late, bear to him, she
continued
,
the firm tones of her voice gradually lowering,
until they seemed nearly choked, the love, the
blessings, the final prayers of his daughters, and bid
him not to mourn their early fate, but to look
forward
with humble confidence to the Christian's goal
to meet his children.
The hard, weather-beaten features of the scout
began sensibly to work, as he listened, and when she
had ended, he dropped his chin to his hand, like a
man musing profoundly on the nature of her
proposal
.
There is reason in her words! at length broke
from his compressed and trembling lips; ay, and
they bear the spirit of christianity; what might be
right and proper in a red skin, may be sinful in a man
who has not even a cross in blood to plead for his
ignorance. Chingachgook! Uncas! hear you the
talk of the dark-eyed woman!
He now spoke in Delaware to his companions, and
his address, though calm and deliberate, seemed very
decided. The elder Mohican heard him with deep
gravity, and appeared to ponder on his words, as
though he felt the importance of their import.
After
a moment of hesitation, he waved his hand in
assent, and uttered the English word good, with
the peculiar emphasis of his people. Then,
replacing
his knife and tomahawk in his girdle, the
warrior
moved silently to the edge of the rock most
concealed
from the hostile banks of the river. Here
he paused a moment, pointed significantly to the woods
below, and saying a few words in his own language,
as if indicating his intended route, he dropped into the
water, and sunk from before the eyes of the anxious
witnesses of his movements.
The scout delayed his departure to speak to the
generous maiden, whose breathing became lighter as
she saw the success of her remonstrance.
Wisdom is sometimes given to the young, as well
as to the old, he said; and what you have spoken
is wise, not to call it by a better word. If you are led
into the woods, that is, such of you as may be spared
for a while, break the twigs on the bushes as you
pass, and make the marks of your trail, as broad as
you can, when, if mortal eyes can see them, depend
on having a friend who will follow to the ends of the
'arth afore he desarts you.
He gave Cora an affectionate shake of the hand,
lifted his rifle, and after regarding it a moment with
melancholy solicitude, laid it carefully aside, and
descended
to the place where Chingachgook had just
disappeared. For an instant he hung suspended by
the rock; and looking about him, with a countenance
of peculiar care, he added, bitterly, Had the powder
held out, this disgrace could never have befallen!
then, loosening his hold, the water closed above his
head, and he also became lost to view.
All eyes were now turned on Uncas, who stood
leaning against the ragged rock, in immoveable
composure
.
After waiting a short time, Cora pointed
down the river, and said
Your friends, as you perceive, have not been
seen, and are now, most probably, in safety; is it not
time for you to follow?
Uncas will stay, the young Mohican calmly
answered
,
in his imperfect English.
To increase the horror of our capture, and to
diminish the chances of our release! Go, generous
young man, Cora continued, lowering her eyes
under
the ardent gaze of the Mohican, and, perhaps,
with an inuitive consciousness of her power; go
to my father, as I have said, and be the most
confidential
of my messengers. Tell him to trust you
with the means to buy the freedom of his daughters.
Go; 'tis my wish, 'tis my prayer, that you will go!
The settled, calm, look of the young chief, changed
to an expression of gloom, but he no longer hesitated.
With a noiseless step he crossed the rock, and dropped
into the troubled stream. Hardly a breath was drawn
by those he left behind, until they caught a glimpse
of his head emerging for air, far down the current,
when he again sunk, and was seen no more.
These sudden and apparently successful
experiments
had all taken place in a few minutes of that
time, which had now become so precious. After the
last look at Uncas, Cora turned, and, with a quivering
lip, addressed herself to Heyward:
I have heard of your boasted skill in the water,
too, Duncan, she said; follow, then, the wise
example
set you by these simple and faithful beings.
Is such the faith that Cora Munro would exact
from her protector, said the young man, smiling,
mournfully, but with bitterness.
This is not a time for idle subtleties and false
opinions, she answered; but a moment when
every duty should be equally considered. To us
you can be of no further service here, but your
precious
life may be saved for other and nearer friends.
He made no reply, though his eyes fell wistfully
on the beautiful form of Alice, who was clinging to
his arm with the dependency of an infant.
Consider, after all, continued Cora, after a pause
of a moment, during which she seemed to struggle
with a pang, even more acute than any that her fears
had excited, the worst to us can be but death; a
tribute that all must pay at the good time of God's
appointment.
There are evils even worse than death, said
Duncan, speaking hoarsely, and as if fretful at her
importunity, but which the presence of one who
would die in your behalf may avert.
Cora instantly ceased her entreaties, and veiling
her face in her shawl, drew the nearly insensible
Alice after her into the deepest recess of the inner
cavern
.
CHAPTER IX.
Be gay securely;
Dispel, my fair, with smiles, the tim'rous clouds,
That hang on thy clear brow.
Death of Agrippina
.
The
sudden and almost magical change, from the
stirring incidents of the combat, to the stillness that
now reigned around him, acted on the heated
imagination
of Heyward like some exciting dream. While
all the images and events he had witnessed remained
deeply impressed on his memory, he felt a difficulty
in persuading himself of their truth. Still ignorant
of the fate of those who had trusted to the aid of the
swift current, he at first listened intently to any
signal
,
or sounds of alarm, which might announce the
good or evil fortune of their hazardous undertaking.
His attention was, however, bestowed in vain; for with
the disappearance of Uncas, every sign of the
adventurers
had been lost, leaving him in total uncertainty
of their subsequent fate.
In a moment of such painful doubt, Duncan did
not hesitate to look about him, without consulting that
protection from the rocks which just before had been
so necessary to his safety. Every effort, however,
to detect the least evidence of the approach of their
hidden enemies, was as fruitless as the inquiry after
his late companions. The wooded banks of the
river seemed again deserted by every thing possessing
animal life. The uproar which had so lately echoed
through the vaults of the forest was gone, leaving
the rush of the waters to swell and sink on the
currents
of the air, in the unmingled sweetness of nature.
A fish-hawk, who, secure on the topmost branches of
a dead pine, had been a distant spectator of the fray,
now stooped from his high and ragged perch, and
soared
,
in wide sweeps, above his prey; while a jay, whose
noisy voice had been stilled by the hoarser cries of the
savages, ventured again to open his discordant throat,
as though once more left in undisturbed possession
of his wild domains. Duncan caught from these
natural
accompaniments of the solitary scene a
glimmering
of hope, and he began to rally his faculties to
renewed exertions, with something like a reviving
confidence in their success.
The Hurons are not to be seen, he said,
addressing
David, whose faculties had by no means
recovered
from the effects of the stunning blow he had
received; let us conceal ourselves in the cavern,
and trust the rest to Providence.
I remember to have united with two comely
maidens
,
in lifting up our voices in praise and
thanks-giving
,
returned the bewildered singing-master;
since which time I have been visited by a heavy
judgment for my sins. I have been mocked with the
likeness of sleep, while sounds of discord have rent
my ears; such as might manifest the fullness of time,
and that nature had forgotten her harmony.
Poor fellow! thine own period was, in truth, near
its accomplishment! But arouse, and come with me;
I will lead you where all other sounds, but those of
your own psalmody, shall be excluded.
There is melody in the fall of the cataract, and
the rushing of many waters is sweet to the senses!
said David, pressing his hand confusedly on his brow.
Is not the air yet filled with shrieks and cries, as
though the departed spirits of the damned
Not now, not now, interrupted the impatient
Heyward, they have ceased; and they who raised
them, I trust in God, they are gone too! every thing
but the water is still and at peace; in, then, where
you may create those sounds you love so well to
hear.
David smiled sadly, though not without a momentary
gleam of pleasure lighting his countenance, at this
allusion
to his beloved vocation. He no longer
hesitated
to be led to a spot, which promised such
unalloyed
gratification to his wearied senses; and, leaning
on the arm of his companion, he entered the narrow
mouth of the cave. Duncan seized a pile of the
sassafras, which he drew before the passage, studiously
concealing every appearance of an aperture.
Within
this fragile barrier he arranged the blankets
abandonded
by the foresters, darkening the inner
extremity
of the cavern, while its outer received a
chastened
light from the narrow ravine, through which
one arm of the river rushed, to form the junction with
its sister branch, a few rods below.
I like not that principle of the natives, which
teaches them to submit without a struggle, in
emergencies
that appear desperate, he said, while busied
Vol. I. 12
in this employment; our own maxim, which says,
`while life remains there is hope,' is more consoling,
and better suited to a soldier's temperament. To
you, Cora, I will urge no words of idle
encouragement
;
your own fortitude and undisturbed reason,
will teach you all that may become your sex; but
cannot we dry the tears of that trembling weeper in
your bosom?
I am calmer, Duncan, said Alice, raising
herself
from the arms of her sister, and forcing an
appearance
of composure through her tears; much
calmer, now. Surely, in this hidden spot, we are
safe, we are secret, free from injury; we will hope
every thing from those generous men, who have
risked
so much already in our behalf.
Now does our gentle Alice speak like a
daughter
of Munro! said Heyward, pausing to press
her hands as he passed towards the outer entrance of
the cavern. With two such examples of courage
before him, a man would be ashamed to prove other
than a hero. He then seated himself in the centre
of the cavern, grasping his remaining pistol with a
hand firmly clenched, while his contracted and
frowning
eye announced the sullen desperation of his
purpose
.
The Hurons, if they come, may not gain
our position so easily as they think, he lowly
muttered
;
and dropping his head back against the rock,
he seemed to await the result in patience, though
his gaze was unceasingly bent on the open avenue to
their place of retreat.
With the last sound of his voice, a deep, a long,
and almost breathless silence succeeded. The fresh
air of the morning had penetrated the recess, and
its influence was gradually felt on the spirits of its
inmates
.
As minute after minute passed by, leaving
them in undisturbed security, the insinuating feeling
of hope was gradually gaining possession of every
bosom, though each one felt reluctant to give utterance
to expectations that the next moment might so
fearfully
destroy.
David alone formed an exception to these varying
emotions. A gleam of light from the opening crossed
his wan countenance, and fell upon the pages of
the little volume, whose leaves he was again
occupied
in turning, as if searching for some song more
fitted to their condition than any that had yet met his
eye. He was most probably acting all this time
under
a confused recollection of the promised
consolation
of Duncan. At length, it would seem, his patient
industry found its reward; for, without explanation
or apology, he pronounced aloud the characteristic
appellation of Isle of Wight, drew a long, sweet
sound from his pitch-pipe, and then ran through the
preliminary modulations of the air, whose name he
he had just mentioned, with the sweeter tones of his
own musical voice.
May not this prove dangerous? asked Cora,
glancing her dark eyes at Major Heyward.
Poor fellow! his voice is too feeble to be heard
amid the din of the falls, was the answer; besides,
the cavern will prove his friend. Let him, then,
indulge
his passion, since it may be done without
hazard
.
Isle of Wight! repeated David, looking about
him with all that imposing dignity with which he had
long been wont to silence the whispering echoes of
his school;  'tis a brave tune, and set to solemn
words; let it therefore be sung with meet
respect
!
After allowing a moment of awful stillness to
enforce
his discipline, the voice of the singer was heard,
in low, murmuring syllables, gradually stealing on
the ear, until it filled the narrow vault, with sounds,
rendered trebly thrilling by the feeble and tremulous
utterance produced by his debility. The melody
which no weakness could destroy, gradually wrought
its sweet influence on the senses of those who heard it.
It even prevailed over the miserable travesty of the
song of David, which, after so much diligence, the
singer
had selected from a volume of similar effusions, and
caused the sense to be forgotten, in the insinuating
harmony
of the sounds. Alice unconsciously dried her
tears, and bent her melting eyes on the pallid features
of Gamut, with an expression of chastened delight,
that she neither affected, nor wished to conceal.
Cora bestowed an approving smile on the pious efforts
of the namesake of the Jewish prince, and Heyward
soon turned his steady, stern, look from the outlet of
the cavern, to fasten it, with a milder character, on
the face of David, or to meet the wandering beams
which at moments strayed from the humid eyes of
Alice. The open sympathy of the listeners soon
stirred
the spirit of the votary of music, whose voice
regained
its richness and volume, without losing that
touching softness which proved its secret charm.
Exerting
his renovated powers to their utmost, he was
yet filling the arches of the cave with long and full
tones, when a yell burst into the air without, that
instantly stilled his pious strains, choking his voice
suddenly, as though his heart had literally bounded
into
the passage of his throat.
We are lost! exclaimed Alice, throwing herself
into the expanded arms of Cora.
Not yet, not yet, returned the agitated but
undaunted
Heyward; the sound came from the centre
of the island, and it has been produced by the sight
of their dead companions. We are not yet
discovered
,
and there is still hope.
Faint and almost despairing as was the prospect of
escape, the words of Duncan were not thrown away,
for it awakened the powers of the sisters in such a
manner, that they awaited the result in silence. A
second yell soon followed the first, when a rush of
voices was heard pouring down the island, from its
upper to its lower extremity, until they reached the
naked rock above the caverns, where, after a shout of
savage triumph, the air continued full of horrible
cries and screams, such as man alone can utter, and
he only when in a state of the fiercest barbarity.
The sounds quickly spread around them in every
direction. Some called to their fellows from the
water's edge, and were answered from the heights
above. Cries were heard in the startling vicinity of
the chasm between the two caves, which mingled
with hoarser yells that arose out of the abyss of the
deep ravine. In short, so rapidly had the savage
sounds diffused themselves over the barren rock, that
it was not difficult for the anxious listeners to imagine
12*
that they could be heard beneath, as, in truth, they
were above, and on every side of them.
In the midst of this tumult, a triumphant yell was
raised within a few feet of the hidden entrance to the
cave. Heyward abandoned every hope, with the
belief it was the signal that they were discovered.
Again the impression passed away, as he heard the
voices collect near the spot where the white man had
so reluctantly abandoned his rifle. Amid the jargon
of the Indian dialects that he now plainly heard, it
was easy to distinguish not only words, but
sentences
in the patois of the Canadas. A burst of
voices had shouted, simultaneously, la Longue
Carabine
!
causing the opposite woods to re-echo
with a name which Heyward well remembered to have
heard, had been given by his enemies to a celebrated
hunter and scout of the English camp, and who he
now learnt, for the first time, had been his late
companion
.
La Longue Carabine! la Longue Carabine!
passed
from mouth to mouth, until the whole band
appeared
to be collected around a trophy, which would
seem to announce the death of its formidable owner.
After a vociferous consultation, which was, at times,
deafened by bursts of savage joy, they again
separated
,
filling the air with the name of a foe, whose body,
Heyward could collect from their expressions, they
hoped to find concealed in some crevice of the
island.
Now, he whispered to the trembling sisters,
now is the moment of uncertainty! if our place of
retreat escape this scrutiny, we are still safe! In
every event, we are assured, by what has fallen from
our enemies, that our friends have escaped, and in
two short hours we may look for succour from Webb.
There were now a few minutes of fearful stillness,
during which Heyward well knew that the savages
conducted their search with greater vigilance and
method. More than once he could distinguish their
footsteps, as they brushed the sassafras, causing the
faded leaves to rustle, and the branches to snap. At
length, the pile yielded a little, a corner of a blanket
fell, and a faint ray of light gleamed into the inner
part of the cave. Cora folded Agnes to her bosom
in agony, and Duncan sprang like lightning to his
feet. A shout was at that moment heard, as if
issuing
from the centre of the rock, announcing that the
neighbouring cavern had at length been entered. In
a minute, the number and loudness of the voices
indicated
that the whole party were collected in and
around that secret place.
As the inner passages to the two caves were so close
to each other, Duncan, believing that escape was no
longer possible, passed David and the sisters, to place
himself between the latter and the first onset of the
terrible meeting. Grown desperate by his situation,
he drew nigh the slight barrier which separated him
only by a few feet from his relentless pursuers, and
placing
his face to the casual opening, he even looked
out, with a sort of appalling indifference, on their
movements.
Within reach of his arm was the brawny shoulder
of a gigantic Indian, whose deep and authoritative
voice appeared to give directions to the proceedings
of his fellows. Beyond him again, Duncan could
look into the deep vault opposite, which was filled
with savages, upturning and rifling the humble
furniture
of the scout. The wound of David had died
the leaves of sassafras with a colour, that the
natives
well knew was anticipating the season. Over
this sign of their success, they set up a howl, like an
opening from so many hounds, who had recovered
their lost trail. After this yell of victory, they tore up
the fragrant bed of the cavern, and bore the branches
into the chasm, scattering the boughs, as if they
suspected
them of concealing the person of the man they
had so long hated and feared. One fierce and wild
looking warrior, approached the chief, bearing a load
of the brush, and pointing, exultingly, to the deep red
stains with which it was sprinkled, uttered his joy in
Indian yells, whose meaning Heyward was only
enabled
to comprehend, by the frequent repetition of the
name of la Longue Carabine! When his triumph
had ceased, he cast the brush on the slight heap that
Duncan had made before the entrance of the second
cavern, and closed the view. His example was
followed
by others; who, as they drew the branches from
the cave of the scout, threw them into one pile, adding
unconsciously to the security of those they sought.
The very slightness of the defence was its chief
merit
,
for no one thought of disturbing a mass of brush,
which all of them believed, in that moment of hurry
and confusion, had been accidentally raised by the
hands of their own party.
As the blankets yielded before the outward
pressure
,
and the branches settled into the fissure of the
rock by its own weight, forming a compact body,
Duncan once more breathed freely. With a light
step, and lighter heart, he returned to the centre of
the cave, and took the place he had left, where he
could command a view of the opening next the river.
While he was in the act of making this movement,
the Indians, as if changing their purpose by a
common
impulse, broke away from the chasm in a body,
and were heard rushing up the island again, towards
the point, whence they had originally descended.
Here another wailing cry betrayed that they were
again collected around the bodies of their dead
comrades
.
Duncan now ventured to look at his companions;
for, during the most critical moments of their danger,
he had been apprehensive that the anxiety of his
countenance might communicate some additional
alarm, to those who were so little able to sustain it.
They are gone, Cora! he whispered; Alice,
they are returned whence they came, and we are
saved
!
To heaven, that has alone delivered us from
the grasp of so merciless an enemy, be all the praise!
Then to heaven will I return my thanks!
exclaimed
the younger sister, rising from the encircling
arms of Cora, and casting herself, with enthusiastic
gratitude, on the naked rock to her knees; to that
heaven who has spared the tears of a gray-headed
father; has saved the lives of those I so much love
Both Heyward, and the more tempered Cora,
witnessed
the act of involuntary emotion with powerful
sympathy, the former secretly believing that piety
had never worn a form so lovely, as it had now
assumed
in the youthful person of Alice. Her eyes
were radiant with the glow of her grateful feelings;
the flush of her beauty was again seated on her cheeks,
and her whole soul seemed ready and anxious to pour
out its thanksgivings, through the medium of her
eloquent
features. But when her lips moved, the words
they should have uttered appeared frozen by some new
and sudden chill. Her bloom gave place to the
paleness of death; her soft and melting eyes grew
hard, and seemed contracting with horror; while
those hands, which she had raised, clasped in each
other, towards heaven, dropped in horizontal lines
before
her, the fingers pointing forward in convulsed
motion. Heyward turned the instant she gave a
direction
to his suspicions, and, peering just above the
ledge which formed the threshold of the open outlet
of the cavern, he beheld the malignant, fierce, and
savage
features of le Renard Subtil.
In that moment of horrid surprise, the
self-possession
of Heyward did not desert him. He observed
by the vacant expression of the Indian's countenance,
that his eye, accustomed to the open air, had not yet
been able to penetrate the dusky light which
pervaded
the depth of the cavern. He had even thought of
retreating beyond a curvature in the natural wall,
which might still conceal him and his companions,
when, by the sudden gleam of intelligence that shot
across the features of the savage, he saw it was too
late, and that they were betrayed.
The look of exultation and brutal triumph which
announced this terrible truth, was irresistibly
irritating
.
Forgetful of every thing but the impulses of
his hot blood, Duncan levelled his pistol and fired.
The report of the weapon made the cavern bellow
like an eruption from a volcano, and when the smoke,
it vomited, had driven away before the current of air
which issued from the ravine, the place so lately
occupied
by the features of his treacherous guide was
vacant. Rushing to the outlet, Heyward caught a
glimpse of his dark figure, stealing around a low and
narrow
ledge, which soon hid him entirely from his sight.
Among the savages, a frightful stillness succeeded the
explosion, which had just been heard bursting from the
bowels of the rock. But when le Renard raised his
voice in a long and intelligible whoop, it was answered
by a spontaneous yell from the mouth of every Indian
within hearing of the sound. The clamorous noises
again rushed down the island, and before Duncan had
time to recover from the shock, his feeble barrier of
brush was scattered to the winds, the cavern was
entered
at both its extremities, and he and his companions
were dragged from their shelter, and borne into the
day, where they stood surrounded by the whole band
of the triumphant Hurons.
CHAPTER X.
I fear we shall outsleep the coming morn,
As much as we this night have overwatched!
Midsummer's Night Dream
.
The
instant the first shock of this sudden misfortune
had abated, Duncan began to make his observations
on the appearance and proceedings of their captors.
Contrary to the usages of the natives in the
wantonness
of their success, they had respected, not only the
persons of the trembling sisters, but his own. The
rich ornaments of his military attire, had indeed been
repeatedly handled by different individuals of the tribe,
with eyes expressing a savage longing to possess the
baubles, but before the customary violence could be
resorted
to, a mandate, in the authoritative voice of the
large warrior already mentioned, stayed the uplifted
hand, and convinced Heyward that they were to be
reserved for some object of particular moment.
While, however, these manifestations of weakness
were exhibited by the young and vain of the party,
the more experienced warriors continued their
search throughout both caverns, with an activity that
denoted they were far from being satisfied with those
fruits of their conquest, which had already been
brought to light. Unable to discover any new
victim
.
these diligent workers of vengeance soon
approached
their male prisoners, pronouncing the name
of la Longue Carabine, with a fierceness that
could not easily be mistaken. Duncan affected not
to comprehend the meaning of their repeated and
violent interrogatories, while his companion was
spared
the effort of a similar deception, by his ignorance
of French. Wearied, at length, by their
importunities
,
and apprehensive of irritating his captors by too
stubborn a silence, the former looked about him in
quest of Magua, who might interpret his answers to
those questions which were, at each moment,
becoming
more earnest and threatening.
The conduct of this savage had formed a solitary
exception to that of all his fellows. While the others
were busily occupied in seeking to gratify their
childish passion for finery, by plundering even the
miserable
effects of the scout, or had been searching, with
such blood-thirsty vengeance in their looks, for their
absent owner, le Renard had stood at a little
distance
from the prisoners, with a demeanour so quiet
and satisfied, as to betray, that he, at least, had
already
effected the grand purpose of his treachery.
When the eyes of Heyward first met those of his
recent
guide, he turned them away, in horror, at the
sinister
though calm look he encountered. Conquering his
disgust, however, he was able, with an averted face,
to address his successful enemy:
Le Renard Subtil is too much of a warrior,
said the reluctant Heyward, to refuse telling an
unarmed
man what his conquerors say.
They ask for the hunter who knows the paths
Vol. I. 13
through the woods, returned Magua, in his broken
English, laying his hand, at the same time, with a
ferocious
smile, on the bundle of leaves, with which
a wound on his own shoulder was bandaged; la
Longue Carabine! his rifle is good, and his eye never
shut; but, like the short gun of the white chief, it is
nothing against the life of le Subtil!
Le Renard is too brave to remember the hurts
he has received in war, or the hands that gave them!
Was it war, when the tired Indian rested at the
sugar tree, to taste his corn! who filled the bushes
with creeping enemies! who drew the knife! whose
tongue was peace, while his heart was coloured with
blood! Did Magua say that the hatchet was out of
the ground, and that his hand had dug it up?
As Duncan dare not retort upon his accuser, by
reminding him of his own premeditated treachery,
and disdained to deprecate his resentment by any
words of apology, he remained silent. Magua seemed
also content to rest the controversy, as well as all
further
communication, there, for he resumed the leaning
attitude against the rock, from which, in his
momentary
energy, he had arisen. But the cry of la
Longue Carabine, was renewed, the instant the
impatient
savages perceived that the short dialogue was
ended.
You hear, said Magua, with stubborn
indifference
;
the red Hurons call for the life of the `long
rifle,' or they will have the blood of them that keep
him hid!
He is goneescaped; he is far beyond their
reach.
Renard smiled with cold contempt, as he answered:
When the white man dies, he thinks he is at
peace; but the red men know how to torture even
the ghosts of their enemies. Where is his body?
Let the Hurons see his scalp!
He is not dead, but escaped.
Magua shook his head incredulously, and added
Is he a bird, to spread his wings; or is he a fish,
to swim without looking at the sun! The white chief
reads in his books, and believes the Hurons are
fools!
Though no fish, the `long rifle' can swim. He
floated down the stream when the powder was all
burnt, and when the eyes of the Hurons were behind
a cloud.
And why did the white chief stay? demanded
the still incredulous Indian. Is he a stone, that goes
to the bottom, or does the scalp burn his head?
That I am not a stone, your dead comrade, who
fell into the falls, might answer, were the life still in
him, said the provoked young man, using, in his
anger, that boastful language which was most likely
to excite the admiration of an Indian. The white
man thinks none but cowards desert their women.
Magua muttered a few words, inaudibly, between
his teeth, before he continued, aloud
Can the Delawares swim, too, as well as crawl
in the bushes? Where is `le Gros Serpent'?
Duncan, who perceived by the use of these
Canadian
appellations, that his late companions were
much better known to his enemies than to himself,
answered, reluctantly: He also is gone down with
the water.
`Le Cerf Agile' is not here?
I know not whom you call the `nimble deer,' said
Duncan, gladly profiting by any excuse to create
delay
.
Uncas, returned Magua, pronouncing the
Delaware
name with even greater difficulty than he
spoke his English words.  `Bounding elk' is what
the white man says when he calls to the young
Mohican
.
Here is some confusion in names between us, le
Renard, said Duncan, hoping to provoke a
discussion
.
Daim is the French for deer, and cerf for
stag; lan is the true term, when one would speak of
an elk.
Yes, muttered the Indian, in his native tongue;
the pale faces are prattling women! they have
two words for each thing, while a red skin will make
the sound of his voice speak for him. Then
changing
his language, he continued, adhering to the
imperfect
nomenclature of his provincial instructers, The
deer is swift, but weak; the elk is swift, but strong;
and the son of `le serpent' is `le cerf agile.' Has
he leaped the river to the woods?
If you mean the younger Delaware, he too is
gone down with the water.
As there was nothing improbable to an Indian, in
the manner of the escape, Magua admitted the truth
of what he had heard, with a readiness that afforded
additional evidence how little he would prize such
worthless captives. With his companions, however,
the feeling was manifestly different.
The Hurons had awaited the result of this short
dialogue with characteristic patience, and with a
silence
,
that increased, until there was a general
stillness
in the band. When Heyward ceased to speak,
they turned their eyes, as one man, on Magua,
demanding
,
in this expressive manner, an explanation of
what had been said. Their interpreter pointed to the
river, and made them acquainted with the result, as
much by the action as by the few words he uttered.
When the fact was generally understood, the savages
raised a frightful yell, which declared the extent of
their disappointment. Some ran furiously to the
water's edge, beating the air with frantic gestures,
while others spat upon the element, to resent the
supposed
treason it had committed against their
acknowledged
rights as conquerors. A few, and they not
the least powerful and terrific of the band, threw
lowering, sullen looks, in which the fiercest passion
was only tempered by habitual self-command, at
those captives who still remained in their power;
while one or two even gave vent to their malignant
feelings by the most menacing gestures, against which
neither the sex, nor the beauty of the sisters, was any
protection. The young soldier made a desperate, but
fruitless, effort to spring to the side of Alice, when he
saw the dark hand of a savage twisted in the rich tresses,
which were flowing in volumes over her shoulders,
while a knife was passed around the head from which
they fell, as if to denote the horrid manner in which
it was about to be robbed of its beautiful ornament,
13*
But his hands were bound, and at the first movement
he made, he felt the grasp of the powerful Indian,
who directed the band, pressing his shoulder like a
vice. Immediately conscious how unavailing any
struggle against such an overwhelming force must
prove, he submitted to his fate, encouraging his
gentle
companions, by a few low and tender assurances,
that the natives seldom failed to threaten more than
they performed.
But, while Duncan resorted to these words of
consolation
,
to lull the apprehensions of the sisters, he was
not so weak as to deceive himself. He well knew
that the authority of an Indian chief was so little
conventional
,
that it was oftener maintained by his
physical superiority, than by any moral supremacy
he might possess. The danger was, therefore,
magnified
exactly in proportion to the number of the
savage
spirits by which they were surrounded. The
most positive mandate from him, who seemed the
acknowledged
leader, was liable to be violated, at each
moment, by any rash hand that might choose to
sacrifice
a victim to the manes of some dead friend or
relative
.
While, therefore, he sustained an outward
appearance of calmness and fortitude, his heart
leaped
into his throat, whenever any of their fierce
captors
drew nigher than common to the helpless sisters,
or fastened one of their sullen wandering looks on
those fragile forms, which were so little able to resist
the slightest assault.
His apprehensions were however greatly relieved,
when he saw that the leader had summoned his
warriors
to himself in council. Their deliberations were
short, and it would seem, by the silence of most of the
party, the decision unanimous. By the frequency with
which the few speakers pointed in the direction of
the encampment of Webb, it was apparent they
dreaded the approach of danger from that quarter.
This consideration probably hastened their
determination
,
and quickened the subsequent movements.
During this short conference, Heyward finding a
respite from his greatest fears, had leisure to admire
the cautious manner in which the Hurons had made
their approaches, even after hostilities had ceased.
It has already been stated, that the upper half of
the island was a naked rock, and destitute of any
other defences than a few scattering logs of drift
wood. They had selected this point to make their
descent, having borne the canoe through the wood,
around the cataract, for that purpose. Placing their
arms in the little vessel, a dozen men, clinging to
its sides, had trusted themselves to the direction of
the canoe, which was controlled by two of the most
skilful warriors, in attitudes, that enabled them to
command
a view of the dangerous passage. Favoured by
this arrangement, they touched the head of the island,
at that point which had proved so fatal to their first
adventures, but with the advantages of superior
numbers
,
and the possession of fire arms. That such had
been the manner of their descent, was rendered quite
apparent to Duncan, for they now bore the light bark
from the upper end of the rock, and placed it in the
water, near the mouth of the outer cavern. As soon
as this change was made, the leader made signs to
the prisoners to descend and enter.
As resistance was impossible, and remonstrance
useless, Heyward set the example of submission, by
leading the way into the canoe, where he was soon
seated with the sisters, and the still wondering
David
.
Notwithstanding the Hurons were necessarily
ignorant of the little channels among the eddies and
rapids of the stream, they knew the common sign of
such a navigation too well, to commit any material
blunder. When the pilot chosen for the task of guiding
the canoe had taken his station, the whole band
plunged
again into the river, the vessel glided down the
current
,
and in a few moments the captives found
themselves
on the south bank of the stream, nearly
opposite
to the point where they had struck it, the
preceding
evening.
Here was held another short but earnest
consultation
,
during which, the horses, to whose panic their
owners ascribed their heaviest misfortune, were led
from the cover of the woods, and brought to the
sheltered
spot. The band now divided. The great
chief, so often mentioned, mounting the charger of
Heyward, led the way directly across the river,
followed
by most of his people, and disappeared in the
woods, leaving the prisoners in charge of six savages,
at whose head was le Renard Subtil. Duncan
witnessed
all their movements with renewed uneasiness.
He had been fond of believing, from the
uncommon
forbearance of the savages, that he was reserved
as a prisoner, to be delivered to Montcalm. As the
thoughts of those who are in misery seldom slumber,
and the invention is never more lively, than when
it is stimulated by hope, however feeble and remote
he had even imagined that the parental feelings of
Munro were to be made instrumental in seducing him
from his duty to the king. For though the French
commander bore a high character for courage and
enterprise, he was also thought to be expert in
those political practices, which do not always respect
the nicer obligations of morality, and which so
generally
disgraced the European diplomacy of that
period
.
All those busy and ingenious speculations were
now annihilated by the conduct of his captors.
That portion of the band who had followed the huge
warrior, took the route towards the foot of Horican,
and no other expectation was left for himself and
companions, than that they were to be retained as
hopeless captives by their savage conquerors.
Anxious
to know the worst, and willing, in such an
emergency
,
to try the potency of his wealth, he overcame
his reluctance to speak to Magua. Addressing
himself
to his former guide, who had now assumed the
authority and manner of one who was to direct the
future movements of the party, he said, in tones as
friendly and confiding as he could assume
I would speak to Magua, what is fit only for so
great a chief to hear.
The Indian turned his eyes on the young soldier,
scornfully, as he answered
Speak, then; trees have no ears!
But the red Hurons are not deaf; and counsel
that is fit for the great men of a nation, would make
the young warriors drunk. If Magua will not listen,
the officer of the king knows how to be silent.
The savage spoke carelessly to his comrades, who
were busied, after their awkward manner, in
preparing
the horses for the reception of the sisters, and
moved a little to one side, whither, by a cautious
gesture
,
he induced Heyward to follow.
Now speak, he said; if the words are such as
Magua should hear.
Le Renard Subtil has proved himself worthy of
the honourable name given to him by his Canada
fathers
,
commenced Heyward; I see his wisdom,
and all that he has done for us, and shall remember
it, when the hour to reward him arrives. Yes,
yes! Renard has proved that he is not only a great
chief in council, but one who knows how to deceive
his enemies!
What has Renard done? coldly demanded the
Indian.
What! has he not seen that the woods were filled
with outlying parties of the enemies, and that the
serpent
could not steal through them without being seen?
Then, did he not lose his path, to blind the eyes of
the Hurons? Did he not pretend to go back to his
tribe, who had treated him ill, and driven him from
their wigwams, like a dog? And, when we saw what
he wished to do, did we not aid him, by making a
false face, that the Hurons might think the white man
believed that his friend was his enemy? Is not all this
true? And when le Subtil had shut the eyes and
stopped the ears of his nation by his wisdom, did
they not forget that they had once done him wrong,
and forced him to flee to the Mohawks? And did
they not leave him on the south side of the river,
with their prisoners, while they have gone foolishly
on the north? Does not Renard mean to turn like
a fox on his footsteps, and carry to the rich and gray
headed Scotchman, his daughters? Yes, yes, Magua,
I see it all, and I have already been thinking how so
much wisdom and honesty should be repaid. First,
the chief of William Henry will give as a great chief
should, for such a service. The medal of Magua
will no longer be of tin, but of beaten gold; his horn
will run over with powder; dollars will be as plenty
in his pouch, as pebbles on the shore of Horican; and
the deer will lick his hand, for they will know it to be
vain to fly from before the rifle he will carry! As for
myself, I know not how to exceed the gratitude of the
Scotchman, but Iyes, I will
What will the young chief, who comes from
towards
the sun, give? demanded the Huron,
observing
that Heyward hesitated in his desire to end the
enumeration of benefits with that which might form
the climax of an Indian's wishes.
He will make the fire-water from the islands in
the salt lake, flow before the wigwam of Magua,
swifter
than yon noisy Hudson, until the heart of the Indian
shall be lighter than the feathers of the humming-bird,
and his breath sweeter than the wild honeysuckle.
Le Renard had listened with the deepest silence,
as Heyward slowly proceeded in this subtle speech.
When the young man mentioned the artifice he
supposed
the Indian to have practised on his own nation,
the countenance of the listener was veiled in an
expression
of cautious gravity. At the allusion to the
injury which Duncan affected to believe had driven
the Huron from his native tribe, a gleam of such
ungovernable
ferocity flashed from the other's eyes, as
induced
the adventurous speaker to believe he had struck
the proper chord. And by the time he reached the
part where he so artfully blended the thirst of
vengeance
with the desire of gain, he had, at least,
obtained
a command of the deepest attention of the
savage. The question put by le Renard had been
calm, and with all the dignity of an Indian; but it was
quite apparent, by the thoughtful expression of the
listener's
countenance, that the answer was most
cunningly
devised. The Huron mused a few moments,
and then laying his hand on the rude bandages of his
wounded shoulder, he said, with some energy
Do friends make such marks?
Would `la Longue Carabine' cut one so light on
an enemy?
Do the Delawares crawl upon those they love like
snakes, twisting themselves to strike?
Would `le Gros Serpent' have been heard by the
ears of one he wished to be deaf?
Does the white chief burn his powder in the
faces of his brothers?
Does he ever miss his aim, when seriously bent
to kill? returned Duncan, smiling with well acted
disdain.
Another long and deliberative pause succeeded
these sententious questions and ready replies.
Duncan
saw that the Indian hesitated. In order to
complete
his victory, he was in the act of recommencing
the enumeration of the rewards, when Magua made
an expressive gesture, and said
Enough; le Renard is a wise chief, and what he
does will be seen. Go, and keep the mouth shut.
When Magua speaks, it will be the time to
answer
.
Heyward, perceiving that the eyes of his
companion
were warily fastened on the rest of the band,
fell back immediately, in order to avoid the
appearance
of any suspicious confederacy with their leader.
Magua approached the horses, and affected to be
well pleased with the diligence and ingenuity of his
comrades. He then signed to Heyward to assist the
sisters into their saddles, for he seldom deigned to use
the English tongue, unless urged by some motive of
more than usual moment.
There was no longer any plausible pretext for
further
delay, and Duncan was obliged, however
reluctantly
,
to comply. As he performed this office, he
whispered his reviving hopes in the ears of the
trembling
maidens, who, through dread of encountering the
savage countenances of their captors, seldom raised
their eyes from the ground. The mare of David had
been taken with the followers of the large chief; in
consequence, its owner, as well as Duncan, were
compelled to journey on foot. The latter did not,
however
,
so much regret this circumstance, as it might
enable him to retard the speed of the partyfor he
still turned his longing looks in the direction of fort
Edward
,
in the vain expectation of catching some sound
from that quarter of the forest, which might denote
the approach of speedy succour.
When all were prepared, Magua made the signal
to proceed, advancing in front, to lead the party in
Vol.. I. 14
his own person. Next followed David, who was
gradually coming to a true sense of his condition, as
the effects of the wound became less and less
apparent
.
The sisters rode in his rear, with Heyward at
their side, while the Indians flanked the party, and
brought up the close of the march, with a caution that
seemed never to tire.
In this manner they proceeded in uninterrupted
silence
,
except when Heyward addressed some solitary
word of comfort to the females, or David gave vent
to the moanings of his spirit, in piteous
exclamation
,
which he intended should express the humility of
his resignation. Their direction lay towards the
south, and in a course nearly opposite to the road to
William Henry. Notwithstanding this apparent
adherence
in Magua to the original determination of his
conquerors, Heyward could not believe his tempting
bait was so soon forgotten; and he knew the windings
of an Indian path too well, to suppose that its apparent
course led directly to its object, when artifice was at
all necessary. Mile after mile was, however, passed
through the boundless woods in this painful manner,
without any prospect of a termination to their journey.
Heyward watched the sun, as he darted his meridian
rays through the branches of the trees, and pined for
the moment when the policy of Magua should change
their route to one more favourable to his hopes.
Sometimes he fancied that the wary savage,
despairing
of passing the beleaguering army of Montcalm, in
safety, was holding his way towards a well known
border settlement, where a distinguished officer of the
crown, and a favoured friend of the Six Nations, held
his large possessions, as well as his usual residence.
To be delivered into the hands of Sir William
Johnson
,
was far preferable to being led into the wilds of
Canada; but in order to effect even the former, it
would be necessary to traverse the forest for many
weary leagues, each step of which was carrying him
further from the scene of the war, and, consequently,
from the post, not only of honour, but of duty.
Cora alone remembered the parting injunctions of
the scout, and whenever an opportunity offered, she
stretched forth her arm to bend aside the twigs that
met her hands. But the vigilance of the Indians
rendered
this act of precaution both difficult and
dangerous
.
She was often defeated in her purpose, by
encountering
the dark glances of their watchful eyes,
when it became necessary to feign an alarm she did not
feel, and occupy the limb, by some gesture of feminine
apprehension. Once, and once only, was she
completely
successful; when she broke down the bough of
a large sumach, and, by a sudden thought, let her glove
fall at the same instant. This sign intended for those
that might follow, was observed by one of her
conductors
,
who restored the glove, broke the remaining
branches of the bush in such a manner, that it
appeared
to proceed from the struggling of some beast in
its branches, and then laid his hand on his tomahawk,
with a look so significant, that it put an effectual end
to these stolen memorials of their passage.
As there were horses, to leave the prints of their
footsteps, in both bands of the Indians, this
interruption
cut off any probable hopes of assistance being
conveyed through the means of their trail.
Heyward would have called out twenty times to
their leader, and ventured a remonstrance, had there
been any thing encouraging in the gloomy reserve of
the savage. But Magua, during all this time,
seldom
turned to look at his followers, and never spoke.
With the sun for his only guide, or aided by such blind
marks as are only known to the sagacity of a native,
he held his way along the barrens of pine, through
occasional little fertile vales, across brooks and
rivulets
,
and over undulating hills, with the accuracy of
instinct, and nearly with the directness of a bird.
He never seemed to hesitate. Whether the path was
hardly distinguishable, whether it disappeared, or
whether
it lay beaten and plain before him, made no
sensible
difference in his speed or certainty. It seemed
as though fatigue could not affect him. Whenever
the eyes of the wearied travellers rose from the
decayed leaves over which they trode, his dark
form was to be seen glancing among the stems of the
trees in front, his head immoveably fastened in a
forward
position, with the light plume on its crest,
fluttering in a current of air, made solely by the
swiftness of his own motion.
But all this diligence and speed was not without an
object. After crossing a low vale, through which a
gushing brook meandered, he suddenly rose a hill, so
steep and difficult of ascent, that the sisters were
compelled to alight, in order to follow. When the
summit was gained, they found themselves on a level
spot, but thinly covered with trees, under one of
which Magua had thrown his dark form, as if willing
and ready to seek that rest, which was so much
needed
by the whole party.
CHAPTER XI.
Cursed be my tribe,
If I forgive him.
Shylock
.
The
Indian had selected for this desirable
purpose
,
one of those steep, pyramidal hills, which bear
a strong resemblance to artificial mounds, and which
so frequently occur in the valleys of the American
states. The one in question was high, and
precipitous
;
its top flattened, as usual; but with one of its
sides more than ordinarily irregular. It possessed no
other apparent advantages for a resting place, than
in its elevation and form, which might render defence
easy, and surprise nearly impossible. As Heyward,
however, no longer expected that rescue, which time
and distance now rendered so improbable, he
regarded
these little peculiarities with an eye devoid
of interest, devoting himself entirely to the comfort
and condolence of his feebler companions. The
Narragansets were suffered to browse on the branches
of the trees and shrubs, that were thinly scattered
over the summit of the hill, while the remains of
their provisions were spread under the shade of a
beech, that stretched its horizontal limbs like a vast
canopy above them.
14*
Notwithstanding the swiftness of their flight, one
of the Indians had found an opportunity to strike a
straggling fawn with an arrow, and had borne the
more preferable fragments of the victim, patiently
on his shoulders, to the stopping place. Without
any aid from the science of cookery, he was
immediately
employed, in common with his fellows, in
gorging himself with this digestable sustenance.
Magua
alone sat apart, without participation in the
revolting
meal, and apparently buried in the deepest
thought.
This abstinence, so remarkable in an Indian, at
length attracted the notice of Heyward. The young
man willingly believed that the Huron deliberated on
the most eligible manner to elude the vigilance of his
associates, in order to possess himself of the
promised
bribe. With a view to assist his plans by any
suggestion of his own, and to strengthen the
temptation
,
he left the beech, and straggled, as if without
an object, to the spot where le Renard was seated.
Has not Magua kept the sun in his face long
enough to escape all danger from the Canadians?
he asked, as though no longer doubtful of the good
intelligence established between them; and will
not the chief of William Henry be better pleased to
see his daughters before another night may have
hardened
his heart to their loss, and will make him less
liberal in his reward?
Do the pale faces love their children less in the
morning than at night? asked the Indian, coldly.
By no means, returned Heyward, anxious to
recall his error, if he had made one; the white
man may, and does often, forget the burial place of
his fathers; he sometimes ceases to remember those
he should love, and has promised to cherish; but the
affection of a parent for his child is never permitted
to die.
And is the heart of the white-headed chief soft,
and will he think of the babes that his squaws have
given him? He is hard to his warriors, and his eyes
are made of stone!
He is severe to the idle and wicked, but to the
sober and deserving he is a leader, both just and
humane
.
I have known many fond and tender parents,
but never have I seen a man whose heart was softer
towards his child. You have seen the gray-head in
front of his warriors, Magua, but I have seen his eyes
swimming in water, when he spoke of those children
who are now in your power!
Heyward paused, for he knew not how to construe
the remarkable expression that gleamed across the
swarthy features of the attentive Indian. At first it
seemed as if the remembrance of the promised
reward
grew vivid in his mind, as he listened to the
sources of parental feeling which were to assure its
possession; but as Duncan proceeded, the expression
of joy became so fiercely malignant, that it was
impossible
not to apprehend it proceeded from some
passion even more sinister than avarice.
Go, said the Huron, suppressing the alarming
exhibition in an instant, in a death-like calmness of
countenance; go to the dark-haired daughter, and
say, Magua waits to speak. The father will
remember
what the child promises.
Duncan, who interpreted this speech to express a
wish for some additional pledge that the promised gifts
should not be withheld, slowly and reluctantly
repaired
to the place where the sisters were now resting from
their fatigue, to communicate its purport to Cora.
You understand the nature of an Indian's wishes,
he concluded, as he led her towards the place where
she was expected, and must be prodigal of your
offers of powder and blankets. Ardent spirits are,
however, the most prized by such as he; nor would
it be amiss to add some boon from your own hand,
with that grace you so well know how to practise.
Remember, Cora, that on your presence of mind
and ingenuity, even your life, as well as that of Alice,
may in some measure depend.
Heyward, and yours!
Mine is of little moment; it is already sold to my
king, and is a prize to be seized by any enemy who
may possess the power. I have no father to expect
me, and but few friends to lament a fate, which I have
courted with the unsatiable longings of youth after
distinction. But, hush; we approach the Indian.
Magua, the lady, with whom you wish to speak, is
here.
The Indian rose slowly from his seat, and stood
for near a minute silent and motionless. He then
signed with his hand for Heyward to retire, saying,
coldly
When the Huron talks to the women, his tribe
shut their ears.
Duncan still lingering, as if refusing to comply,
Cora said, with a calm smile
You hear, Heyward, and delicacy at least should
urge you to retire. Go to Alice, and comfort her
with our reviving prospects.
She waited until he had departed, and then
turning
to the native, with all the dignity of her sex, in
her voice and manner, she added: What would le
Renard say to the daughter of Munro?
Listen, said the Indian, laying his hand firmly
upon her arm, as if willing to draw her utmost
attention
to his words; a movement that Cora as firmly,
but quietly repulsed, by extricating the limb from his
graspMagua was born a chief and a warrior
among the red Hurons of the lakes; he saw the suns
of twenty summers make the snows of twenty
winters
run off in the streams, before he saw a pale-face;
and he was happy! Then his Canada fathers came
into the woods, and taught him to drink the
fire-water
,
and he became a rascal. The Hurons drove
him from the graves of his fathers, as they would chase
the hunted buffalo. He ran down the shores of the
lakes, and followed their outlet to the `city of cannon.'
There he hunted and fished, till the people chased
him again through the woods into the arms of his
enemies
.
The chief, who was born a Huron, was at last
a warrior among the Mohawks!
Something like this I had heard before, said
Cora, observing that he paused to suppress those
passions which began to burn with too bright a flame,
as he recalled the recollection of his supposed
injuries
.
Was it the fault of le Renard that his head was
not made of rock? Who gave him the fire-water?
who made him a villain? 'Twas the pale-faces, the
people of your own colour.
And am I answerable that thoughtless and
unprincipled
men exist, whose shades of countenance
may resemble mine? Cora calmly demanded of the
excited savage.
No; Magua is a man, and not a fool; such as
you never open their lips to the burning stream; the
Great Spirit has given you wisdom!
What then have I to do, or say, in the matter of
your misfortunes, not to say of your errors?
Listen, repeated the Indian, resuming his
earnest
attitude; when his English and French fathers
dug up the hatchet, le Renard struck the war-post of
the Mohawks, and went out against his own nation.
The pale-faces have driven the red-skins from their
hunting grounds, and now, when they fight, a white
man leads the way. The old chief of Horican, your
father, was the great captain of our war party. He
said to the Mohawks do this, and do that, and he was
minded. He made a law, that if an Indian swallowed
the fire-water, and came into the cloth wigwams of
his warriors, it should not be forgotten. Magua
foolishly opened his mouth, and the hot liquor led him
into the cabin of Munro. What did the gray-head?
let his daughter say.
He forgot not his words, and did justice, by
punishing
the offender, said the undaunted maiden.
Justice! repeated the Indian, casting an oblique
glance of the most ferocious expression at her
unyielding
countenance; is it justice to make evil,
and then punish for it! Magua was not himself; it
was the fire-water that spoke and acted for him! but
Munro did not believe it. The Huron chief was
tied up before all the pale-faced warriors, and
whipped
with sticks, like a dog.
Cora remained silent, for she knew not how to
palliate this imprudent severity on the part of her
father, in a manner to suit the comprehension of an
Indian.
See! continued Magua, tearing aside the slight
calico that very imperfectly concealed his painted
breast; here are scars given by knives and
bullets
of
these a warrior may boast before his nation;
but the gray-head has left marks on the back of the
Huron chief, that he must hide, like a squaw, under
this painted cloth of the whites.
I had thought, resumed Cora, that an Indian
warrior was patient, and that his spirit felt not, and
knew not, the pain his body suffered?
When the Chippewas tied Magua to the stake, and
cut this gash, said the other, laying his finger proudly
on a deep scar on his bosom, the Huron laughed
in their faces, and told them, women struck so light!
His spirit was then in the clouds! But when he felt
the blows of Munro, his spirit lay under the birch.
The spirit of a Huron is never drunk; it remembers
for ever!
But it may be appeased. If my father has done
you this injustice, show him how an Indian can
forgive
an injury, and take back his daughters. You
have heard from Major Heyward
Magua shook his head, forbidding the repetition of
offers he so much despised.
What would you have, continued Cora, after a
most painful pause, while the conviction forced itself
on her mind, that the too sanguine and generous
Duncan
had been cruelly deceived by the cunning of the
savage.
What a Huron lovesgood for good; bad for
bad!
You would then revenge the injury inflicted by
Munro, on his helpless daughters. Would it not be
more like a man to go before his face, and take the
satisfaction of a warrior?
The arms of the pale-faces are long, and their
knives sharp! returned the savage, with a malignant
laugh; why should le Renard go among the
muskets
of his warriors, when he holds the spirit of the
gray-head in his hand?
Name your intention, Magua, said Cora,
struggling
with herself to speak with steady calmness. Is
it to lead us prisoners to the woods, or do you
contemplate
even some greater evil? Is there no reward, no
means of palliating the injury, and of softening your
heart? At least, release my gentle sister, and pour
out all your malice on me. Purchase wealth by her
safety, and satisfy your revenge with a single victim.
The loss of both his daughters might bring the aged
man to his grave, and where would then be the
satisfaction
of le Renard?
Listen, said the Indian again. The light
eyes can go back to the Horican, and tell the old chief
what has been done, if the dark-haired woman will
swear, by the Great Spirit of her fathers, to tell no
lie.
What must I promise? demanded Cora, still
maintaining a secret ascendancy over the fierce
passions
of the native, by the collected and feminine
dignity of her presence.
When Magua left his people, his wife was given
to another chief; he has now made friends with the
Hurons, and will go back to the graves of his tribe,
on the shores of the great lake. Let the daughter of
the English chief follow, and live in his wigwam for
ever.
However revolting a proposal of such a
character
might prove to Cora, she retained,
notwithstanding
her powerful disgust, sufficient self-command
to reply, without betraying the least weakness.
And what pleasure would Magua find in sharing
his cabin with a wife he did not love; one who would
be of a nation and colour different from his own? It
would be better to take the gold of Munro, and
buy the heart of some Huron maid with his gifts and
generosity.
The Indian made no reply for near a minute, but
bent his fierce looks on the countenance of Cora, in
such wavering glances, that her eyes sunk with shame,
under an impression, that, for the first time, they had
encountered an expression that no chaste female
might endure. While she was shrinking within
herself
,
in dread of having her ears wounded by some
proposal still more shocking than the last, the voice
of Magua answered, in its tones of deepest
malignancy
When the blows scorched the back of the Huron,
he would know where to find a woman to feel the
smart. The daughter of Munro would draw his water,
Vol. I. 15
hoe his corn, and cook his venison. The body of the
gray-head would sleep among his cannon, but his
heart would lie within reach of the knife of le
Subtil
.
Monster! well dost thou deserve thy treacherous
name! cried Cora, in an ungovernable burst of
filial indignation. None but a fiend could meditate
such a vengeance! But thou overratest thy power!
You shall find it is, in truth, the heart of Munro you
hold, and that it will defy your utmost malice!
The Indian answered this bold defiance by a
ghastly
smile, that showed an unaltered purpose, while he
motioned her away, as if to close their conference,
for ever. Cora, already regretting her precipitation,
was obliged to comply; for Magua instantly left the
spot, and approached his gluttonous comrades.
Heyward flew to the side of the agitated maiden, and
demanded the result of a dialogue, that he had
watched at a distance with so much interest. But
unwilling to alarm the fears of Alice, she evaded a
direct reply, betraying only by her countenance her
utter want of success, and keeping her anxious looks
fastened on the slightest movements of their captors.
To the reiterated and earnest questions of her sister,
concerning their probable destination, she made no
other answer, than by pointing towards the dark
groupe, with an agitation she could not control, and
murmuring, as she folded Alice to her bosom
There, there; read our fortunes in their faces;
we shall see! we shall see!
The action, and the choked utterance of Cora,
spoke more impressively than any words, and
quickly
drew the attention of her companions on that spot,
where her own was riveted with an intenseness,
that nothing but the importance of the stake could
create.
When Magua reached the cluster of lolling savages,
who, gorged with their disgusting meal, lay stretched
on the earth, in a sort of brutal indulgence, he
commenced
speaking with the utmost dignity of an Indian
chief. The first syllables he uttered, had the effect
to cause his listeners to raise themselves in attitudes
of respectful attention. As the Huron used his
native
language, the prisoners, notwithstanding the
caution of the natives had kept them within the
swing of their tomahawks, could only conjecture the
substance of his harangue, from the nature of those
significant gestures with which an Indian always
illustrates
his eloquence.
At first, the language, as well as the action of
Magua
,
appeared calm and deliberative. When he had
succeeded in sufficiently awakening the attention of his
comrades, Heyward fancied, by his pointing so
frequently
toward the direction of the great lakes, that he
spoke of the land of their fathers, and of their distant
tribe. Frequent indications of applause escaped the
listeners, who, as they uttered the expressive hugh!
looked at each other in open commendation of the
speaker. Le Renard was too skilful to neglect his
advantage. He now spoke of the long and painful
route by which they had left those spacious hunting
grounds and happy villages, to come and battle
against the enemies of their Canadian fathers. He
enumerated the warriors of the party; their several
merits; their frequent services to the nation; their
wounds, and the number of the scalps they had taken.
Whenever he alluded to any present, (and the subtle
Indian neglected none,) the dark countenance of the
flattered individual gleamed with exultation, nor did
he even hesitate to assert the truth of the words, by
gestures
of applause and confirmation. Then the voice
of the speaker fell, and lost the loud, animated tones
of triumph with which he had enumerated their deeds
of success and victory. He described the cataract
of Glenn's; the impregnable position of its rocky
island, with its caverns, and its numerous encircling
rapids and whirlpools; he named the name of `la
Longue Carabine,' and paused until the forest beneath
them had sent up the last echo of a loud and long
yell, with which the hated appellation was received.
He pointed toward the youthful military captive, and
described the death of a favourite warrior, who had
been precipitated into the deep ravine by his hand.
He not only mentioned the fate of him who, hanging
between heaven and earth, had presented such a
spectacle of horror to the whole band, but he acted
anew the terrors of his situation, his resolution and
his death, on the branches of a sapling; and, finally,
he rapidly recounted the manner in which each
of their friends had fallen, never failing to touch upon
their courage, and their most acknowledged virtues.
When this recital of events was ended, his voice once
more changed, and became plaintive, and even
musical
,
in its low, soft, guttural sounds. He now spoke
of the wives and children of the slain; their
destitution
;
their misery, both physical and moral; their
distance; and, at last, of their unavenged wrongs.
Then suddenly lifting his voice to a pitch of terrific
energy, he concluded, by demanding
Are the Hurons dogs, to bear this? Who shall
say to the wife of Menowgua, that the fishes have his
scalp, and that his nation have not taken revenge!
Who will dare meet the mother of Wassawattimie, that
scornful woman, with his hands clean! What shall
be said to the old men, when they ask us for scalps,
and we have not a hair from a white head to give
them! The women will point their fingers at us.
There is a dark spot on the names of the Hurons, and
it must be hid in blood!
His voice was no longer audible in the burst of
rage, which now broke into the air, as if the wood,
instead
of containing so small a band, was filled with their
nation. During the foregoing address, the progress of
the speaker was too plainly read by those most
interested
in his success, through the medium of the
countenances of the men he addressed. They had
answered his melancholy and mourning, by sympathy
and sorrow; his assertions, by gestures of
confirmation
;
and his boastings, with the exultation of
savages
.
When he spoke of courage, their looks were
firm and responsive; when he alluded to their
injuries
,
their eyes kindled with fury; when he
mentioned
the taunts of their women, they dropped
their heads in shame; but when he pointed out
their means of vengeance, he struck a chord which
never failed to thrill in the breast of an Indian.
With the first intimation that it was within their
reach, the whole band sprang upon their feet, as one
15*
man, and giving utterance to their rage for a single
instant, in the most frantic cries, they rushed upon
their prisoners in a body, with drawn knives and
uplifted
tomahawks. Heyward threw himself between
the sisters and their enemies, the foremost of whom he
grappled with a desperate strength that for a moment
checked his violence. This unexpected resistance
gave Magua time to interpose, and with rapid
enunciation
and animated gestures, he drew the attention of the
band again to himself. In that language he knew so well
how to assume, he diverted his comrades from their
instant purpose, and invited them to prolong the
misery
of their victims. His proposal was received
with acclamations, and executed with the swiftness of
thought.
Two powerful warriors cast themselves together
on Heyward, while another was occupied in
securing
the less active singing-master. Neither of the
captives, however, submitted without a desperate
though fruitless struggle. Even David hurled his
assailant
to the earth; nor was Heyward secured,
until the victory over his companion enabled the
Indians
to direct their united force to that object. He
was then bound and fastened to the body of the
sapling
,
on whose branches Magua had acted the
pantomime
of the falling Huron. When the young soldier
regained his recollection, he had the painful certainty
before his eyes, that a common fate was intended for
the whole party. On his right was Cora, in a
durance
similar to his own, pale and agitated, but with
an eye, whose steady look still read the proceedings of
their enemies. On his left, the withes which bound
her to a pine, performed that office for Alice which
her trembling limbs refused, and alone kept her
lovely but fragile form from sinking to the ground.
Her hands were clasped before her in prayer, but
instead of looking upward to that power which alone
could rescue them, her unconscious looks wandered
to the countenance of Duncan, with a species of
infantile
dependency. David had contended; and the
novelty of the circumstance held him silent, in
deliberation
,
on the propriety of the unusual occurrence.
The vengeance of the Hurons had now taken a new
direction, and they prepared to execute it, with all
that barbarous ingenuity, with which they were
familiarized
by the practice of centuries. Some
sought knots, to raise the blazing pile; one was riving
the splinters of pine, in order to pierce the flesh of
their captives with the burning fragments; and others
bent the tops of two saplings to the earth, in order to
suspend Heyward by the arms between the recoiling
branches. But the vengeance of Magua sought a
deeper and a more malignant enjoyment.
While the less refined monsters of the band
prepared
,
before the eyes of those who were to suffer,
these well known and vulgar means of torture, he
approached
Cora, and pointed out, with the most
malign
expression of countenance, the speedy fate that
awaited her
Ha! he added, what says the daughter of
Munro? Her head is too good to find a pillow in the
wigwam of le Renard; will she like it better when
it rolls about this hill, a plaything for the wolves?
Her bosom cannot nurse the children of a Huron;
she will see it spit upon by Indians!
What means the monster! demanded the
astonished
Heyward.
Nothing! was the firm but mild reply. He
is a savage, a barbarous and ignorant savage, and
knows not what he does. Let us find leisure, with
our dying breath, to ask for him penitence and
pardon
.
Pardon! echoed the fierce Huron, mistaking,
in his anger, the meaning of her words; the
memory
of an Indian is longer than the arm of the
palefaces
;
his mercy shorter than their justice! Say;
shall I send the yellow-hair to her father, and will you
follow Magua to the great lakes, to carry his water,
and feed him with corn?
Cora beckoned him away, with an emotion of
disgust
she could not control.
Leave me, she said, with a solemnity that for
a moment checked the barbarity of the Indian; you
mingle bitterness in my prayers, and stand between
me and my God!
The slight impression produced on the savage was,
however, soon forgotten, and he continued pointing,
with taunting irony, towards Alice.
Look! the child weeps! She is young to die!
Send her to Munro, to comb his gray hairs, and keep
the life in the heart of the old man.
Cora could not resist the desire to look upon her
youthful sister, in whose eyes she met an imploring
glance, that betrayed the longings of nature.
What says he, dearest Cora? asked the
trembling
voice of Alice. Did he speak of sending me
to our father?
For many moments the elder sister looked upon
the younger, with a countenance that wavered with
powerful and contending emotions. At length she
spoke, though her tones had lost their rich and calm
fulness, in an expression of tenderness, that seemed
maternal.
Alice, she said, the Huron offers us both
lifenay, more than both; he offers to restore
Duncan
our
invaluable Duncan, as well as you, to our
friendsto our fatherto our heart-stricken, childless
father, if I will bow down this rebellious, stubborn
pride of mine, and consent
Her voice became choked, and clasping her hand,
she looked upward, as if seeking, in her agony,
intelligence
from a wisdom that was infinite.
Say on, cried Alice; to what, dearest Cora?
Oh! that the proffer were made to me! to save you,
to cheer our aged father! to restore Duncan, how
cheerfully could I die!
Die! repeated Cora, with a calmer and a
firmer
voice, that were easy! Perhaps the alternative
may not be less so. He would have me, she
continued
,
her accents sinking under a deep
consciousness
of the degradation of the proposal, follow him
to the wilderness; to go to the habitations of the
Hurons; to remain there: in short, to become his
wife! Speak then, Alice; child of my affections!
sister of my love! And you too, Major Heyward,
aid my weak reason with your counsel. Is life to be
purchased by such a sacrifice? Will you, Alice,
receive
it at my hands, at such a price? And
you,
Duncan; guide me; control me between you; for I
am wholly yours.
Would I! echoed the indignant and astonished
youth. Cora! Cora! you jest with our misery!
Name not the horrid alternative again; the thought
itself is worse than a thousand deaths.
That such would be
your
answer, I well knew!
exclaimed Cora, her cheeks flushing, and her dark
eyes once more sparkling with the glow of the
lingering
but momentary emotions of a woman. What
says my Alice? for her will I submit without another
murmur.
Although both Heyward and Cora listened with
painful suspense and the deepest attention, no sounds
were heard in reply. It appeared as if the delicate
and sensitive form of Alice had shrunk into itself, as
she listened to this proposal. Her arms had fallen
lengthwise before her, with the fingers moving in
slight convulsions; her head dropped upon her
bosom
,
and her whole person seemed suspended against
the tree, looking like some beautiful emblem of the
wounded delicacy of her sex, devoid of animation, and
yet keenly conscious. In a few moments, however,
her head began to move slowly, in a sign of deep,
unconquerable
disapprobation, and by the time the flush
of maiden pride had diffused itself over her fine
features
,
and her eye had lighted with the feelings which
oppressed her, she found strength to murmur
No, no, no; better that we should die, as we have
lived, together!
Then die! shouted Magua, hurling his
tomahawk
with violence at the unresisting speaker, and
gnashing his teeth with a rage that could no longer
be bridled, at this sudden exhibition of firmness in
the one he believed the weakest of the party. The axe
cleaved the air in front of Heyward, and cutting some
of the flowing ringlets of Alice, buried itself, and
quivered
in the tree above her head. The sight
maddened
Duncan to desperation. Collecting all his
energies in one effort, he snapped the twigs which
bound him, and rushed upon another savage, who
was preparing, with loud yells, and a more
deliberate
aim, to repeat the blow. They encountered
grappled, and fell to the earth together. The naked
body of his antagonist, afforded Heyward no means of
holding his adversary, who glided from his grasp, and
rose again with one knee on his chest, pressing him
down with the weight of a giant. Duncan already saw
the knife gleaming in the air, when a whistling sound
swept past him, and was rather accompanied, than
followed
,
by the sharp crack of a rifle. He felt his breast
relieved from the load it had endured; he saw the
savage
expression of his adversary's countenance change
to a look of vacant wildness, and then the Indian fell
prostrate and dead, on the faded leaves by his side.
CHAPTER XII.
Clo
.
I am gone, sir,
And anon, sir,
I'll be with you again.
Twelfth Night
.
The
Hurons stood aghast at this sudden visitation
of death on one of their band. But, as they regarded
the fatal accuracy of an aim, which had dared to
immolate
an enemy, at so much hazard to a friend, the
name of la Longue Carabine burst simultaneously
from every lip, and was succeeded by a wild and a sort
of plaintive howl. The cry was answered by a loud
shout from a little thicket, where the incautious party
had piled their arms; and, at the next moment,
Hawk-eye
,
too eager to load the rifle he had regained, was
seen advancing upon them, brandishing the clubbed
weapon, and cutting the air with wide and powerful
sweeps. Bold and rapid as was the progress of the
scout, it was exceeded by that of a light and vigorous
form, which bounding past him, leaped, with
incredible
activity and daring, into the very centre of the
Hurons, where it stood, whirling a tomahawk, and
flourishing a glittering knife, with fearful menaces, in
front of Cora. Quicker than the thoughts could
follow
these unexpected and audacious movements, an
image, armed in the emblematic panoply of death,
stole, with the imaginary glidings of a spectre, before
their eyes, and assumed a threatening attitude at the
other's side. The savage tormentors recoiled before
these warlike intruders, and uttered, as they appeared,
in such quick succession, the often repeated and
peculiar
exclamation of surprise, followed by the well
known and dreaded appellations of
Le Cerf Agile! le Gros Serpent!
But the wary and vigilant leader of the Hurons,
was not so easily disconcerted. Casting his keen eyes
around the little plain, he comprehended the nature
of the assault, at a glance, and encouraging his
followers
by his voice, as well as by his example, he
unsheathed
his long and dangerous knife, and rushed,
with a loud whoop, upon the expecting
Chingachgook
.
It was the signal for a general combat.
Neither
party had fire-arms, and the contest was to be
decided
in the deadliest manner; hand to hand, with
weapons of offence, and none of defence.
Uncas answered the whoop, and leaping on an
enemy, with a single, well-directed blow of his
tomahawk
,
cleft him to the brain. Heyward tore the
weapon of Magua from the sapling, and rushed
eagerly
towards the fray. As the combatants were now
equal in number, each singled an opponent from the
adverse band. The rush and blows passed with the
fury of a whirlwind, and the swiftness of lightning.
Hawk-eye soon got another enemy within reach of his
arm, and with one sweep of his formidable weapon,
he beat down the slight and inartificial defences of
his antagonist, crushing him to the earth with the
weight of his blow. Heyward ventured to hurl the
Vol. I. 16
tomahawk he had seized, too ardent to await the
moment
of closing. It struck the Indian he had
selected
on the forehead, and checked for an instant his
onward
rush. Encouraged by this slight advantage, the
impetuous young man continued his onset, and sprang
upon his enemy with naked hands. A single instant
was sufficient to assure him of the rashness of the
measure, for he immediately found himself fully
engaged
,
with all his activity and courage, in
endeavouring
to ward the desperate thrusts made with
the knife of the Huron. Unable longer to foil
an enemy so alert and vigilant, he threw his arms
about him, and succeeded in pinning the limbs of the
other to his side, with an iron grasp, but one that
was far too exhausting to himself to continue long.
In this extremity he heard a voice near him,
shouting
Extarminate the varlets! no quarter to an
accursed
Mingo!
At the next moment, the breech of Hawk-eye's
rifle fell on the naked head of his adversary, whose
muscles appeared to wither under the shock, as he
sunk from the arms of Duncan, flexible and
motionless
.
When Uncas had brained his first antagonist, he
turned, like a hungry lion, to seek another. The
fifth and only Huron disengaged at the first onset, had
paused a moment, and then seeing that all around
him were employed in the deadly strife, he had
sought, with hellish vengeance, to complete the
baffled
work of revenge. Raising a shout of triumph,
he had sprung towards the defenceless Cora, sending
his keen axe, as the dreadful precursor of his approach,
The tomahawk grazed her shoulder, and cutting the
withes which bound her to the tree, left the maiden
at liberty to fly. She eluded the grasp of the savage,
and reckless of her own safety, threw herself on the
bosom of Alice, striving, with convulsed and
ill-directed
fingers, to tear asunder the twigs which
confined
the person of her sister. Any other than a
monster would have relented at such an act of
generous
devotion to the best and purest affection; but the
breast of the Huron was a stranger to any sympathy
in the moments of his fury. Seizing Cora by the rich
tresses which fell in glossy confusion about her form,
he tore her from her frantic hold, and bowed her
down with brutal violence to her knees. The savage
drew the flowing curls through his hand, and raising
them on high with an outstretched arm, he passed
the knife around the exquisitely moulded head of his
victim, with a taunting and exulting laugh. But
he purchased this moment of fierce gratification,
with the loss of the fatal opportunity. It was just
then the sight caught the eye of Uncas. Bounding
from his footsteps, he appeared for an instant
darting
through the air, and descending in a ball he fell
on the chest of his enemy, driving him for many
yards from the spot, headlong and prostrate. The
violence of the exertion cast the young Mohican at
his side. They arose together, fought, and bled, each
in his turn. But the conflict was soon decided; the
tomahawk of Heyward, and the rifle of Hawk-eye,
descending on the skull of the Huron, at the same
moment that the knife of Uncas reached his heart.
The battle was now entirely terminated, with the
exception of the protracted struggle between le
Renard Subtil and le Gros Serpent. Well did
these barbarous warriors prove that they deserved
those significant names, which had been bestowed for
deeds in former wars. When they engaged, some
little time was lost in eluding the quick and
vigorous
thrusts which had been aimed at their several
lives. Suddenly darting on each other, they closed,
and came to the earth, twisted together, like twining
serpents, in pliant and subtle folds. At the moment
when the victors found themselves unoccupied, the
spot where these experienced and desperate
combatants
lay, could only be distinguished by a cloud of
dust and leaves, which moved from the centre of the
little plain towards its boundary, as if raised by the
passage of a whirlwind. Urged by the different
motives
of filial affection, friendship, and gratitude,
Heyward and his companions rushed with one accord
to the place, encircling the little canopy which hung
above the warriors. In vain did Uncas dart around
the cloud, with a wish to strike his knife into the heart
of his father's foe; the threatening rifle of Hawk-eye
was raised and suspended in vain; while Duncan
endeavoured to seize the limbs of the Huron, with
hands that appeared to have lost their power.
Covered
,
as they were, with dust and blood, the swift
and subtle evolutions of the combatants seemed to
incorporate their bodies into one. The death-like
looking figure of the Mohican, and the dark form of
the Huron, gleamed before their eyes in such quick
and confused succession, that the friends of the former
knew not where nor when to plant their succouring
blows. It is true, there were short and fleeting
moments
,
when the fiery eyes of Magua were seen
glittering
,
like the fabled organs of the basilisk, through
the dusty wreath by which he was enveloped, and he
read by those short and deadly glances, the fate of the
combat in the hated countenances and in the presence
of his enemies; ere, however, any hostile hand
could descend on his devoted head, its place was
filled by the scowling visage of Chingachgook. In
this manner, the scene of the combat was removed
from the centre of the little plain to its verge. The
Mohican now found an opportunity to make a
powerful
thrust with his knife; Magua suddenly relinquished
his grasp, and fell backward, without motion, and,
seemingly, without life. His adversary leaped on
his feet, making the arches of the forest ring with the
sounds of his shout of triumph.
Well done for the Delawares! victory to the
Mohican! cried Hawk-eye, once more elevating
the butt of the long and fatal rifle; a finishing blow
from a man without a cross, will never tell against his
honour, nor rob him of his right to the scalp!
But, at the very moment when the dangerous
weapon
was in the act of descending, the subtle Huron
rolled swiftly from beneath the danger, over the edge
of the precipice, and falling on his feet, was seen
leaping, with a single bound, into the centre of a
thicket of low bushes, which clung along its sides.
The Delawares, who had believed their enemy dead,
uttered their exclamation of surprise, and were
following
with speed and clamour, like hounds in open view
16*
of the deer, when a shrill and peculiar cry from the
scout, instantly changed their purpose, and recalled
them to the summit of the hill.
'Twas like himself! cried the inveterate
forester
,
whose prejudices contributed so largely to veil
his natural sense of justice in all matters which
concerned
the Mingoes; a lying and deceitful varlet
as he is! An honest Delaware now, being fairly
vanquished
,
would have laid still, and been knocked on
the head, but these knavish Maquas cling to life like
so many cats-o'-the-mountain. Let him golet him
go; 'tis but one man, and he without either rifle or
bow, many a long mile from his French commerades;
and, like a rattler that has lost his fangs, he can do
no farther mischief, until such time as he, and we
too, may leave the prints of our moccasins over a
long reach of sandy plain. See, Uncas, he added,
in Delaware, your father is flying the scalps
already
!
It may be well to go round and feel the
vagabonds that are left, or we may have another of
them loping through the woods, and screeching like
any jay that has been winged!
So saying, the honest, but implacable scout, made
the circuit of the dead, into whose senseless bosoms
he thrust his long knife, with as much coolness, as
though they had been so many brute carcasses. He
had, however, been anticipated by the elder
Mohican
,
who had already torn the emblems of victory
from the unresisting heads of the slain.
But Uncas, denying his habits, we had almost said
his nature, flew with instinctive delicacy,
accomnied
by Heyward to the assistance of the sisters, and
quickly releasing Alice, placed her in the open
arms of Cora. We shall not attempt to describe the
gratitude to the Almighty Disposer of events which
glowed in the bosoms of the lovely maidens, who were
thus unexpectedly restored to life, and to each other.
Their thanksgivings were deep and silent; the
offerings
of their gentle spirits, burning brightest and
purest
on the secret altars of their hearts; and their
renovated
and more earthly feelings exhibiting themselves
in long and fervent, though speechless caresses. As
Alice arose from her knees, where she had sunken, by
the side of Cora, she threw herself on the bosom of
her sister, and sobbed aloud the name of their aged
father, while her soft, dove-like eyes, sparkled with
the rays of revived hope, the intelligence with which
they beamed partaking more of the ethereal than of
any expression which might belong to human
infirmity
.
We are saved! we are saved! she murmured;
to return to the arms of our dear, dear father, and
his heart will not be broken with grief! And you
too, Cora, my sister; my more than sister, my
mother; you too are spared! and Duncan, she
added, looking round upon the youth, with a smile of
ineffable purity and innocence, even our own brave
and noble Duncan has escaped without a hurt!
To these ardent and nearly incoherent words,
Cora made no other answer than by straining the
youthful speaker to her heart, as she bent over her,
in melting tenderness. The manhood of Heyward
felt no shame, in dropping tears over this spectacle
of affectionate rapture; and Uncas stood, fresh and
blood-stained from the combat, a calm, and,
apparently
,
an unmoved looker-on, it is true, but with
eyes that had already lost their fierceness, and were
beaming with a sympathy, that elevated him far above
the intelligence, and advanced him probably
centuries
before the practices of his nation.
During this display of emotions so natural in their
situation, Hawk-eye, whose vigilant distrust had
satisfied
itself that the Hurons, who disfigured the heavenly
scene, no longer possessed the power to interrupt its
harmony, approached David, and liberated him from
the bonds he had, until that moment, endured with
the most exemplary patience.
There, exclaimed the scout, casting the last
withe behind him, you are once more master of
your own limbs, though you seem not to use them with
much greater judgment than that, in which they were
first fashioned. If advice from one who is not older
than yourself, but who, having lived most of his time
in the wilderness, may be said to have experience
beyond
his years, will give no offence, you are welcome
to my thoughts; and these are, to part with the little
tooting instrument in your jacket to the first fool you
meet with, and buy some useful we'pon with the
money, if it be only the barrel of a horseman's
pistol
.
By industry and care, you might thus come to
some prefarment; for by this time, I should think,
your eyes would plainly tell you, that a carrion crow
is a better bird than a mocking thresher. The one
will, at least, remove foul sights from before the face
of man, while the other is only good to brew
disturbances
in the woods, by cheating the ears of all that
hear them.
Arms and the clarion for the battle, but the song
of thanksgiving to the victory! answered the
liberated
David. Friend, he added, thrusting forth his
lean, delicate hand, toward Hawk-eye, in kindness,
while his eyes twinkled and grew moist, I thank thee
that the hairs of my head still grow where they were
first rooted by Providence; for, though those of other
men may be more glossy and curling, I have ever found
mine own comfortable, and well suited to the brain
they shelter. That I did not join myself to the
battle
,
was less owing to disinclination, than to the bonds
of the heathen. Valiant and skilful hast thou proved
thyself in the conflict, and I hereby thank thee, before
proceeding to discharge other and more important
duties, because thou hast proved thyself well worthy
of a Christian's praise!
The thing is but a trifle, and what you may often
see, if you tarry long among us, returned the scout, a
good deal softened in his feelings toward the man of
song, by this unequivocal expression of his gratitude.
I have got back my old companion, `kill-deer,'
he added, striking his hand on the breech of his rifle,
and that in itself is a victory. These Iroquois are
cunning, but they outwitted themselves when they
placed all their fire-arms out of reach; and had
Uncas
,
or his father, been gifted with only their common
Indian patience, we should have come in upon the
knaves with three bullets instead of one, and that
would have made a finish of the whole pack; you
lopeing
varlet, as well as his commerades. But 'twas all
fore-ordered, and for the best!
Thou sayest well, returned David, and hast
caught the true spirit of christianity. He that is to
be saved will be saved, and he that is predestined to
be damned will be damned! This is the doctrine of
truth, and most consoling and refreshing it is to the
true believer.
The scout, who by this time was seated,
examining
into the state of his rifle with a species of
parental
assiduity, now looked up at the other in a
displeasure
that he did not affect to conceal, roughly
interrupting
his further speech.
Doctrine, or no doctrine, said the sturdy
woodsman
,
'tis the belief of knaves, and the curse of an
honest man! I can credit that yonder Huron was
to fall by my hand, for with my own eyes have I seen
it; but nothing short of being a witness, will cause
me to think he has met with any reward, or that
Chingachgook
,
there, will be condemned at the final day.
You have no warranty for such an audacious
doctrine, nor any covenant to support it, cried the
excited David, who was deeply tinctured with the
subtle distinctions, which, in his time, and more
especially
in his province, had been drawn around the
beautiful simplicity of revelation, by endeavouring to
penetrate the awful mystery of the divine nature,
supplying faith by self-sufficiency, and by
consequence
,
involving those who reasoned from such human
dogmas in absurdities and doubt; your temple is
reared
on the sands, and the first tempest will wash away
its foundation. I demand your authorities for such an
uncharitable assertion; (like other advocates of a
system
,
David was not always accurate in his use of
terms.) Name chapter and verse; in which of the
holy books do you find language to support you?
Book! repeated Hawk-eye, with singular and
ill-concealed disdain; do you take me for a
whimpering
boy, at the apron string of one of your old
gals; and this good rifle on my knee for the feather of
a goose's wing, my ox's horn for a bottle of ink, and
my leathern pouch for a cross-barred handkercher of
yesterday's dinner! Book! what have such as I,
who am a warrior of the wilderness, though a man
without a cross, to do with books! I never read but
in one, and the words that are written there are too
simple and too plain to need much schooling; though
I may boast that of forty long and hard working
years.
What call you the volume? said David,
misconceiving
the other's meaning.
'Tis open before your eyes, returned the scout;
and he who owns it is not a niggard of its use. I have
heard it said, that there are men who read in books,
to convince themselves there is a God! I know
not but man may so deform his works in the
settlements
,
as to leave that which is so clear in the
wilderness
,
a matter of doubt among traders and priests.
If any such there be, and he will follow me from sun
to sun, through the windings of the forest, he shall
see enough to teach him that he is a fool, and that
the greatest of his folly lies in striving to rise to the
level of one he can never equal, be it in goodness, or
be it in power.
The instant David discovered that he battled with
a disputant who imbibed his faith from the lights of
nature, eschewing all subtleties of doctrine, he
willingly
abandoned a controversy, from which he
believed
neither profit nor credit were to be derived.
While the scout was speaking, he had also seated
himself
,
and producing the ready little volume, and the
iron-rimmed spectacles, he prepared to discharge a
duty, which nothing but the unexpected assault he had
received in his orthodoxy, could have so long
suspended
.
He was, in truth, a minstrel of the western
continent
,
of a much later day, certainly, than those gifted
bards, who formerly sung the profane renown of baron
and prince, but after the spirit of his own age and
country
;
and he was now prepared to exercise the cunning
of his craft, in celebration of, or rather in thanksgiving
for, the recent victory. He waited patiently for
Hawk-eye
to cease, then lifting his eyes, together with his
voice, he said, aloud
I invite you, friends, to join in praise for this
signal
deliverance from the hands of barbarians and
infidels
,
to the comfortable and solemn tones of the
tune, called `Northampton.'
He next named the page and verse where the
gifted
rhymes he had selected were to be found, and
applied the pitch-pipe to his lips, with the
customary
and decent gravity, that he had been wont to
use in the temple. This time he was, however,
without any accompaniment, for the sisters were just
then pouring out those tender effusions of affection,
which have been already alluded to. Nothing
deterred
by the smallness of his audience, which, in truth,
consisted only of the discontented scout, he raised his
voice, commencing and ending the sacred song,
without
accident or interruption of any kind.
Hawk-eye listened, while he coolly adjusted his flint
and reloaded his rifle, but the sounds wanting the
extraneous
assistance of scene and sympathy, failed to
awaken his slumbering emotions. Never minstrel, or
by whatever more suitable name David should be
known, drew upon his talents in the presence of
more insensible auditors; though considering the
singleness
and sincerity of his motive, it is probable that
no bard of profane song ever uttered notes that
ascended
so near to that throne, where all homage and
praise is most due. The scout soon shook his head,
and muttering some unintelligible words, among
which Throat and Iroquois, were alone
audible
,
he walked away, to collect and to examine into the
state of the captured arsenal of the Hurons. In this
office he was now joined by Chingachgook, who found
his own, as well as the rifle of his son, among the arms.
Even Heyward and David were furnished with
weapons
,
nor was ammunition wanting to render them
all effectual.
When the foresters had made their selection, and
distributed their prizes, the scout announced, openly,
that the hour had arrived when it was necessary to
move. By this time the song of Gamut had ceased,
and the sisters had learned to still the exhibition of
their emotions. Aided by Duncan and the younger
Mohican, the two latter descended the precipitous
sides of that hill which they had so lately ascended,
Vol. I. 17
under such very different auspices, and whose
summit
had so nearly proved the scene of their horrible
massacre. At the foot, they found their
Narragansets
browsing the herbage of the bushes, and having
mounted, they followed the movements of a guide,
who, in the most deadly straits, had so often proved
himself their friend. Their journey was, however,
short. Hawk-eye, leaving the blind path that the
Hurons had followed, turned short to his right, and
entering the thicket, he crossed a babbling brook,
and halted in a narrow dell, under the shade of a few
water elms. Their distance from the base of the fatal
hill was but a few rods, and the steeds had been
serviceable
to the maidens only in crossing the shallow
stream.
The scout and the Indians appeared to be familiar
with the sequestered place where they now were;
for, leaning their rifles against the trees, they
commenced
throwing aside the dried leaves, and
opening
the blue clay, out of which a clear and sparkling
spring of bright, glancing water, quickly bubbled.
The white man then looked about him, as though
seeking for some object, which was not to be found
as readily as he expected
Them careless imps, the Mohawks, with their
Tuscarora and Onondaga brethren, have been here
slaking their thirst, he muttered, and the
vagabonds
have thrown away the gourd! This is the
way with benefits, when they are bestowed on such
disremembering hounds! Here has the Lord laid his
hand, in the midst of the howling wilderness, for their
good, and raised a fountain of water from the bowels
of the 'arth, that might laugh at the richest shop of
apothecary's ware in all the colonies; and see! the
knaves have trodden in the clay, and deformed the
cleanliness of the place, as though they were brute
beasts, instead of human men!
Uncas silently extended towards him the desired
gourd, which the spleen of Hawk-eye had hitherto
prevented him from observing, suspended, with
sufficient
care, on a branch of an elm. Filling it with
water, he retired a short distance, to a place where
the ground was more firm and dry; here he coolly
seated himself, and after taking a long, and,
apparently
,
a grateful draught, he commenced a very
strict examination of the fragments of food left by the
Hurons, which had hung in a wallet on his arm.
Thank you, lad, he continued, returning the
empty gourd to Uncas; now we will see how
these rampaging Hurons lived, when outlying in
ambushments. Look at this! The varlets know
the better pieces of the deer, and one would think
they might carve and roast a saddle, equal to the best
cook in the land! But every thing is raw, for them
Iroquois are thorough savages. Uncas, take my
steel, and kindle a fire; a mouthful of a tender broil
will give natur a helping hand, after so long a trail.
Heyward, perceiving that their guides now set
about their repast in sober earnest, assisted the
maidens to alight, and placed himself at their side, not
unwilling to enjoy a few moments of grateful rest,
after
the bloody scene he had just gone through. While
the culinary process was in hand, curiosity induced him
to inquire into the circumstances which had led to
their timely and unexpected rescue
How is it that we see you so soon, my generous
friend, he asked, and without aid from the
garrison
of Edward?
Had we gone to the bend in the river, we might
have been in time to rake the leaves over your
bodies, but too late to have saved your scalps,
coolly answered the scout. No, no; instead of
throwing away strength and opportunity by crossing
to the fort, we lay by, under the bank of the Hudson,
waiting to watch the movements of the Hurons.
You then were witnesses of all that passed!
Not of all; for Indian sight is too keen to be
easily cheated, and we kept close. A difficult
matter
it was, too, to keep this Mohican boy snug in the
ambushment! Ah! Uncas, Uncas, your behaviour
was more like that of a curious woman, than of a
warrior on his scent!
Uncas permitted his penetrating eyes to turn for
an instant on the sturdy countenance of the speaker,
but he neither spoke, nor gave any indication of
repentance for his error. On the contrary,
Heyward
thought the manner of the young Mohican was
disdainful, if not a little fierce, and that he suppressed
passions that were ready to explode, as much in
compliment
to the listeners, as from the deference he
usually paid to his white associate.
You saw our capture? Heyward next
demanded
.
We heard it, was the significant answer. An
Indian yell is plain language to men who have passed
their days in the woods. But when you landed, we
were driven to crawl, like sarpents, beneath the leaves;
and then we lost sight of you entirely, until we placed
eyes on you again trussed to the trees, and ready
bound for an Indian massacre.
Our rescue was the deed of Providence! It was
nearly a miracle that you took not the wrong path, for
the Hurons divided, and each band of them had its
horses!
Ay! there we were thrown off the scent, and
might, indeed, have lost the trail, had it not been for
Uncas, returned the scout, with the tone and
manner
of a man who recalled all the embarrassment of the
past moment; we took the path, however, that
led into the wilderness; for we judged, and judged
rightly, that the savages would hold that course with
their prisoners. But when we had followed it for
many miles, without finding a single twig broken, as
I had advised, my mind misgave me; especially as all
the footsteps had the prints of moccasins.
Our captors had the precaution to see us shod
like themselves, said Duncan, raising a foot, and
exhibiting the gayly ornamented buskin he wore.
Ay! 'twas judgmatical, and like themselves;
though we were too expart to be thrown from a trail
by so common an invention.
To what then are we indebted for our safety?
To what, as a white man who has no taint of
Indian
blood, I should be ashamed to own; to the
judgment
of the young Mohican, in matters which I
should know better than he, but which I can now
17*
hardly believe to be true, though my own eyes tell
me it is so.
'Tis extraordinary! will you not name the
reason
?
Uncas was bold enough to say, that the beasts
ridden by the gentle ones, continued Hawk-eye,
glancing his eyes, not without curious interest on the
sorrel fillies of the ladies, planted the legs of one side
on the ground at the same time, which is contrary to
the movements of all trotting four-footed animals of
my knowledge, except the bear! And yet here are
horses that always journey in this manner, as my
own eyes have seen, and as their trail has shown for
twenty long miles!
'Tis the merit of the animal! They come from
the shores of Narraganset Bay, in the small province
of Providence Plantations, and are celebrated for
their hardihood, and the ease of this peculiar
movement
;
though other horses are not unfrequently
trained
to the same.
It may beit may be, said Hawk-eye, who
had listened with singular attention to this explanation;
though I am a man who has the full blood of the
whites, my judgment in deer and beaver is greater
than in beasts of burthen. Major Effingham has many
noble chargers, but I have never seen one travel after
such a sideling gait!
True, for he would value the animals for very
different properties. Still, is this a breed highly
esteemed
,
and as you witness, much honoured with the
burthens it is often destined to bear.
The Mohicans had suspended their operations
about the glimmering fire, to listen, and when
Duncan
had done, they looked at each other significantly,
the father uttering the never-failing exclamation of
surprise. The scout ruminated, like a man digesting
his newly acquired knowledge, and once more stole
a curious glance at the horses, before he continued
I dare to say there are even stranger sights to be
seen in the settlements! he said, at length; natur
is sadly abused by man, when he once gets the
mastery
.
But, go sideling, or go straight, Uncas had
seen the movement, and their trail led us on to the
broken bush. The outer branch, near the prints of
one of the horses, was bent upward, as a lady breaks
a flower from its stem, but all the rest were ragged and
broken down, as if the strong hand of a man had been
tearing them! So I concluded, that the cunning
varments
had seen the twig bent, and had torn the rest, to
make us believe a buck had been feeling the boughs
with his antlers.
I do believe your sagacity did not deceive you;
for some such thing occurred!
That was easy to see, added the scout, in no
degree conscious of having exhibited any
extraordinary
sagacity; and a very different matter it was
from a waddling horse! It then struck me the Mingoes
would push for this spring, for the knaves well know
the vartue of its waters!
Is it, then, so famous? demanded Heyward,
examining, with a more curious eye, the secluded
dell, with its bubbling fountain, surrounded, as it was,
by earth of a deep dingy brown.
Few red-skins, who travel south and east of the
great lakes, but have heard of its qualities. Will you
taste for yourself?
Heyward took the gourd, and after swallowing a
little of the water, threw it aside with violent
grimaces
of discontent. The scout laughed in his
silent, but heartfelt manner, and shook his head with
vast satisfaction, as he continued
Ah! you want the flavour that one gets by habit;
the time was when I liked it as little as yourself; but I
have come to my taste, and I now crave it, as a deer
does the licks. Your high spiced wines are not
better
liked than a red-skin relishes this water;
especially
when his natur is ailing. But Uncas has made
his fire, and it is time we think of eating, for our
journey
is long, and all before us.
Interrupting the dialogue by this abrupt transition,
the scout had instant recourse to the fragments of
food, which had escaped the voracity of the Hurons.
A very summary process completed the simple
cookery
,
when he and the Mohicans commenced their
humble meal, with the silence and characteristic
diligence of men, who ate in order to enable
themselves
to endure great and unremitting toil.
When this necessary, and, happily, grateful duty
had been performed, each of the foresters stooped
and took a long and parting draught, at that solitary
and silent spring, around which and its sister
fountains
,
within fifty years, the wealth, beauty, and talents,
of a hemisphere, were to assemble in such throngs,
in pursuit of health and pleasure. Then Hawk-eye
announced his determination to proceed. The
sisters
resumed their saddles; Duncan and David
grasped their rifles, and followed on their footsteps;
the scout leading the advance, and the Mohicans
bringing up the rear. The whole party moved
swiftly through the narrow path, towards the north,
leaving the healing waters to mingle unheeded with
the adjacent brook, and the bodies of the dead to
fester
on the neighbouring mount, without the rites of
sepulture; a fate but too common to the warriors of the
woods, to excite either commiseration or comment.
CHAPTER XIII.
I'll seek a readier path.
Parnell
.
The
route taken by Hawk-eye lay across those
sandy plains, relieved by occasional valleys and
swells of land, which had been traversed by their
party
on the morning of the same day, with the baffled
Magua for their guide. The sun had now fallen
low towards the distant mountains, and as their
journey
lay through the interminable forest, the heat was
no longer oppressive. Their progress, in
consequence
,
was proportionate, and long before the
twilight
gathered about them, they had made good many
toilsome miles, on their return path.
The hunter, like the savage whose place he filled,
seemed to select among the blind signs of their wild
route with a species of instinct, seldom abating in his
speed, and never pausing to deliberate. A rapid
and oblique glance at the moss on the trees, with an
occasional upward gaze towards the setting sun, or a
steady but passing look at the direction of the
numerous
water courses, through which he waded,
were sufficient to determine his path, and remove
his greatest difficulties. In the mean time, the forest
began to change its hues, losing that lively green
which had embellished its arches, in the graver light,
which is the usual precursor of the close of day.
While the eyes of the sisters were endeavouring to
catch glimpses, through the trees, of the flood of
golden glory, which formed a glittering halo around
the sun, tinging here and there, with ruby streaks,
or bordering with narrow edgings of shining yellow,
a mass of clouds that lay piled at no great distance
above the western hills, Hawk-eye turned suddenly,
and pointing upward towards the gorgeous heavens,
he spoke.
Yonder is the signal given to man to seek his
food and natural rest, he said; better and wiser
would it be, if he could understand the signs of
nature, and take a lesson from the fowls of the air,
and the beasts of the fields! Our night, however,
will soon be over, for, with the moon, we must be
up and moving again. I remember to have fout
the Maquas hereaways, in the first war in which I
ever drew blood from man; and we threw up a work
of blocks, to keep the ravenous varments from
handling
our scalps. If my marks do not fail me, we
shall find the place a few rods further to our left.
Without waiting for an assent, or, indeed, for any
reply, the sturdy hunter moved boldly into a dense
thicket of young chestnuts, shoving aside the branches
of the exuberant shoots which nearly covered the
ground, like a man who expected, at each step, to
discover some object he had formerly known. The
recollection of the scout did not deceive him. After
penetrating through the brush, matted as it was
with briars, for a few hundred feet, he entered into
an open space, that surrounded a low, green hillock,
which was crowned by the decayed block-house in
question. This rude and neglected building was
one of those deserted works, which, having been
thrown up on an emergency, had been abandoned
with the disappearance of danger, and was now
quietly crumbling in the solitude of the forest,
neglected
,
and nearly forgotten, like the
circumstances
which had caused it to be reared. Such
memorials of the passage and struggles of man are
yet frequent throughout the broad barrier of
wilderness
,
which once separated the hostile provinces,
and form a species of ruins, that are intimately
associated
with the recollections of colonial history, and
which are in appropriate keeping with the gloomy
character of the surrounding scenery. The roof
of bark had long since fallen and mingled with
the soil, but the huge logs of pine, which had been
hastily thrown together, still preserved their relative
positions, though one angle of the work had given
way under the pressure, and threatened a speedy
downfall to the remainder of the rustic edifice.
While Heyward and his companions hesitated to
approach
a building of such a decayed appearance,
Hawk-eye and the Indians entered within the low
walls, not only without fear, but with obvious
interest
.
While the former surveyed the ruins, both
internally
and externally, with the curiosity of one
whose recollections were reviving at each moment,
Chingachgook related to his son, in the language of
the Delawares, and with the pride of a conqueror,
the brief history of the skirmish which had been
fought in his youth, in that secluded spot. A strain
of melancholy, however, blended with his triumph,
rendering his voice, as usual, soft and musical.
In the mean time, the sisters gladly dismounted,
and prepared to enjoy their halt in the coolness of
the evening, and in a security which they believed
nothing but the beasts of the forest could invade.
Would not our resting-place have been more
retired
,
my worthy friend, demanded the more
vigilant
Duncan, perceiving that the scout had already
finished his short survey, had we chosen a spot less
known, and one more rarely visited than this?
Few live who know the block-house was ever
raised, was the slow and musing answer;  'tis not
often that books are made, and narratives written, of
such a skrimmage as was here fout atween the
Mohicans and the Mohawks, in a war of their own
waging. I was then a younker, and went out with
the Delawares, because I know'd they were a
scandalized
and wronged race. Forty days and forty
nights did the imps crave our blood around this pile
of logs, which I designed and partly reared, being, as
you'll remember, no Indian myself, but a man
without
a cross. The Delawares lent themselves to the
work, and we made it good, ten to twenty, until our
numbers were nearly equal, and then we sallied out
upon the hounds, and not a man of them ever got back
to tell the fate of his party. Yes, yes; I was then
young, and new to the sight of blood, and not
relishing
the thought that creatures who had spirits like
myself, should lay on the naked ground, to be torn
Vol. I. 18
asunder by beasts, or to bleach in the rains, I buried
the bead with my own hands, under that very little
hillock, where you have placed yourselves; and no
bad seat does it make either, though it be raised by
the bones of mortal men.
Heyward and the sisters arose on the instant from
the grassy sepulchre; nor could the two latter,
notwithstanding
the terrific scenes they had so recently
passed through, entirely suppress an emotion of
natural
horror, when they found themselves in such
familiar contact with the grave of the dead
Mohawks
.
The gray light, the gloomy little area of
dark grass, surrounded by its border of brush, beyond
which the pines rose, in breathing silence, apparently,
into the very clouds, and the death-like stillness of the
vast forest, were all in unison to deepen such a
sensation
.
They are gone, and they are harmless, continued
Hawk-eye, waving his hand, with a melancholy
smile, at their manifest alarm; they'll never shout
the warwhoop, nor strike a blow with the tomahawk,
again! And of all those who aided in placing them
where they lie, Chingachgook and I only are living!
The brothers and family of the Mohican formed our
war party, and you see before you, all that are now
left of his race.
The eyes of the listeners involuntarily sought the
forms of the Indians, with a compassionate interest in
their desolate fortune. Their dark persons were
still to be seen within the shadows of the block-house,
the son listening to the relation of his father, with
that sort of intenseness, which would be created by a
narrative, that redounded so much to the honour of
those, whose names he had long revered for their
courage and savage virtues.
I had thought the Delawares a pacific people,
said Duncan, and that they never waged war in
person; trusting the defence of their lands to those
very Mohawks that you slew!
'Tis true in part, returned the scout, and
yet, at the bottom, 'tis a wicked lie. Such a treaty
was made in ages gone by, through the deviltries of
the Dutchers, who wished to disarm the natives that
had the best right to the country, where they had
settled themselves. The Mohicans, though a part
of the same nation, having to deal with the English,
never entered into the silly bargain, but kept to their
manhood; as in truth did the Delawares, when their
eyes were opened to their folly. You see before
you, a chief of the great Mohican Sagamores! Once
his family could chase their deer over tracts of
country
wider than that which belongs to the Albany
Patteroon, without crossing brook or hill, that was
not their own; but what is left to their
descendant
!
He may find his six feet of earth, when
God chooses; and eep it in peace, perhaps, if he has
a friend who will take the pains to sink his head so
low, that the ploughshares cannot reach it!
Enough! said Heyward, apprehensive that
the subject might lead to a discussion that would
interrupt the harmony, so necessary to the
preservation
of his fair companions; we have
journeyed
far, and few among us are blest with forms like
that of yours, which seems to know neither fatigue
nor weakness.
The sinews and bones of a man carry me through
it all, said the hunter, surveying his muscular limbs
with a simplicity that betrayed the honest pleasure
the compliment afforded him; there are larger and
heavier men to be found in the settlements, but you
might travel many days in a city, before you could
meet one able to walk fifty miles without stopping to
take breath, or who has kept the hounds within
hearing during a chase of hours. However, as flesh
and blood are not always the same, it is quite
reasonable
to suppose, that the gentle ones are willing to
rest, after all they have seen and done this day.
Uncas, clear out the spring, while your father and I
make a cover for their tender heads of these
chestnut
shoots, and a bed of grass and leaves.
The dialogue ceased, while the hunter and his
companions busied themselves in preparations for
the comfort and protection of those they guided. A
spring, which many long years before had induced the
natives to select the place for their temporary
fortification
,
was soon cleared of leaves, and a fountain of
crystal gushed from the bed, diffusing its waters
over the verdant hillock. A corner of the building
was then roofed in such a manner, as to exclude the
heavy dew of the climate, and piles of sweet shrubs
and dried leaves were laid beneath it, for the sisters
to repose on.
While the diligent woodsmen were employed in
this manner, Cora and Alice partook of that
refreshment
,
which duty required, much more than
inclination
prompted, them to accept. They then retired
within the walls, and first offering up their
thanks-givings
for past mercies, and petitioning for a
continuance
of the Divine favour throughout the coming
night, they laid their tender forms on the fragrant
couch, and in spite of recollections and forebodings,
soon sunk into those slumbers which nature so
imperiously
demanded, and which were sweetened by hopes
for the morrow. Duncan had prepared himself
to pass the night in watchfulness, near them, just
without the ruin; but the scout, perceiving his
intention
,
pointed towards Chingachgook, as he coolly
disposed his own person on the grass, and said
The eyes of a white man are too heavy, and too
blind, for such a watch as this! The Mohican will
be our sentinel; therefore, let us sleep.
I proved myself a sluggard on my post during the
past night, said Heyward, and have less need of
repose than you, who did more credit to the
character
of a soldier. Let all the party seek their rest,
then, while I hold the guard.
If we lay among the white tents of the 60th, and
in front of an enemy like the French, I could not ask
for a better watchman, returned the scout; but in
the darkness, and among the signs of the wilderness,
your judgment would be like the folly of a child, and
your vigilance thrown away. Do, then, like Uncas
and myself; sleep, and sleep in safety.
Heyward perceived, in truth, that the younger
Indian
had thrown his form on the side of the hillock,
while they were talking, like one who sought to make
the most of the time allotted to rest, and that his
example
had been followed by David, whose voice
literally
`clove to his jaws' with the fever of his wound,
18*
heightened, as it was, by their toilsome march.
Unwilling
to prolong a useless discussion, the young
man affected to comply, by posting his back against
the logs of the block-house, in a half-recumbent
posture
,
though resolutely determined, in his own mind,
not to close an eye until he had delivered his precious
charge into the arms of Munro himself. Hawk-eye,
believing he had prevailed, soon fell asleep, and a
silence
as deep as the solitude in which they had found
it, pervaded the retired spot.
For many minutes Duncan succeeded in keeping his
senses on the alert, and alive to every moaning sound
that arose from the forest. His vision became more
acute, as the shades of evening settled on the place,
and even after the stars were glimmering above his
head, he was able to distinguish the recumbent forms of
his companions, as they lay stretched on the grass, and
to note the person of Chingachgook, who sat upright,
and motionless as one of the trees, which formed the
dark barrier on every side of them. He still heard the
gentle breathings of the sisters, who lay within a few
feet of him, and not a leaf was ruffled by the passing
air, of which his ear did not detect the whispering
sound. At length, however, the mournful notes of a
whip-poor-will, became blended with the moanings of
an owl; his heavy eyes occasionally sought the bright
rays of the stars, and then he fancied he saw them
through the fallen lids. At instants of momentary
wakefulness
,
he mistook a bush for his associate sentinel;
his head next sunk upon his shoulder, which, in its
turn, sought the support of the round; and, finally,
his whole person became relaxed and pliant, and the
young man sunk into a deep sleep, dreaming that he
was a knight of ancient chivalry, holding his midnight
vigils before the tent of a re-captured princess, whose
favour he did not despair of gaining, by such a proof
of devotion and watchfulness.
How long the tired Duncan lay in this insensible
state he never knew himself, but his slumbering
visions
had been long lost in total forgetfulness, when
he was awakened by a light tap on the shoulder.
Aroused by this signal, slight as it was, he sprang
upon his feet, with a confused recollection of the
self-imposed duty he had assumed with the
commencement
of the night
Who comes? he demanded, feeling for his
sword, at the place where it was usually suspended.
Speak! friend or enemy?
Friend, replied the low voice of Chingachgook;
who, pointing upward at the luminary which was
shedding its mild light through the opening in the
trees, directly on their bivouac, immediately added,
in his rude English, moon comes, and white man's
fort farfar off; time to move, when sleep shuts both
eyes of the Frenchman!
You say true! call up your friends, and bridle
the horses, while I prepare my own companions for
the march.
We are awake, Duncan, said the soft, silvery
tones of Alice within the building, and ready to
travel very fast, after so refreshing a sleep; but you
have watched through the tedious night, in our
behalf
,
after having endured so much fatigue the
livelong
day!
Say, rather, I would have watched, but my
treacherous eyes betrayed me; twice have I proved
myself unfit for the trust I bear.
Nay, Duncan, deny it not, interrupted the
smiling
Alice, issuing from the shadows of the building
into the light of the moon, in all the loveliness of her
freshened beauty; I know you to be a heedless
one, when self is the object of your care, and but too
vigilant in favour of others. Can we not tarry here
a little longer, while you find the rest you need.
Cheerfully, most cheerfully, will Cora and I keep
the vigils, while you, and all these brave men,
endeavour
to snatch a little sleep!
If shame could cure me of my drowsiness, I
should never close an eye again, said the uneasy
youth, gazing at the ingenuous countenance of Alice,
where, however, in its sweet solicitude, he read
nothing to confirm his half awakened suspicion.
It is but too true, that after leading you into
danger
by my heedlessness, I have not even the merit of
guarding your pillows, as should became a soldier.
No one but Duncan himself, should accuse
Duncan
of such a weakness! returned the confiding
Alice; who lent herself, with all a woman's
confidence
to that generous delusion which painted the
perfection of her youthful admirer. Go, then, and
sleep; believe me, neither of us, weak girls as we are,
will betray our watch.
The young man was relieved from the
awkwardness
of making any further protestations of his own
demerits, by an exclamation from Chingachgook,
and the attitude of riveted attention assumed by his
son.
The Mohicans hear an enemy! whispered
Hawk-eye
,
who, by this time, in common with the whole
party, was awake and stirring. They scent some
danger in the wind!
God forbid! exclaimed Heyward. Surely,
we have had enough of bloodshed!
While he spoke, however, the young soldier seized
his rifle, and advancing towards the front, prepared
to atone for his venial remissness, by freely exposing
his life in defence of those he attended.
'Tis some creature of the forest prowling around
us in quest of food! he said, in a whisper, as soon as
the low, and, apparently, distant sounds, which had
startled the Mohicans, reached his own ears.
Hist! returned the attentive scout; 'tis man;
even I can now tell his tread, poor as my senses are,
when compared to an Indian's! That scampering
Huron has fallen in with one of Montcalm's outlying
parties, and they have struck upon our trail. I
shouldn't like myself to spill more human blood in this
spot, he added, looking around with anxiety in his
features
,
at the dim objects by which he was surrounded;
but what must be, must! Lead the horses into the
block-house, Uncas; and, friends, do you follow to
the same shelter. Poor and old as it is, it offers a
cover, and has rung with the crack of a rifle afore to
night!
He was instantly obeyed, the Mohicans leading the
Narragansets within the ruin, whither the whole
party
repaired, with the most guarded silence.
The sounds of approaching footsteps was now too
distinctly audible, to leave any doubts as to the
nature
of the interruption. They were soon mingled
with voices, calling to each other, in an Indian
dialect
,
which the hunter, in a whisper, affirmed to
Heyward
,
was the language of the Hurons. When the
party reached the point where the horses had entered
the thicket which surrounded the block-house, they
were evidently at fault, having lost those marks which,
until that moment, had directed their pursuit.
It would seem by the voices that twenty men were
soon collected at that one spot, mingling their
different
opinions and advice, in noisy clamour.
The knaves know our weakness, whispered
Hawk-eye, who stood by the side of Heyward, in
deep shade, looking through an opening in the logs,
or they wouldn't indulge their idleness in such a
squaw's march. Listen to the reptiles! each man
among them seems to have two tongues, and but a
single leg!
Duncan, brave, and even fierce as he sometimes
was in the combat, could not, in such a moment of
painful suspense, make any reply to the cool and
characteristic remark of the scout. He only
grasped
his rifle more firmly, and fastened his eyes upon
the narrow opening, through which he gazed upon
the moonlight view with increasing intenseness. The
deeper tones of one who spoke as having authority,
were next heard, amid a silence that denoted the
respect with which his orders, or rather advice, was
received. After which, by the rustling of leaves,
and cracking of dried twigs, it was apparent the
savages
were separating in pursuit of the lost trail.
Fortunately for the pursued, the light of the moon,
while it shed a flood of mild lustre, upon the little
area around the ruin, was not sufficiently strong to
penetrate the deep arches of the forest, where the
objects still lay in dim and deceptive shadow. The
search proved fruitless; for so short and sudden had
been the passage from the faint path the travellers
had journeyed into the thicket, that every trace of
their footsteps was lost in the obscurity of the woods.
It was not long, however, before the restless
savages
were heard beating the brush, and gradually
approaching the inner edge of that dense border of
young chestnuts, which encircled the little area.
They are coming! muttered Heyward,
endeavouring
to thrust his rifle through the chink in the
logs; let us fire on their approach!
Keep every thing in the shade, returned the
scout; the snapping of a flint, or even the smell of a
single karnel of the brimstone, would bring the
hungry
varlets upon us in a body. Should it please
God, that we must give battle for the scalps, trust to
the experience of men who know the ways of the
savages
,
and who are not often backward when the
warwhoop
is howled.
Duncan cast his eyes anxiously behind him, and
saw that the trembling sisters were cowering in the
far corner of the building, while the Mohicans stood
in the shadow, like two upright posts, ready, and
apparently
willing, to strike, when the blow should be
needed. Curbing his impatience, he again looked
out upon the area, and awaited the result in silence.
At that instant the thicket opened, and a tall and
armed Huron advanced a few paces into the open
space. As he gazed upon the silent block-house,
the moon fell full upon his swarthy countenance, and
betrayed its surprise and curiosity. He made the
exclamation, which usually accompanies the former
emotion in an Indian, and calling in a low voice, soon
drew a companion to his side.
These children of the woods stood together for
several
moments, pointing at the crumbling edifice,
and conversing in the unintelligible language of their
tribe. They then approached, though with slow
and cautious steps, pausing every instant to look at
the building, like startled deer, whose curiosity
struggled
powerfully with their awakened apprehensions
for the mastery. The foot of one of them
suddenly
rested on the mound, and he stooped to
examine
its nature. At this moment, Heyward
observed
that the scout loosened his knife in its sheath,
and lowered the muzzle of his rifle. Imitating these
movements, the young man prepared himself for the
struggle, which now seemed inevitable.
The savages were so near, that the least
motion
in one of the horses, or even a breath louder
than common, would have betrayed the fugitives.
But, in discovering the character of the mound, the
attention of the Hurons appeared directed to a
different
object. They spoke together, and the sounds
of their voices were low and solemn, as if influenced
by a reverence that was deeply blended with awe.
Then they drew warily back, keeping their eyes
riveted
on the ruin, as if they expected to see the
apparitions
of the dead issue from its silent walls, until
having reached the boundary of the area, they
moved slowly into the thicket, and disappeared.
Hawk-eye dropped the breech of his rifle to the
earth, and drawing a long, free breath, exclaimed,
in an audible whisper
Ay! they respect the dead, and it has this time
saved their own lives, and it may be, the lives of
better
men too!
Heyward lent his attention, for a single moment,
to his companion, but without replying, he again
turned towards those who just then interested him
more. He heard the two Hurons leave the bushes,
and it was soon plain that all the pursuers were
gathered about them, in deep attention to their report.
After a few minutes of earnest and solemn dialogue,
altogether different from the noisy clamour with
which they had first collected about the spot, the
sounds grew fainter, and more distant, and finally
were lost in the depths of the forest.
Hawk-eye waited until a signal from the listening
Chingachgook assured him that every sound from
the retiring party was completely swallowed by the
distance, when he motioned to Heyward to lead
forth the horses, and to assist the sisters into their
saddles. The instant this was done, they issued
through the broken gate-way, and stealing out by a
direction opposite to the one by which they had
entered
,
they quitted the spot, the sisters casting
furtive
glances at the silent grave and crumbling ruin, as
they left the soft light of the moon, to bury themselves
in the deep gloom of the woods.
Vol. I. 19
CHAPTER XIV.
Guard.
Qui est l?
Puc.
Pasans, pauvres gens de France.
King Henry
VI.
During
the rapid movement from the
block-house
,
and until the party was deeply buried in the
forest, each individual was too much interested in
their escape, to hazard a word even in whispers.
The scout resumed his post in the advance, though
his steps, after he had thrown a safe distance
between
himself and his enemies, were more deliberate
than in their previous march, in consequence of his
utter ignorance of the localities of the
surrounding
woods. More than once he halted to
consult
with his confederates, the Mohicans, pointing
upwards at the moon, and examining the barks of
the trees with extraordinary care. In these brief
pauses, Heyward and the sisters listened, with senses
rendered doubly acute by their danger, to detect
any symptoms which might announce the
proximity
of their foes. At such moments, it seemed as
if a vast range of country lay buried in eternal sleep;
not the least sound arising from the forest, unless it
was the distant and scarcely audible rippling of a
water-course. Birds, beasts, and man, appeared to
slumber alike, if, indeed, any of the latter were to be
found in that wide tract of wilderness. But the sounds
of the rivulet, feeble and murmuring as they were,
relieved the guides at once from no trifling
embarrassment
,
and towards it they immediately held their
silent and diligent way.
When the banks of the little stream were gained,
Hawk-eye made another halt; and, taking the
moccasins
from his feet, he invited Heyward and Gamut
to follow his example. He then entered the water,
and for near an hour they travelled in the bed of the
brook, leaving no dangerous trail. The moon had
already sunk into an immense pile of black clouds,
which lay impending above the western horizon,
when they issued from the low and devious water
course to rise, again, to the light and level of the
sandy but wooded plain. Here the scout seemed to
be once more at home, for he held on his way, with
the certainty and diligence of a man, who moved in
the security of his own knowledge. The path soon
became more uneven, and the travellers could
plainly
perceive, that the mountains drew nigher to them
on each hand, and that they were, in truth, about
entering
one of their widest gorges. Suddenly,
Hawk-eye
made a pause, and waiting until he was joined by
the whole party, he spoke; though in tones so low
and cautious, that they added to the solemnity of his
words, in the quiet and darkness of the place.
It is easy to know the path-ways, and to find the
licks and water-courses of the wilderness, he said;
but who that saw this spot, could venture to say,
that a mighty army was at rest among yonder silent
trees and barren mountains!
We are then at no great distance from William
Henry? said Heyward, advancing, with interest,
nigher to the scout.
It is yet a long and weary path, was the answer,
and when and where to strike it, is now our
greatest
difficulty. See, he said, pointing through the
trees towards a spot where a little basin of water
reflected
the bright stars from its still and placid
bosom
,
here is the `bloody pond;' and I am on ground
that I have not only often travelled, but over which
I have fou't the enemy, from the rising to the setting
sun!
Ha! that sheet of dull and dreary water, then, is
the sepulchre of the brave men who fell in the
contest
!
I have heard it named, but never have I stood
on its banks before!
Three battles did we make with the Dutch
Frenchman in a day! continued Hawk-eye,
pursuing
the train of his own thoughts, rather than
replying
to the remark of Duncan. He met us hard by,
in our outward march to ambush his advance, and
scattered us, like driven deer, through the defile, to
the shores of Horican. Then we rallied behind our
fallen trees, and made head against him, under Sir
Williamwho was made Sir William for that very
deed; and well did we pay him for the disgrace of
the morning! Hundreds of Frenchmen saw the sun
that day for the last time; and even their leader,
Dieskau himself, fell into our hands, so cut and torn
with the lead, that he has gone back to his own
country, unfit for further acts in war.
'Twas a noble repulse! exclaimed Heyward
in the heat of his youthful ardour; the fame of it
reached us early in our southern army.
Ay! but it did not end there. I was sent by Major
Effingham, at Sir William's own bidding, to out-flank
the French, and carry the tidings of their disaster
across the portage, to the fort on the Hudson. Just
hereaway, where you see the trees rise into a
mountain
swell, I met a party coming down to our aid, and
I led them where the enemy were taking their meal,
little dreaming that they had not finished the bloody
work of the day.
And you surprised them!
If death can be a surprise to men who are
thinking
only of the cravings of their appetites! we gave
them but little breathing time, for they had borne
hard upon us in the fight of the morning, and there
were few in our party who had not lost friend or
relative
by their hands. When all was over, the dead,
and some say the dying, were cast into that little pond.
These eyes have seen its waters coloured with blood,
as natural water never yet flowed from the bowels of
the 'arth.
It was a convenient, and, I trust, will prove a
peaceful grave for a soldier! You have, then, seen
much service on this frontier?
I! said the scout, erecting his tall person with
an air of military pride; there are not many echoes
among these hills that haven't rung with the crack of
my rifle, nor is there the space of a square mile
atwixt Horican and the river, that `kill-deer' hasn't
dropped a living body on, be it an enemy, or be it a
brute beast. As for the grave there, being as quiet as
19*
you mention, it is another matter. There are them
in the camp, who say and think, man to lie still,
should not be buried while the breath is in the body;
and certain it is, that in the hurry of that evening, the
doctors had but little time to say who was living, and
who was dead. Hist! see you nothing, now, walking
on the shore of the pond?
'Tis not probable that any are as houseless as
ourselves
,
in this dreary forest.
Such as he may care but little for house or
shelter
,
and night dew can never wet a body that passes
its days in the water! returned the scout, grasping
the shoulder of Heyward, with such convulsive
strength, as to make the young soldier painfully
sensible
how much superstitious terror had gotten the
mastery of a man, who was usually so dauntless.
By heaven! there is a human form, and it
approaches
!
stand to your arms, my friends, for we
know not whom we encounter.
Qui vive? demanded a stern and deep voice,
which sounded like a challenge from another world,
issuing out of that solitary and solemn place.
What says it? whispered the scout; it speaks
neither Indian nor English!
Qui vive? repeated the same voice, which was
quickly followed by the rattling of arms, and a
menacing
attitude.
France, cried Heyward, advancing from the
shadow of the trees, to the shore of the pond,
within
a few yards of the sentinel.
D'o venez-vouso allez-vous d'aussi bonne
heure? demanded the grenadier, in the language,
and with the accent of a man from old France.
Je viens de la dcouverte, et je vais me
coucher
.
Etes-vous officier du roi?
Sans doute, mon camarade; me prends-tu pour
un provincial! Je suis capitaine de chasseurs
(
Heyward
well knew that the other was of a regiment in
the line)
j'ai ici, avec moi, les filles du commandant
de la fortification. Aha! tu en as entendu parler!
je les ai fait prisonnires prs de l'autre fort, et je les
conduis au gnral.
Ma foi! mesdames; j'en suis fach pour vous,
exclaimed the young soldier, touching his cap with
studious politeness, and no little grace;
mais
fortune
de guerre! vous trouverez notre gnral un
brave homme, et bien poli avec les dames.
C'est le caractre des gens de guerre,
said
Cora
,
with admirable self-possession;
Adieu, mon
ami; je vous souhaiterais un devoir plus agrable,
remplir.
The soldier made a low and humble
acknowledgment
for her civility; and Heyward adding, a bonne
nuit, mon camarade, they moved deliberately
forward
;
leaving the sentinel pacing along the banks of
the silent pond, little suspecting an enemy of so much
effrontery, and humming to himself those words
which were recalled to his mind by the sight of
women
,
and, perhaps, by recollections of his own distant
and beautiful France
Vive le vin, vive l'amour, &c. &c.
'Tis well you understood the knave!
whispered
the scout, when they had gained a little distance
from the place, and letting his rifle fall into the hollow
of his arm again; I soon saw that he was one of
them uneasy Frenchers, and well for him it was, that
his speech was friendly, and his wishes kind; or a
place might have been found for his bones amongst
those of his countrymen.
He was interrupted by a long and heavy groan,
which arose from the little basin, as though, in truth,
the spirits of the departed lingered about their watery
sepulchre.
Surely, it was of flesh! continued the scout;
no spirit could handle its arms so steadily!
It
was
of flesh, but whether the poor fellow still
belongs to this world, may well be doubted, said
Heyward, glancing his eyes quickly around him, and
missing Chingachgook from their little band.
Another
groan, more faint than the former, was
succeeded
by a heavy and sullen plunge into the water, and
all was as still again, as if the borders of the dreary
pool had never been awakened from the silence of
creation. While they yet hesitated in an
uncertainty
,
that each moment served to render more
painful, the form of the Indian was seen gliding out
of the thicket, and rejoined them, while with one
hand he attached the reeking scalp of the
unfortunate
young Frenchman to his girdle, and with the
other he replaced the knife and tomahawk that had
drank his blood. He then took his wonted station,
a little on one flank, with the satisfied air of a man
who believed he had done a deed of merit.
The scout dropped one end of his rifle to the
earth, and leaning his hands on the other, he stood
musing a moment in profound silence. Then shaking
his head in a mournful manner, he muttered
'Twould have been a cruel and an unhuman act
for a white-skin; but 'tis the gift and natur of an
Indian
,
and I suppose it should not be denied! I could
wish, though, it had befallen an accursed Mingo, rather
than that gay, young boy, from the old countries!
Enough! said Heyward, apprehensive the
unconscious
sisters might comprehend the nature of the
detention, and conquering his disgust by a train of
reflections
very much like that of the hunter; 'tis
done, and though better it were left undone, cannot
be amended. You see we are, too obviously,
within
the sentinels of the enemy; what course do you
propose to follow?
Yes, said Hawk-eye, rousing himself again,
'tis, as you say, too late to harbour further thoughts
about it! Ay, the French have gathered around the
fort in good earnest, and we have a delicate needle
to thread in passing them.
And but little time to do it in, added Heyward;
glancing his eyes upward, towards the bank of
vapour
that concealed the setting moon.
And little time to do it in! repeated the scout.
The thing may be done in two fashions, by the help
of Providence, without which it may not be done at
all!
Name them quickly, for time presses.
One would be, to dismount the gentle ones, and
let their beasts range the plain; by sending the
Mohicans
in front, we might then cut a lane through
their sentries, and enter the fort over the dead
bodies
.
It will not doit will not do! interrupted the
generous Heyward; a soldier might force his way
in this manner, but never with such a convoy.
'Twould be, indeed, a bloody path for such
tender
feet to wade in! returned the equally reluctant
scout, but I thought it befitting my manhood to
name the thing. We must then turn on our trail,
and get without the line of their look-outs, when we
will bend short to the west, and enter the mountains;
where I can hide you, so that all the devil's hounds
in Montcalm's pay would be thrown off the scent, for
months to come.
Let it be done, returned the impatient young
man, and that instantly.
Further words were unnecessary; for Hawk-eye,
merely uttering the mandate to follow, moved
along the route, by which they had just entered their
present, critical, and even dangerous situation.
Their progress, like their late dialogue, was guarded,
and without noise; for none knew at what moment a
passing patrol, or a crouching picquet, of the enemy,
might rise upon their path. As they held their silent
way along the margin of the pond, again, Heyward
and the scout stole furtive glances at its appalling
dreariness. They looked in vain for the form they
had so recently seen stalking along its silent shores,
while a low and regular wash of the little waves, by
announcing that the waters were not yet subsided,
furnished a frightful memorial of the deed of blood
they had just witnessed. Like all that passing and
gloomy scene, the low basin, however, quickly
melted
in the darkness, and became blended with the
mass of black objects in the rear of the active
travellers
.
Hawk-eye soon deviated from the line of their
retreat
,
and striking off towards the mountains which
form the western boundary of the narrow plain,
he led his followers, with swift steps, deep within the
dense shadows, that were cast from their high and
broken
summits. Their route was now painful; lying
over ground ragged with rocks, and intersected with
ravines, and their progress proportionately slow.
Bleak and black hills lay on every side of them,
compensating
,
in some degree, for the additional toil
of the march, by the sense of security they
imparted
.
At length the party began slowly to rise a
steep and rugged ascent, by a path that curiously
wound among rocks and trees, avoiding the one, and
supported by the other, in a manner that showed it had
been devised by men long practised in the arts of the
wilderness. As they gradually rose from the level of
the valleys, the thick darkness which usually
precedes
the approach of day, began to disperse, and
objects were seen in the plain and palpable
colours
with which they had been gifted by nature.
When they issued from the stinted woods which clung
to the barren sides of the mountain, upon a flat and
mossy rock, that formed its summit, they met the
morning, as it came blushing above the green pines
of a hill, that lay on the opposite side of the valley of
the Horican.
The scout now told the sisters to dismount,
and taking the bridles from the mouths and the
saddles off the backs of the jaded beasts, he turned
them loose, to glean a scanty subsistence, among the
shrubs and meager herbage of that elevated region.
Go, he said, and seek your food where
natur
gives it you; and beware that you become not
food to ravenous wolves yourselves, among these
hills.
Have we no further need of them? demanded
Heyward.
See, and judge with your own eyes, said the scout,
advancing towards the eastern brow of the mountain,
whither he beckoned for the whole party to follow;
if it was as easy to look into the heart of man, as it
is to spy out the nakedness of Montcalm's camp from
this spot, hypocrites would grow scarce, and the
cunning
of a Mingo might prove a losing game,
compared
to the honesty of a Delaware.
When the travellers had reached the verge of the
precipice, they saw, at a glance, the truth of the
scout's declaration, and the admirable foresight with
which he had led them to their commanding station.
The mountain on which they stood, elevated
perhaps
a thousand feet in the air, was a high cone,
that rose a little in advance of that range which
reached
for miles along the western shores of the lake,
until
meeting its sister piles, beyond the water, it ran
off far towards the Canadas, in confused and broken
masses of rock, which were thinly sprinkled with
evergreens
.
Immediately at the feet of the parts the
southern
shore of the Horican swept in a broad semi-circle,
from mountain to mountain, marking a wide strand,
that soon rose into an uneven and somewhat elevated
plain. To the north, stretched the limpid, and, as it
appeared from that dizzy height, the narrow sheet of
the holy lake, indented with numberless bays,
embellished
by fantastic head-lands, and dotted with
countless islands. At the distance of a few leagues, the
bed of the waters became lost among mountains, or
was wrapped in the masses of vapour, that came slowly
rolling along their bosom, before a light morning air.
But a narrow opening between the crests of the hills,
pointed out the passage by which they found their way
still farther north, to spread their pure and ample
sheets again, before pouring out their tribute into
the distant Champlain. To the south stretched the
defile, or, rather, broken plain, so often mentioned.
For several miles, in this direction, the mountains
appeared
reluctant to yield their dominion, but within
reach of the eye they diverged, and finally melted into
the level and sandy lands, across which we have
accompanied
our adventurers in their double journey.
Along both ranges of hills, which bounded the
opposite
sides of the lake and valley, clouds of light
vapour were rising in spiral wreaths from the
uninhabited
woods, looking like the smokes of hidden
cottages
,
or rolled lazily down the declivities, to mingle
with the fogs of the lower land. A single, solitary,
snow-white cloud, floated above the valley, and
marked
the spot, beneath which lay the silent pool of the
`bloody pond.'
Directly on the shore of the lake, and nearer to its
western than to its eastern margin, lay the extensive
Vol. I. 20
earthen ramparts and low buildings of William
Henry
.
Two of the sweeping bastions appeared to rest on
the water, which washed their bases, while a deep
ditch and extensive morasses guarded its other sides
and angles. The land had been cleared of wood for
a reasonable distance around the work, but every
other part of the scene lay in the green livery of
nature
,
except where the limpid water mellowed the
view, or the bold rocks thrust their black and naked
heads above the undulating outlines of the mountain
ranges. In its front, might be seen the scattered
sentinels
,
who held a weary watch against their
numerous
foes; and within the walls themselves, the
travellers
looked down upon men still drowsy with a
night of vigilance. Towards the south-east, but in
immediate contact with the fort, was an entrenched
camp, posted on a rocky eminence, that would have
been far more eligible for the work itself, in which
Hawk-eye pointed out the presence of those auxiliary
regiments that had so recently left the Hudson, in
their company. From the woods, a little farther
to the south, rose numerous dark and lurid smokes,
that were easily to be distinguished from the purer
exhalations of the springs, and which the scout also
showed to Heyward, as evidences that the enemy lay
in force in that direction.
But the spectacle which most concerned the young
soldier, was on the western bank of the lake, though
quite near to its southern termination. On a stripe
of land, which appeared, from his stand, too narrow
to contain such an army, but which, in truth,
extended
many hundreds of yards from the shores of the
Horican to the base of the mountain, were to be seen
the white tents and military engines for an
encampment
of ten thousand men. Batteries were
already
thrown up in their front, and even while the
spectators above them were looking down, with such
different emotions, on a scene, which lay like
a map beneath their feet, the roar of artillery rose
from out the valley, and passed off, in thundering
echoes, along the eastern hills.
Morning is just touching them below, said the
deliberate and musing scout, and the watchers have
a mind to wake up the sleepers by the sound of
cannon
.
We are a few hours too late! Montcalm has
already filled the woods with his accursed Iroquois.
The place is, indeed, invested, returned
Duncan
;
but is there no expedient by which we may
enter? capture in the works would be far preferable
to falling, again, into the hands of roving Indians.
See! exclaimed the scout, unconsciously
directing
the attention of Cora to the quarters of her own
father, how that shot has made the stones fly from
the side of the commandant's house! Ay! these
Frenchers will pull it to pieces faster than it was put
together, solid and thick though it be!
Heyward, I sicken at the sight of danger, that I
cannot share, said the undaunted but anxious
daughter
.
Let us go to Montcalm, and demand
admission
;
he dare no deny a child the boon!
You would scarce find the tent of the Frenchman
with the hair on your head! said the blunt scout.
If I had but one of the thousand boats which lie empty
along that shore, it might be done. Ha! here will
soon be an end of the firing, for yonder comes a fog
that will turn day to night, and make an Indian arrow
more dangerous than a moulded cannon. Now, if
you are equal to the work, and will follow, I will
make a push; for I long to get down into that camp,
if it be only to scatter some Mingo dogs, that I see
lurking in the skirts of yonder thicket of birch.
We are equal! said Cora, firmly; on such
an errand we will follow to any danger!
The scout turned to her with a smile of honest and
cordial approbation, as he answered
I would I had a thousand men, of brawny limbs
and quick eyes, that feared death as little as you!
I'd send them jabbering Frenchers back into their
den again, afore the week was ended, howling like so
many fettered hounds, or hungry wolves. But stir,
he added, turning from her to the rest of the party, the
fog comes rolling down so fast, we shall have but just
the time to meet it on the plain, and use it as a cover.
Remember, if any accident should befall me, to keep
the air blowing on your left cheeksor, rather, follow
the Mohicans; they'd scent their way, be it in day,
or be it at night.
He then waved his hand for them to follow, and
threw himself down the steep declivity, with free but
careful footsteps. Heyward assisted the sisters to
descend, and in a few minutes they were all far
down a mountain, whose sides they had climbed with
so much toil and pain.
The direction taken by Hawk-eye soon brought
the travellers to the level of the plain, nearly
opposite
to a sally-port, in the western curtain of the fort,
which lay, itself, at the distance of about half & mile
from the point where he halted, to allow Duncan to
come up with his charge. In their eagerness, and
favoured by the nature of the ground, they had
anticipated
the fog, which was rolling heavily down the
lake, and it became necessary to pause, until the
mists had wrapped the camp of the enemy in their
fleecy mantle. The Mohicans profited by the delay,
to steal out of the woods, and to make a survey of
surrounding objects. They were followed, at a little
distance, by the scout, with a view to profit early by
their report, and to obtain some faint knowledge for
himself of the more immediate localities.
In a very few moments he returned, his face
reddened
with vexation, while he muttered forth his
disappointment in words of no very gentle import.
Here, has the cunning Frenchman been posting a
picquet directly in our path, he said; red-skins
and whites; and we shall be as likely to fall into
their midst, as to pass them in the fog!
Cannot we make a circuit to avoid the danger,
asked Heyward, and come into our path again
when it is past?
Who that once bends from the line of his march,
in a fog, can tell when or how to turn to find it again!
The mists of Horican are not like the curls from a
peace-pipe, or the smoke which settles above a
mosquetoe
fire!
He was yet speaking, when a crashing sound was
heard, and a cannon ball entered the thicket, striking
the body of a sapling, and rebounding to the earth, its
force being much expended by previous resistance.
20*
The Indians followed instantly like busy attendants on
the terrible messenger, and Uncas commenced
speaking
earnestly, and with much action, in the Delaware
tongue.
It may be so, lad, muttered the scout, when he
had ended; for desperate fevers are not to be
treated
like a tooth-ache. Come, then, the fog is
shutting
in.
Stop! cried Heyward; first explain your
expectations
.
'Tis soon done, and a small hope it is; but then
it is better than nothing. This shot that you see,
added the scout, kicking the harmless iron with his
foot, has ploughed the 'arth in its road from the
fort, and we shall hunt for the furrow it has made,
when all other signs may fail. No more words, but
follow; or the fog may leave us in the middle of our
path, a mark for both armies to shoot at.
Heyward perceiving that, in fact, a crisis had
arrived
,
when acts were more required than words,
placed himself between the sisters, and drew them
swiftly forward, keeping the dim figure of their
leader
in his eye. It was soon apparent that Hawk-eye
had not magnified the power of the fog, for before
they had proceeded twenty yards, it was difficult for
the different individuals of the party to distinguish
each other, in the vapour.
They had made their little circuit to the left, and
were already inclining again towards the right,
having, as Heyward thought, got over nearly half the
distance to the friendly works, when his ears were
saluted
with the fierce summons, apparently within
twenty feet of them, of
Qui va la?
Push on! whispered the scout, once more
bending to the left.
Push on! repeated Heyward; when the
summons
was renewed by a dozen voices, each of which
seemed charged with threatening menaces.
C'est moi, cried Duncan, dragging, rather than
leading, those he supported, swiftly, onward.
Bte! qui? moi!
Un ami de la France.
Tu m'as plus l'air d'un
ennemi
de la France;
arrete! ou pardieu je te ferai ami du diable. Non!
feu; camarades; feu!
The order was instantly obeyed, and the fog was
stirred by the explosion of fifty muskets. Happily,
the aim was bad, and the bullets cut the air in a
direction
a little different from that taken by the
fugitives
;
though still so nigh them, that to the
unpractised
ears of David and the two maidens, it appeared as
if they whistled within a few inches of the organs. The
outcry was renewed, and the order, not only to fire
again, but to pursue, was too plainly audible. When
Heyward briefly explained the meaning of the words
they heard, Hawk-eye halted, and spoke with quick
decision and great firmness.
Let us deliver our fire, he said; they will
believe it a sortie, and give way; or will wait for
reinforcements.
The scheme was well conceived, but failed in its
effect. The instant the French heard their pieces,
it seemed as if the plain was alive with men, muskets
rattling along its whole extent, from the shores of the
lake to the farthest boundary of the woods.
We shall draw their entire army upon us, and
bring on a general assault, said Duncan. Lead
on my friend, for your own life, and ours!
The scout seemed willing to comply; but, in the
hurry of the moment, and in the change of position,
he had lost the direction. In vain he turned
either
cheek towards the light air; they felt equally
cool. In this dilemma, Uncas lighted on the furrow
of the cannon ball, where it had cut the ground in
three little, adjacent, ant-hills.
Give me the range! said Hawk-eye, bending
to catch a glimpse of the direction, and then
instantly
moving onward.
Cries, oaths, voices calling to each other, and the
reports of muskets, were now quick and incessant,
and, apparently, on every side of them. Suddenly,
a strong glare of light flashed across the scene, the
fog rolled upward in thick wreaths, and several
cannon
bleched across the plain, and the roar was thrown
heavily back from the bellowing echoes of the
mountain
.
'Tis from the fort! exclaimed Hawk-eye,
turning
short on his tracks; and we, like stricken fools,
were rushing to the woods, under the very knives of
the Maquas.
The instant their mistake was rectified, the whole
party retraced the error with the utmost diligence.
Duncan willingly relinquished the support of Cora
to the offered arm of Uncas, and Cora as readily
accepted the welcome assistance. Men, hot and
angry in the pursuit, were evidently on their
footsteps
,
and each instant threatened their capture, if
not their destruction.
Point de quartier, aux coquins! cried an eager
pursuer, who seemed to direct the operations of the
enemy.
Stand firm, and be ready, my gallant 60ths!
suddenly exclaimed a voice above them, in the deep
tones of authority; wait to see the enemy; fire
low, and sweep the glacis.
Father! father! exclaimed a piercing female
cry from out the mist; it is I! Alice! thy own
Elsie! spare, oh! save, your daughters!
Hold! shouted the former speaker, in the
awful
tones of parental agony, the sound reaching even
to the woods, and rolling back in solemn echo.
'Tis she! God has restored me my children!
Throw open the sally-port; to the field, 60ths, to
the field; pull not a trigger, lest ye kill my lambs!
Drive off these dogs of France with your steel.
Duncan heard the grating of the rusty hinges,
and darting to the spot, directed by the sound, he met
a long line of dark-red warriors, passing swiftly
towards
the glacis. He knew them for his own
battalion
of the royal Americans, and flying to their head,
soon swept every trace of his pursuers from before
the works.
For an instant, Cora and Alice had stood trembling
and bewildered by this unexpected desertion; but,
before either had leisure for speech, or even thought,
an officer of gigantie frame, whose locks were
bleached
with years and service, but whose air of military
grandeur had been rather softened than destroyed
by time, rushed out of the body of the mist, and
folded
them to his bosom, while large, scalding tears
rolled
down his pale and wrinkled cheeks, and he
exclaimed
,
in the peculiar accent of Scotland
For this I thank thee, Lord! Let danger come
as it will, thy servant is prepared!
CHAPTER XV.
Then go we in, to know his embassy;
Which I could, with a ready guess, declare,
Before the Frenchman speak a word of it.
King Henry
V.
The
few succeeding days were passed amid all the
privations, the uproar, and the dangers of the siege,
which was vigorously pressed by a power, against
whose approaches Munro possessed no competent
means of resistance. It appeared as if Webb, with
his army, which lay slumbering on the banks of the
Hudson, had utterly forgotten the strait to which his
brethren were reduced. Montcalm had filled the woods
of the portage with his savages, every yell and whoop
from whom rang through the British encampment,
chilling the hearts of men, who were already but too
much disposed to magnify the danger, with
additional
terror.
Not so, however, with the besieged. Animated
by the words, and stimulated by the examples of
their leaders, they had found their courage, and
maintained their ancient reputation, with a zeal that
did justice to the stern character of their commander.
As if satisfied with the toil of marching through the
wilderness to encounter his enemy, the French
general
,
though of approved skill, had neglected
to seize the adjacent mountains; whence the
besieged
might have been exterminated with
impunity
,
and which, in the more modern warfare of
the country, would not have been neglected for a
single
hour. This sort of contempt for eminences, or
rather dread of the labour of ascending them, might
have been termed the besetting weakness of the
warfare
of the period. It originated in the simplicity of
the Indian contests, in which, from the nature of the
combats, and the density of the forests, fortresses were
rare, and artillery next to useless. The carelessness
engendered by these usages, descended even to the
war of the revolution, and lost the states the
important
fortress of Ticonderoga, opening a way for
the army of Burgoyne, into what was then the bosom
of the country. We look back at this ignorance, or
infatuation, which ever it may be called, with
astonishment
,
knowing that the neglect of an eminence,
whose difficulties, like those of Mount Defiance, had
been so greatly exaggerated, would, at the present
time, prove fatal to the reputation of the engineer
who had planned the works at their base, or to that
of the general, whose lot it was to defend them.
The tourist, the valetudinarian, or the amateur of
the beauties of nature, who, in the train of his
four-in-hand
,
now rolls through the scenes we have
attempted
to describe, in quest of information, health,
or pleasure, or floats steadily towards his object on
those artificial waters, which have sprung up under
the administration of a statesman, who has dared to
stake his political character on the hazardous issue, is
not to suppose that his ancestors traversed those hills,
or struggled with the same currents with equal facility.
The transportation of a single heavy gun, was often
considered equal to a victory gained; if happily the
difficulties of the passage had not so far separated it
from its necessary concomitants, the ammunition, as
to render it no more than an useless tube of
unwieldy
iron.
The evils of this state of things pressed heavily on
the fortunes of the resolute Scotsman, who now
defended
William Henry. Though his adversary
neglected
the hills, he had planted his batteries with
judgment
on the plain, and caused them to be served with
vigour and skill. Against this assault, the besieged
could only oppose the imperfect and hasty
preparations
of a fortress in the wilderness, to whose mounds
those extended sheets of water, which stretched into
the Canadas, bore no friendly aid, while they opened
the way to their more fortunate enemies.
It was on the afternoon of the fifth day of the siege,
and the fourth of his own service in it, that Major
Heyward profited by a parley that had just been
beaten
,
by repairing to the ramparts of one of the water
bastions, to breathe the cool air from the lake, and to
take a survey of the progress of the siege. He was
alone, if the solitary sentinel who paced the mound
be excepted; for the artillerists had hastened also to
profit by the temporary suspension of their
arduous
duties. The evening was delightfully calm,
and the light air from the limpid water fresh and
soothing. It seemed as if, with the termination to
Vol. I. 21
the roar of artillery, and the plunging of shot, nature
had also seized the moment to assume her mildest and
most captivating form. The sun poured down his
parting glory on the scene, without the oppression of
those fierce rays that belong to the climate and the
season. The mountains looked green, and fresh, and
lovely; tempered with the milder light, or softened in
shadow, as thin vapours floated between them and
the sun. The numerous islands rested on the bosom
of the Horican, some low and sunken, as if imbedded
in the waters, and others appearing to hover above
the element, in little hillocks of green velvet; among
which the fishermen of the beleaguering army
peacefully
rowed their skiffs, or floated at rest on the
glassy mirror, in quiet pursuit of their game.
The scene was at once animated and still. All
that pertained to nature was sweet, or simply grand;
while those parts which depended on the temper and
movements of man, were in perfect unison.
Two little spotless flags were abroad, the one on a
salient angle of the fort, and the other on the advanced
battery of the besiegers; emblems of the truce which
existed, not only to the acts, but it would seem, also,
to the enmity of the combatants. Behind these,
again, swung, heavily opening and closing in silken
folds, the rival standards of England and France.
A hundred gay and thoughtless young Frenchmen
were drawing a net to the pebbly beach, within
dangerous
proximity to the sullen but silent cannon of the
fort, while the eastern mountain was sending back
the loud shouts and gay merriment that attended
their sport. Some were rushing eagerly to enjoy the
aquatic games of the lake, and others were already
toiling their way up the neighbouring hills, with the
restless curiosity of their nation. To all these sports
and pursuits, those of the enemy who watched the
besieged
,
and the besieged themselves, were, however,
merely the idle, though sympathizing spectators. Here
and there a picquet had, indeed, raised a song, or
mingled
in a dance, which had drawn the dusky savages
around them, from their lairs in the forest, in mute
astonishment. In short, every thing wore rather the
appearance of a day of pleasure, than of an hour
stolen from the dangers and toil of a bloody and
vindictive
warfare.
Duncan had stood in a musing attitude,
contemplating
this scene a few minutes, when his eyes were
directed
to the glacis in front of the sally-port, already
mentioned, by the sounds of approaching footsteps.
He walked to an angle of the bastion, and beheld the
scout advancing, under the custody of a French
officer
,
to the body of the fort. The countenance of
Hawk-eye was haggard and care-worn, and his air
dejected, as though he felt the deepest degradation at
having fallen into the power of his enemies. He was
without his favourite weapon, and his arms were even
bound behind him with thongs, made of the skin of a
deer. The arrival of flags, to cover the messengers of
summons, had occurred so often of late, that when
Heyward first threw his careless glance on this groupe,
he expected to see another of the officer of the
enemy
,
charged with a similar office; but the instant he
recognised the tall person, and still sturdy, though
downcast, features of his friend, the woodsman, he
started with surprise, and turned to descend from the
bastion into the bosom of the work.
The sounds of other voices, however, caught his
attention, and for a moment caused him to forget
his purpose. At the inner angle of the mound, he
met the sisters, walking along the parapet, in search,
like himself, of air and relief from confinement.
They had not met since that painful moment when
he deserted them, on the plain, only to assure their
safety. He had parted from them, worn with care,
and jaded with fatigue; he now saw them refreshed
and blooming, though still timid and anxious.
Under
such an inducement, it will cause no surprise,
that the young man lost sight, for a time, of other
objects
,
in order to address them. He was, however,
anticipated by the voice of the ardent and youthful
Alice.
Ah! thou truant! thou recreant knight! he who
abandons his damsels in the very lists, to abide the
fortunes of the fray! she cried, in affected
reproaches
,
which her beaming eyes and extended
hands so flatteringly denied. Here have we been
days, nay, ages, expecting you at our feet, imploring
mercy and forgetfulness of your craven backsliding,
or, I should rather say, back-runningfor verily you
fled in a manner that no stricken deer, as our worthy
friend the scout would say, could equal!
You know that Alice means our thanks and our
blessings, added the graver and more thoughtful
Cora. In truth, we have a little wondered why
you should so rigidly absent yourself from a place,
where the gratitude of the daughters might receive
the support of a parent's thanks.
Your father himself could tell you, that though
absent from your presence, I have not been
altogether
forgetful of your safety, returned the young
man; the mastery of yonder village of huts,
pointing
to the neighbouring entrenched camp, has been
keenly disputed; and he who holds it, is sure to be
possessed
of this fort, and that which it contains. My days
and my nights have all been passed there, since we
separated, because I thought that duty called me
thither
.
But, he added, with an air of chagrin, which
he endeavoured, though unsuccessfully, to conceal,
had I been aware, that what I then believed a
soldier's
conduct, could be so construed, shame would
have been added to the list of reasons.
Heyward!Duncan! exclaimed Alice, bending
forward to read his half-averted countenance, until a
lock of her golden hair rested in rich contrast on her
flushed cheek, and nearly concealed the tear that
had started to her anxious eye; did I think this
idle tongue of mine had pained you, I would silence
it for ever! Cora can say, if Cora would, how
justly we have prized your services, and how deep
I had almost said, how ferventis our gratitude!
And will Cora attest the truth of this? cried
Duncan, suffering the cloud to be chased from his
countenance by a smile of open pleasure. What
says our graver sister? Will she find an excuse for
the neglect of the knight, in the ardour of a soldier?
Cora made no immediate answer, but turned her
21*
face toward the water, as if looking on the plain
sheet of the Horican. When she did bend her dark
eyes on the young man, they were yet filled with an
expression of anguish that at once drove every
thought but that of kind solicitude from his mind.
You are not well, dearest Miss Munro! he
exclaimed
;
we have trifled, while you are in
suffering
!
'Tis nothing, she answered, gently refusing his
offered support, with feminine reserve. That I
cannot see the sunny side of the picture of life, like
this artless but ardent enthusiast, she added, laying
her hand lightly, but affectionately, on the arm of her
anxious sister, is the penalty of experience, and,
perhaps, the misfortune of my nature. See, she
continued, with an effort, as if determined to shake
off every infirmity, in a sense of duty; look around
you, Major Heyward, and tell me what a prospect is
this, for the daughter of a soldier, whose greatest
happiness
is his honour and his military renown!
Neither ought nor shall be tarnished by
circumstances
,
over which he has had no control, Duncan
warmly replied. But your words recall me to
my own duty. I go now to your gallant father, to
hear his determination in matters of the last moment
to our defence. God bless you in every fortune,
nobleCoraI may, and must call you. She
frankly
gave him her hand, though her lips quivered, and
her cheeks gradually became of an ashy paleness.
In every fortune, I know you will be an ornament
and honour to your sex. Alice, adieuhis tones
changed from admiration to tendernessadieu,
Alice; we shall soon meet again; as conquerors, I
trust, and amid rejoicings!
Without waiting for an answer from either of the
maidens, the young man threw himself down the
grassy steps of the bastion, and moving rapidly across
the parade, he was quickly in the presence of their
father. Munro was pacing his narrow apartment
with a disturbed air, and gigantic strides, as Duncan
entered.
You have anticipated my wishes, Major
Heyward
,
he said; I was about to request this
favour
.
I am sorry to see, sir, that the messenger I so
warmly recommended, has returned in custody of
the French! I hope there is no reason to distrust
his fidelity?
The fidelity of the `Long Rifle' is well known to
me, returned Munro, and is above suspicion;
though his usual good fortune seems, at last, to have
failed. Montcalm has got him, and with the
accursed
politeness of his nation, he has sent him in with
a doleful tale, of `knowing how I valued the fellow, he
could not think of retaining him.' A jesuitical way,
that, Major Duncan Heyward, of telling a man of his
misfortunes!
But the general and his succour?
Did ye look to the south as ye entered, and
could ye not see them! said the old soldier,
laughing
bitterly. Hoot! hoot! you're an impatient boy,
sir, and cannot give the gentlemen leisure for their
march!
They are coming then? The scout has said as
much?
When? and by what path? for the dunce has
omitted to tell me this! There is a letter, it would
seem, too; and that is the only agreeable part of the
matter. For the customary attentions of your
Marquis
of MontcalmI warrant me, Duncan, that he of
Lothian would buy a dozen such marquessatesbut,
if the news of the letter were bad, the gentility of this
French monsieur would certainly compel him to let
us know it!
He keeps the letter, then, sir, while he releases
the messenger?
Ay, that does he, and all for the sake of what
you call your `bonhommie.' I would venture, if the
truth was known, the fellow's grandfather taught the
noble science of dancing!
But what says the scout? he has eyes and ears,
and a tongue! what verbal report does he make?
Oh! sir, he is not wanting in natural organs, and
he is free to tell all that he has seen and heard. The
whole amount is this: there is a fort of his majesty's
on the banks of the Hudson, called Edward, in
honour
of his gracious highness of York, you'll know,
and it is well filled with armed men, as such a work
should be!
But was there no movement, no signs, of any
intention to advance to our relief?
There were the morning and evening parades,
and when one of the provincial loonsyou'll know,
Duncan, your're half a Scotsman yourselfwhen
one of them dropped his powder over his porretch, if
it touched the coals, it just burnt! Then suddenly
changing his bitter, ironical manner, to one more
grave and thoughtful, he continued; and yet there
might, and must be, something in that letter, which it
would be well to know!
Our decision should be speedy, said Duncan,
gladly availing himself of this change of humour, to
press the more important objects of their
interview
;
I cannot conceal from you, sir, that the camp
will not be much longer tenable; and I am sorry to
add, that things appear no better in the fort;more
than half our guns are bursted.
And how should it be otherwise! some were
fished from the bottom of the lake; some have been
rusting in the woods since the discovery of the
country
;
and some were never guns at allmere
privateersmen's
playthings! Do you think, sir, you can
have Woolich Warren in the midst of a wilderness;
three thousand miles from Great Britain!
Our walls are crumbling about our ears, and
provisions begin to fail us, continued Heyward,
without regarding this new burst of indignation;
even the men show signs of discontent and alarm.
Major Heyward, said Munro, turning to his
youthful associate with all the dignity of his years
and superior rank; I should have served his
majesty
for half a century, and earned these gray hairs,
in vain, were I ignorant of all you say, and of the
pressing nature of our circumstances; still, there is
every thing due to the honour of the king's arms,
and something to ourselves. While there is hope of
succour, this fortress will I defend, though it be to be
done with pebbles gathered on the lake shore. It is
a sight of the letter, therefore, that we want, that we
may know the intentions of the man, the Earl of
Loudon
has left among us as his substitute?
And can I be of service in the matter.
Sir, you can; the Marquis of Montcalm has, in
addition to his other civilities, invited me to a
personal
interview between these works and his own
camp; in order, as he says, to impart some
additional
information. Now, I think it would not be
wise to show any undue solicitude to meet him, and
I would employ you, an officer of rank, as my
substitute
;
for it would but ill comport with the honour of
Scotland, to let it be said, one of her gentlemen was
outdone in civility, by a native of any other country
on earth!
Without assuming the supererogatory task of
entering
into a discussion of the comparative merits of
national
courtesy, Duncan cheerfully assented to
supply
the place of the veteran, in the approaching
interview
.
A long and confidential communication now
succeeded, during which the young man received
some additional insight into his duty, from the
experience
and native acuteness of his commander, and
then the former took his leave.
As Duncan could only act as the representative of
the commandant of the fort, the ceremonies which
should have accompanied a meeting between the
heads of the adverse forces, were of course dispensed
with. The truce still existed, and with a roll and
beat of the drum, and covered by a little white flag,
Duncan left the sally-port, within ten minutes after
his instructions were ended. He was received by
the French officer in advance, with the usual
formalities
,
and immediately accompanied to the distant
marquee of the renowned soldier, who lead the forces
of France.
The general of the enemy received the youthful
messenger, surrounded by his principal officers, and
by a swarthy band of the native chiefs, who had
followed
him to the field, with the warriors of their
several
tribes. Heyward paused short, when, in
glancing
his eyes rapidly over the dark groupe of the
latter
,
he beheld the malignant countenance of Magua,
regarding him with the calm but sullen attention
which marked the expression of that subtle
savage
.
A slight exclamation of surprise even burst
from the lips of the young man; but, instantly
recollecting
his errand, and the presence in which he
stood, he suppressed every appearance of emotion,
and turned to the hostile leader, who had already
advanced
a step to receive him.
The Marquis of Montcalm was, at the period of
which we write, in the flower of his age, and it may
be added, in the zenith of his fortunes. But even
in that enviable situation, he was affable, and
distinguished
as much for his attention to the forms of
courtesy
,
as for that chivalrous courage, which, only two
short years afterwards, induced him to throw away
his life, on the plains of Abraham. Duncan, in
turning
his eyes from the malign expression of Magua,
suffered them to rest with pleasure on the smiling
and polished features, and the noble, military air of
the French general.
Monsieur, said the latter, J'ai beaucoup de
plaisir bah! o est cet interprte?
Je crois, monsieur, qu'il ne sera pas ncessaire,
Heyward modestly replied; je parle un peu
Franais
.
Ah! j'en suis bien aise, said Montcalm, taking
Duncan familiarly by the arm, and leading him deep
into the marquee, a little out of ear-shot; je dteste
ces fripons l; on ne sait jamais sur quel pi, on est
avec eux. Eh, bien! monsieur, he continued, still
speaking in French; though I should have been
proud of receiving your commandant, I am very
happy
that he has seen proper to employ an officer so
distinguished
,
and who, I am sure, is so amiable, as
yourself
.
Duncan bowed low, pleased with the compliment,
in spite of a most heroic determination to suffer no
artifice to lure him into a forgetfulness of the
interests
of his prince; and Montcalm, after a pause of a
moment, as if to collect his thoughts, proceeded
Your commandant is a brave man, and well
qualified to repel my assaults. Mais, monsieur, is
it not time to begin to take more counsel of
humanity
,
and less of your own courage? The one as
strongly characterizes the hero, as the other!
We consider the qualities as inseparable,
returned
Duncan, smiling; but, while we find in the
vigour of your excellency, every motive to stimulate
the one, we can, as yet, see no particular call for the
exercise of the other.
Montcalm, in his turn, slightly bowed, but it was
with the air of a man too practised to remember the
language of flattery. After musing a moment, he
added
It is possible my glasses have deceived me, and
that your works resist our cannon better than I had
supposed. You know our force?
Our accounts vary, said Duncan, carelessly;
the highest, however, has not exceeded twenty
thousand
men.
The Frenchman bit his lip, and fastened his eyes
keenly on the other, as if to read his thoughts; then,
with a readiness peculiar to himself, he continued, as
if assenting to the truth of an enumeration, which he
knew was not credited by his visiter.
It is a poor compliment to the vigilance of us
soldiers
,
monsieur, that, do what we will, we never can
conceal our numbers. If it were to be done at all,
one would believe it might succeed in these woods.
Though you think it too soon to listen to the calls of
humanity, he added, smiling, archly, I may be
permitted to believe that gallantry is not forgotten by
one so young as yourself. The daughters of the
commandant, I learn, have passed into the fort,
since it was invested?
It is true, monsieur; but so far from weakening
our efforts, they set us an example of courage in their
own fortitude. Were nothing but resolution
necessary
to repel so accomplished a soldier, as M. de
Montcalm, I would gladly trust the defence of
William
Henry to the elder of those ladies.
We have a wise ordinance in our Salique laws,
which says, `the crown of France shall never descend
the lance to the distaff,'  said Montcalm, dryly, and
with a little hauteur; but, instantly adding, with
his former frank and easy air, as all the nobler
Vol.. I. 22
qualities are hereditary, I can easily credit you; though,
as I said before, courage has its limits, and humanity
must not be forgotten. I trust, monsieur, you come
authorized to treat for the surrender of the place?
Has your excellency found our defence so
feeble
,
as to believe the measure necessary!
I should be sorry to have the defence protracted
in such a manner, as to irritate my red friends there,
continued Montcalm, glancing his eyes at the groupe
of grave and attentive Indians, without attending to
the other's question; I find it difficult, even now,
to limit them to the usages of war.
Heyward was silent; for a painful recollection of
the dangers he had so recently escaped came over
his mind, and recalled the images of those defenceless
beings, who had shared in all his sufferings.
Ces messieurs l, said Montcalm, following up
the advantage which he conceived he had gained,
are most formidable when baffled; and it is
unnecessary
to tell you, with what difficulty they are
restrained
in their anger. Eh bien, monsieur! shall
we speak of the terms of the surrender?
I fear your excellency has been deceived as to
the strength of William Henry, and the resources of
its garrison!
I have not set down before Quebec, but an
earthen
work, that is defended by twenty-three hundred
gallant men, was the laconic, though polite reply.
Our mounds are earthen, certainlynor are they
seated on the rocks of Cape Diamond;but they
stand on that shore which proved so destructive to
Dieskau, and his brave army. There is also a
powerful
force within a few hours march of us, which we
account upon as part of our means of defence.
Some six or eight thousand men, returned
Montcalm, with much apparent indifference, whom
their leader, wisely, judges to be safer in their works,
than in the field.
It was now Heyward's turn to bite his lip with
vexation, as the other so coolly alluded to a force
which the young man knew to be overrated. Both
mused a little while in silence, when Montcalm
renewed
the conversation, in a way that showed he
believed the visit of his guest was, solely, to propose
terms of capitulation. On the other hand,
Heyward
began to throw sundry inducements in the way
of the French general, to betray the discoveries he
had made through the intercepted letter. The
artifice
of neither, however, succeeded; and, after a
protracted
and fruitless interview, Duncan took his
leave, favourably impressed with an opinion of the
courtesy and talents of the enemy's captain, but as
ignorant of what he came to learn, as when he arrived.
Montcalm followed him as far as the entrance of the
marquee, renewing his invitations to the commandant
of the fort, to give him an immediate meeting in the
open ground, between the two armies.
There they separated, and Duncan returned to
the advanced post of the French, accompanied as
before
;
whence he instantly proceeded to the fort, and
to the quarters of his own commander.
CHAPTER XIV.
Edg.
Before you fight the battle, ope this letter.
Lear
.
Major
Heyward found Munro attended only by
his daughters. Alice sate upon his knee, parting the
gray hairs on the forehead of the old man, with her
delicate fingers; and whenever he affected to frown
on her trifling, appeasing his assumed anger, by
pressing her ruby lips fondly on his wrinkled brow.
Cora was seated nigh them, a calm and amused
looker-on
;
regarding the wayward movements of her
more youthful sister, with that species of maternal
fondness, which characterised her love for Alice.
Not only the dangers through which they had passed,
but those which still impended above them,
appeared
to be momentarily forgotten, in the soothing
indulgence
of such a family meeting. It seemed as if they
had profited by the short truce, to devote an instant
to the purest and best affections: the daughters
forgetting
their fears, and the veteran his cares, in the
stillness and security of the moment. Of this scene,
Duncan, who, in his eagerness to report his arrival,
had entered unannounced, stood many moments an
unobserved and a delighted spectator. But the quick
and dancing eyes of Alice soon caught a glimpse of his
figure, reflected from a glass, and she sprang
blushing
from her father's knee, exclaiming aloud, in her
surprise
Major Heyward!
What of the lad? demanded her father; I
have sent him to crack a little with the Frenchman.
Ha! sir, you are young, and your're nimble! Away
with you, ye baggage; as if there were not troubles
enough for a soldier, without having his camp filled
with such prattling hussies as yourself!
Alice laughingly followed her sister, who instantly
led the way from an apartment, where she perceived
their presence was no longer desirable. Munro,
instead
of demanding the result of the young man's
mission, paced the room for a few moments, with his
hands behind his back, and his head inclined towards
the floor, like a man lost in deep thought. At length,
he raised his eyes, glistening with a father's fondness,
and exclaimed
They are a pair of excellent girls, Heyward, and
such as any one may boast of!
You are not now to learn my opinion of your
daughters, Colonel Munro.
True, lad, true, interrupted the impatient old
man; you were about opening your mind more
fully on that matter the day you got in; but I did not
think it becoming in an old soldier to be talking of
nuptial blessings, and wedding jokes, when the
enemies
of his king were likely to be unbidden guests
at the feast! But I was wrong, Duncan, boy, I was
wrong there; and I am now ready to hear what you
have to say.
Notwithstanding the pleasure your assurance
22*
gives me, dear sir, I have, just now, a message from
Montcalm
Let the Frenchman, and all his host, go to the
devil, sir! exclaimed the veteran, frowning
severely
.
He is not yet master of William Henry, nor
shall he ever be, provided Webb proves himself the
man he should. No, sir! thank heaven, we are not
yet in such a strait, that it can be said, Munro is too
much pressed to discharge the little domestic duties
of his own family! Your mother was the only child
of my bosom friend, Duncan; and I'll just give you a
hearing, though all the knights of St. Louis were in
a body at the sally-port, with the French saint at
their head, craving to speak a word, under favour.
A pretty degree of knighthood, sir, is that which can
be bought with sugar-hogsheads! and then your
two-penny
marquessates! The Thistle is the order for
dignity
and antiquity; the veritable `nemo me impune
lacessit' of chivalry! Ye had ancestors in that
degree
,
Duncan, and they were an ornament to the
nobles of Scot and.
Heyward, who perceived that his superior took a
malicious pleasure in exhibiting his contempt for the
message of the French general, was fain to humour
a spleen that he knew would be short lived; he,
therefore, replied with as much indifference as he
could assume on such a subject
My request, as you know, sir, went so far as to
presume to the honour of being your son.
Ay, boy, you found words to make yourself very
plainly comprehended! But, let me ask ye, sir; have
you been as intelligible to the girl?
On my honour, no, exclaimed Duncan,
warmly
;
there would have been an abuse of a confided
trust, had I taken advantage of my situation, for such
a purpose!
Your notions are those of a gentleman, Major
Heyward, and well enough in their place. But Cora
Munro is a maiden too discreet, and of a mind too
elevated and improved, to need the guardianship,
even of a father.
Cora!
AyCora! we are talking of your pretensions to
Miss Munro, are we not, sir?
III, was not conscious of having
mentioned
her name, said Duncan, stammering through
embarrassment
.
And, to marry whom, then, did you wish my
consent, Major Heyward, demanded the old
soldier
,
erecting himself in all the dignity of offended
feeling.
You have another, and not less lovely child.
Alice! exclaimed the father, in an astonishment
equal to that with which Duncan had just repeated
the name of her sister.
Such was the direction of my wishes, sir.
The young man awaited in silence, the result of
the extraordinary effect produced by a
communication
which, as it now appeared, was so unexpected.
For several minutes, Munro paced the chamber with
long and rapid strides, his rigid features working
convulsively
,
and every faculty seemingly absorbed in
the musings of his own mind. At length, he paused
directly in front of Heyward, and riveting his eyes
upon those of the other, he said, with a lip that
quivered
violently with his emotions
Duncan Heyward, I have loved you for the
sake of him whose blood is in your veins; I have
loved you for your own good qualities; and I have
loved you, because I thought you would contribute
to the happiness of my child. But all this love
would turn to hatred, were I assured, that what I so
much apprehend is true!
God forbid that any act or thought of mine should
lead to such a change! exclaimed the young man,
whose eye never quailed under the penetrating look
it encountered. Without adverting to the
impossibility
of the other's comprehending those feelings
which were hid in his own bosom, Munro suffered
himself to be appeased by the unaltered countenance
he met, and with a voice sensibly softened, he
continued
You would be my son, Duncan, and you're
ignorant
of the history of the man you wish to call
your father. Sit ye down, young man, and I will open
to you the wounds of a seared heart, in as few words
as may be suitable.
By this time, the message of Montcalm was as
much forgotten by him who bore it, as by the man
for whose ears it was intended. Each drew a chair,
and while the veteran communed a few moments
with his own thoughts, apparently in sadness, the
youth suppressed his impatience in a look and
attitude
of respectful attention. At length, the former
spoke
You'll know, already, Major Heyward, that my
family was both ancient and honourable,
commenced
the Scotsman, though it might not
altogether
be endowed with that amount of wealth, that
should correspond with its degree. I was, may be,
such an one as yourself, when I plighted my faith to
Alice Graham; the only child of a neighbouring laird
of some estate. But the connexion was disagreeable
to her father, on more accounts than my poverty. I
did, therefore, what an honest man should; restored
the maiden her troth, and departed the country, in
the service of my king. I had seen many regions,
and had shed much blood in different lands, before
duty called me to the islands of the West Indies.
There it was my lot to form a connexion with one
who in time became my wife, and the mother of
Cora. She was the daughter of a gentleman of those
isles, by a lady, whose misfortune it was, if you will,
said the old man, proudly, to be descended,
remotely
,
from that unfortunate class, who are so
basely
enslaved to administer to the wants of a luxurious
people! Ay, sir, that is a curse entailed on Scotland,
by her unnatural union with a foreign and trading
people. But could I find a man among them, who
would dare to reflect her descent on my child, he
should feel the weight of a father's anger! Ha!
Major Heyward, you are yourself born at the south,
where these unfortunate beings are considered of a
race inferior to your own!
'Tis most unfortunately true, sir, said Duncan,
unable any longer to prevent his eyes from sinking to
the floor in embarrassment.
And you cast it on my child as a reproash! You
scorn to mingle the blood of the Heywards, with one
so degradedlovely and virtuous though she be?
fiercely demanded the jealous parent.
Heaven protect me from a prejudice so unworthy
of my reason! returned Duncan, at the same time
conscious of such a feeling, and that as deeply rooted
as if it had been engrafted in his nature. The
sweetness
,
the beauty, the witchery of your younger
daughter
,
Colonel Munro, might explain my motives,
without
imputing to me this injustice.
Ye are right, sir, returned the old man, again
changing his tones to those of gentleness, or rather
softness
;
the girl is the image of what her mother was
at her years, and before she had become acquainted
with grief. When death deprived me of my wife, I
returned to Scotland, enriched by the marriage; and
would you think it, Duncan! the suffering angel had
remained in the heartless state of celibacy twenty long
years, and that for the sake of a man who could
forget
her! She did more, sir; she overlooked my want
of faith, and all difficulties being now removed, she
took me for her husband.
And became the mother of Alice! exclaimed
Duncan, with an eagerness, that might have proved
dangerous, at a moment when the thoughts of Munro
were less occupied than at present.
She did, indeed, said the old man, the muscles
of his face working powerfully, as he proceeded,
and dearly did she pay for the blessing she
bestowed
.
But she is a saint in heaven, sir; and it ill
becomes
one whose foot rests on the grave, to mourn a
lot so blessed. I had her but a single year, though;
a short term of happiness, for one who had seen
her youth fade in hopeless pining!
There was something so commanding, if not awful,
in the distress of the old man, that Heyward did not
dare to venture a syllable of consolation. Munro sat
utterly unconscious of the other's presence, his
features
exposed and working with the anguish of his
regrets
,
while heavy tears fell from his eyes, and rolled
unheeded from his cheeks to the floor. At length he
moved, as if suddenly recovering his recollection;
when he arose, and taking a single turn across the
room, he approached his companion with an air of
high military grandeur, and demanded
Have you not, Major Heyward, some
communication
,
that I should hear, from the Marquis de
Montcalm
?
Duncan started, in his turn, and immediately
commenced
,
in an embarrassed voice, to repeat the
half-forgotten
message. It is unnecessary to dwell upon
the evasive, though polite manner, with which the
French general had eluded every attempt of
Heyward
to worm from him the purport of the
communication
he had proposed making, or on the decided,
though still polished message, by which he now gave
his enemy to understand, that unless he chose to
receive
it in person, he should not receive it at all.
As Munro listened to the lengthened detail of
Duncan
,
the excited feelings of the father gradually gave
way before the obligations of his station, and when
the other was done, he saw before him nothing but
the veteran, swelling with the wounded feelings of a
soldier.
You have said enough, Major Heyward!
exclaimed
the angry old man; enough to make a
volume
of commentary on French civility! Here has
this gentleman invited me to a conference, and when
I send him a capable substitute, for ye're all that
Duncan, though your years are but few, he answers
me with a riddle!
He may have thought less favourably of the
substitute
,
my dear sir, returned Duncan, smiling; and
you will remember that the invitation, which he now
repeats, was to the commandant of the works, and
not to his second.
Well, sir, is not a substitute clothed with all the
power and dignity of him who grants the commission!
He wishes to confer with Munro! Faith, sir, I have
much inclination to indulge the man, if it should only
be to let him behold the firm countenance we
maintain
,
in spite of his numbers and his summons!
There might be no bad policy in such a stroke, young
man.
Duncan, who believed it of the last importance,
that they should speedily come at the contents of the
letter borne by the scout, gladly encouraged this idea,
saying
Without doubt, he could gather no confidence
by witnessing our indifference.
You never said truer word. I could wish, sir,
that he would visit the works in open day, and in the
form of a storming party: that is the least failing
method of proving the countenance of an enemy, and
would be far preferable to the battering system he
has chosen. The beauty and manliness of warfare
has been much deformed, Major Heyward, by the
arts of your Monsieur Vauban. Our ancestors were
far above such scientific cowardice!
It may be very true, sir; but we are, now, obliged
to repel art by art. What is your pleasure in the
matter of the interview?
I will meet the Frenchman, and that without fear
or delay; promptly, sir, as becomes a servant of my
royal master. Go, Major Heyward, and give them a
flourish of the music, and send out a messenger to let
them know who is coming. We will follow with a
small guard, for such respect is due to one who holds
the honour of his king in keeping; and, hark'ee,
Duncan, he added, in a half whisper, though they
were alone, it may be prudent to have some aid at
hand, in case there should be treachery at the bottom
of it all.
The young man availed himself of this order, to
quit the apartment; and, as the day was fast coming
to a close, he hastened, without delay, to make the
necessary arrangements. A very few minutes only
were necessary to parade a few files, and to despatch
an orderly with a flag, to announce the approach of
the commandant of the fort. When Duncan had
done both these, he led the guard to the sally-port,
near which he found his superior already, waiting his
appearance. As soon as the usual ceremonials of a
military departure were observed, the veteran, and
his more youthful companion, left the fortress,
attended
by the escort.
They had proceeded only a hundred yards from
the works, when the little array which attended the
French general to the conference, was seen issuing
Vol. I. 23
from the hollow way, which formed the bed of a
brook, that ran between the batteries of the besiegers
and the fort. From the moment that Munro left his
own works, to appear in front of his enemies, his air
had been grand, and his step and countenance highly
military. The instant he caught a glimpse of the
white plume that waved in the hat of Montcalm, his
eye lighted with the consciousness of his own daring,
and age no longer appeared to possess any influence
over his vast and still muscular person.
Speak to the boys to be watchful, sir, he said,
in an under tone, to Duncan; and to look well to
their flints and steel, for one is never safe with a
servant
of these Louis; at the same time, we will show
them the front of men in deep security. Ye'll
understand
me, Major Heyward!
He was interrupted by the clamour of a drum from
the approaching Frenchmen, which was immediately
answered, when each party pushed an orderly in
advance
,
bearing a white flag, and the wary Scotsman
halted, with his guard close at his back. As soon as
this slight salutation had passed, Montcalm moved
towards
them with a quick but graceful step, baring
his head to the veteran, and dropping his spotless
plume nearly to the earth, in courtesy. If the air of
Munro was more commanding and manly, it wanted
both the ease and insinuating polish of the
Frenchman
.
Neither spoke for a few moments, each
regarding
the other with curious and interested eyes.
Then, as became his superior rank, and the nature
of the interview, Montcalm first broke the silence.
After uttering the usual words of greeting to Munro,
he turned to Duncan, and continued, with a smile of
recognition, speaking always in French
I am rejoiced, monsieur, that you have given us
the pleasure of your company on this occasion.
There will be no necessity to employ an ordinary
interpreter
,
for in your hands I feel the same security,
as if I spoke your language myself.
Duncan acknowledged the compliment, when
Montcalm, turning to his guard, which, in imitation of
that of their enemies, pressed close upon him, he
continued
En arriere, mes enfansil fait chaud;
retirezvous
un peu.
Before Major Heyward would imitate this proof of
confidence, he glanced his eyes around the plain, and
beheld, with uneasiness, the numerous dusky groupes
of savages, who looked out from the margin of the
surrounding woods, curious spectators of the pending
interview.
Monsieur de Montcalm will readily acknowledge
the difference in our situation, he said, with some
embarrassment, pointing, at the same time, towards
those dangerous foes, who were to be seen in almost
every direction. Were we to dismiss our guard, we
should stand here at the mercy of our enemies.
Monsieur, you have the plighted faith of `un
gentil-homme
Francais,' for your safety, returned
Montcalm
,
laying his hand impressively on his heart; and
it should suffice.
It shall. Fall back, Duncan added to the
officer
who led the escort; fall back, sir, beyond
hearing
,
and wait for orders.
Munro witnessed this movement with manifest
uneasiness
;
nor did he fail to demand an instant
explanation
.
Is it not our interest, sir, to betray no distrust?
retorted Duncan. Monsieur de Montcalm pledges
his word for our safety, and I have ordered the men
to withdraw a little, in order to prove how much we
depend on his assurance.
It may be all right, sir, but I have no
overweening
reliance on the faith of these marquesses, or
marquis
,
as they call themselves. Their patents of
nobility
are too common, to be certain that they bear
the seal of true honour.
You forget, dear sir, that we confer with an
officer
,
distinguished alike in Europe and America, for
his deeds. From a soldier of his reputation we can
have nothing to apprehend.
The old man made a gesture of resignation, though
his rigid features still betrayed his obstinate adherence
to a distrust, which he derived from a sort of
hereditary
contempt of his enemy, rather than from any
present signs, which might warrant so uncharitable
a feeling. Montcalm waited, patiently, until this
little
dialogue in demi-voice was ended, when he drew
nigher, and opened the subject of their conference.
I have solicited this interview from your
superior
,
monsieur, he said, because I believe he
will allow himself to be persuaded, that he has
already
done every thing which is necessary for the honour
of his prince, and will now listen to the admonitions
of humanity. I will forever bear testimony that his
resistance has been gallant, and was continued, so
long as there was any hope.
When this opening was translated to Munro, he
answered with dignity, but with sufficient courtesy,
However I may prize such testimony from
Monsieur
Montcalm, it will be more valuable when it shall
be better merited.
The French general smiled, as Duncan gave him
the purport of this reply, and observed
What is now so freely accorded to approved
courage
,
may be refused to useless obstinacy. Monsieur
would wish to see my camp, and witness, for himself,
our numbers, and the impossibility of his resisting
them with success?
I know that the king of France is well served,
returned the unmoved Scotsman, as soon as Duncan
ended his translation; but my own royal master has
as many and as faithful troops.
Though not at hand, fortunately for us, said
Montcalm, without waiting, in his ardour, for the
interpreter
.
There is a destiny in war, to which a
brave man knows how to submit, with the same
courage
that he faces his foes.
Had I been conscious that Monsieur Montcalm
was master of the English, I would have spared
myself
the trouble of so awkward a translation, said
the vexed Duncan, dryly; remembering instantly his
recent by-play with Munro.
Your pardon, monsieur, rejoined the
Frenchman
,
suffering a slight colour to appear on his dark
cheek. There is a vast difference between
understanding
and speaking a foreign tongue; you will,
23*
therefore, please to assist me still. Then after a
short pause, he added, These hills afford us every
opportunity of reconnoitring your works, messieurs,
and I am possibly as well acquainted with their weak
condition as you can be yourselves.
Ask the French general if his glasses can reach to
the Hudson, said Munro, proudly; and if he
knows when and where to expect the army of Webb.
Let gnral Webb be his own interpreter,
returned
the politic Montcalm, suddenly extending an
open letter towards Munro, as he spoke; you will
there learn, monsieur, that his movements are not
likely to prove embarrassing to my army.
The veteran seized the offered paper without
waiting
for Duncan to translate the speech, and with an
eagerness that betrayed how important he deemed
its contents. As his eye passed heavily over the
words, his countenance gradually changed from its
look of military pride, to one of deep chagrin; his
lip began to quiver; and, as he suffered the paper
to fall from his hand, his head dropped upon his
chest, like that of a man whose hopes were all
withered at a single blow. Duncan caught the
letter from the ground, and without apology for the
liberty he took, he read, at a glance, its cruel
purport
.
Their common superior, so far from
encouraging
them to resist, advised a speedy surrender,
urging, in the plainest language, as a reason, the
utter impossibility of his sending a single man to
their rescue.
Here is no deception! exclaimed Duncan,
examining
the billet both inside and out; this is the
signature of Webb, and must be the captured
letter
!
The man has betrayed me! Munro at length
bitterly exclaimed; he has brought dishonour to the
door of one, where disgrace was never before known
to dwell, and shame has he heaped heavily on my
gray hairs!
Say not so! cried Duncan; we are yet
masters
of the fort, and of our honour! Let us then sell
our lives at such a rate, as shall make our enemies
believe
the purchase too dear!
Boy, I thank thee! exclaimed the old man,
rousing himself from his stupor; you have, for once,
reminded Munro of his duty. We will go back, and
dig our graves behind those ramparts!
Messieurs, said Montcalm, advancing towards
them a step, in his generous interest; you little
know Louis de St. Vran, if you believe him
capable
of profiting by this letter, to humble brave men,
or to build up a dishonest reputation for himself.
Listen to my terms before you leave me.
What says the Frenchman, demanded the
veteran
,
sternly; does he make a merit of having
captured a scout, with a note from head-quarters?
Sir, he had better raise this siege, and go to sit down
before Edward, if he wishes to frighten his enemy
with words!
Duncan explained the other's meaning.
Monsieur de Montcalm, we will hear you, the
veteran added, more calmly, as Duncan ended.
To retain the fort is now impossible, said his
liberal enemy; it is necessary to the interests of
my master, that it should be destroyed; but, as for
yourselves, and your brave comrades, there is no
privilege dear to a soldier that shall be denied.
Our colours? demanded Heyward.
Carry them to England, and show them to your
king.
Our arms!
Keep them; none can use them better!
Our march; the surrender of the place?
Shall all be done in a way most honourable to
yourselves.
Duncan now turned to explain these proposals to
his commander, who heard him with amazement, and
a sensibility that was deeply touched by such unusual
and unexpected generosity.
Go you, Duncan, he said; go with this
marquess
,
as indeed marquess he should be; go to his
marquee, and arrange it all. I have lived to see two
things in my old age, that never did I expect to
behold. An Englishman afraid to support a friend,
and a Frenchman too honest to profit by his
advantage
!
So saying, the veteran again dropped his head to
his chest, and returned slowly towards the fort,
exhibiting
,
in the dejection of his air, to the anxious
garrison
,
a harbinger of evil tidings.
Duncan remained to settle the terms of the
capitulation
.
He was seen to re-enter the works during
the first watches of the night, and immediately after
a private conference with the commandant, to leave
them again. It was then openly announced, that
hostilities must ceaseMunro having signed a treaty,
by which the place was to be yielded to the enemy,
with the morning; the garrison to retain their arms,
their colours, and their baggage, and consequently,
according to military opinion, their honour.
CHAPTER XVII.
Weave we the woof. The thread is spun.
The web is wove. The work is done.
Gray
The
hostile armies, who lay in the wilds of the
Horican, passed the night of the ninth of August, 1757,
much in the manner that would have prevailed, had
they encountered on the fairest field of Europe.
While the conquered were still, sullen and dejected,
the victors triumphed. But, there are limits, alike,
to grief and joy; and long before the dead watches of
the morning came, the stillness of those boundless
woods was only broken, by a gay call from some
exulting
young Frenchman of the advanced piquets, or
a menacing challenge from the fort, which sternly
forbade the approach of any hostile footsteps before
the stipulated moment should arrive. Even these
occasional threatening sounds ceased to be heard in
that dull hour which precedes the day, at which
period
a listener might have sought, in vain, any
evidence
of the presence of those armed powers, that
then slumbered on the shores of the `holy lake.'
It was during these moments of deep silence, that
the canvass which concealed the entrance to a
spacious
marquee, in the French encampment, was
shoved aside, and a man issued from beneath the
drapery into the open air. He was enveloped in a
cloak that might have been intended as a protection
from the chilling damps of the woods, but which
served
equally well, as a mantle, to conceal his person.
He was permitted to pass the grenadier, who watched
over the slumbers of the French commander,
without
interruption, the man making the usual salute,
which betokens military deference, as the other
passed
swiftly through the little city of tents, in the
direction
of William Henry. Whenever this unknown
individual encountered one of the numberless
sentinels
,
who crossed his path, his answer was prompt,
and as it appeared satisfactory; for he was uniformly
allowed to proceed, without further interrogation.
With the exception of such repeated, but brief
interruptions, he had moved, silently, from the
centre
of the camp, to its most advanced outposts, when
he drew nigh the soldier, who held his watch
nearest
to the works of the enemy. As he approached,
he was received with the usual challenge.
Qui vive?
Francewas the reply.
Le mot d'ordre?
La victoire, said the other, drawing so nigh, as
to be heard in a loud whisper.
C'est bien, returned the sentinel, throwing his
musket from the charge to his shoulder; vous vous
promenez bien matin, monsieur!
II est necessaire d'tre vigilant, mon enfant, the
other observed, dropping a fold of his cloak, and
looking
the soldier close in the face, as he passed him,
still continuing his way towards the British
fortification
.
The man started; his arms rattled heavily,
as he threw them forward, in the lowest and most
respectful salute; and when he had again recovered
his piece, he turned to walk his post, muttering
between
his teeth,
Il faut tre vigilant, en vrit! je crois que nous
avons l, un caporal qui ne dort jamais!
The officer proceeded, without affecting to hear
the words which escaped the sentinel in his surprise;
nor did he, again, pause, until he had reached the low
strand, and in a somewhat dangerous vicinity to the
western water bastion of the fort. The light of an
obscured moon, was just sufficient to render objects,
though dim, perceptible in their outlines. He,
therefore
,
took the precaution to place himself against the
trunk of a tree, where he leaned, for many minutes,
and seemed to contemplate the dark and silent mounds
of the English works, in profound attention. His
gaze at the ramparts was not that of a curious or idle
spectator; but his looks wandered from point to
point, denoting his knowledge of military usages, and
betraying that his search was not unaccompanied by
distrust. At length he appeared satisfied; and
having
cast his eyes, impatiently, upward, towards the
summit of the eastern mountain, as if anticipating the
approach of the morning, he was in the act of turning
on his footsteps, when a light sound on the nearest
angle of the bastion, caught his ear, and induced him
to remain.
Just then a figure was seen to approach the edge
of the rampart, where it stood, apparently,
contemplating
in its turn the distant tents of the French
encampment. Its head was then turned towards the
east, as though equally anxious for the appearance of
light, when the form leaned against the mound, and
seemed to gaze upon the glassy expanse of the waters,
which, like a submarine firmament, glittered with its
thousand mimic stars. The melancholy air, the hour,
together with the vast frame of the man who thus
leaned, in musing, against the English ramparts, left
no doubt as to his person, in the mind of the
observant
spectator. Delicacy, no less than prudence,
now urged him to retire; and he had mov'd
cautiously
round the body of the tree, for that purpose, when
another sound drew his attention, and once more
arrested
his footsteps. It was a low, and almost
inaudible
movement of the water, and was succeeded by
a grating of pebbles, one against the other. In a
moment
,
he saw a dark form rise, as it were, out of the
lake, and steal, without farther noise, to the land,
within a few feet of the place where he himself stood.
A rifle next slowly rose between his eyes and the
watery mirror; but before it could be discharged, his
own hand was on the lock.
Hugh! exclaimed the savage, whose treacherous
aim was so singularly and so unexpectedly
interrupted
.
Without making any reply, the French officer laid
his hand on the shoulder of the Indian, and led him,
in profound silence, to a distance from the spot, where
their subsequent dialogue might have proved
dangerous
,
and where, it seemed, that one of them, at least,
sought a victim. Then, throwing open his cloak, so
as to expose his uniform, and the cross of St. Louis,
Vol. I. 24
which was suspended at his breast, Montcalm sternly
demanded
What means this! does not my son know, that
the hatchet is buried between the English and his
Canadian father?
What can the Hurons do? returned the savage,
speaking, also, though imperfectly, in the French
language
.
Not a warrior has a scalp, and the pale
faces make friends!
Ha! le Renard Subtil! Methinks this is an
excess
of zeal for a friend, who was so late an enemy!
How many suns have set, since le Renard struck the
war post of the English?
Where is that sun! demanded the sullen savage.
Behind the hill; and it is dark and cold. But when
he comes again, it will be bright and warm. Le
Subtil
is the sun of his tribe. There have been clouds,
and many mountains between him and his nation;
but now he shines, and it is a clear sky!
That le Renard has power with his people, I well
know, said Montcalm; for yesterday he hunted
for their scalps, and to-day, they hear him at the
council fire!
Magua is a great chief!
Let him prove it, by teaching his nation how to
conduct towards our new friends!
Why did the chief of the Canadas bring his young
men into the woods, and fire his cannon at yonder
earthen house? demanded the subtle Indian.
To subdue it. My master owns the land, and
your father was ordered to drive off these English
squatters. They have consented to go, and now he
calls them enemies no longer.
'Tis well. Magua took the hatchet to colour it
with blood. It is now bright; when it is red, it shall
be buried.
But Magua is pledged not to sully the lilies of
France. The enemies of the great king across the salt
lake, are his enemies; his friends, the friends of the
Hurons.
Friends! repeated the Indian, in bitter scorn.
Let his father give Magua a hand.
Montcalm, who felt that his influence over the
warlike tribes he had gathered, was to be maintained
by concession, rather than by power, complied,
reluctantly
,
with the other's request. The savage placed
the finger of the French commander on a deep scar
in his bosom, and then exultingly demanded
Does my father know that?
What warrior does not! 'tis where the leaden
bullet has cut.
And this! continued the Indian, who had
turned
his naked back to the other, his body being
without
its usual calico mantle.
This!my son, has been sadly injured, here! who
has done this?
Magua slept hard in the English wigwams, and the
sticks have left their mark, returned the savage,
with a hollow laugh, which did not, nor could not,
however, conceal the fierce temper that nearly
choked him. Then, recollecting himself, with
sudden
and native dignity, he addedGo; teach your
young men, it is peace! le Renard Subtil knows how
to speak to a Huron warrior!
Without deigning to bestow farther words, or to
wait for any answer, the savage cast his rifle into the
hollow of his arm, and moved, silently, through the
encampment towards the woods, where his own tribe
was known to lie. Every few yards, as he proceeded,
he was challenged by the sentinels; but he stalked,
sullenly
,
onward, utterly disregarding the summons of the
soldiers, who only spared his life, because they knew
the air and tread, no less than the obstinate daring,
of an Indian.
Montcalm lingered long and melancholy on the
strand, where he had been left by his companion,
brooding deeply on the temper which his
ungovernable
ally had just discovered. Already had his fair
fame been tarnished by one horrid scene, and in
circumstances
fearfully resembling those, under which
he now found himself. As he mused, he became
keenly sensible of the deep responsibility they assume,
who disregard the means to attain their end, and of all
the danger of setting in motion an engine, which
it exceeds human power to control. Then
shaking
off a train of reflections, that he accounted a
weakness
in such a moment of triumph, he retraced his
steps towards his tent, giving the order, as he passed,
to make the signal that should call the army from
its slumbers.
The first tap of the French drums was echoed from
the bosom of the fort; and, presently, the valley was
filled with the strains of martial music, rising long,
thrilling, and lively, above the rattling
accompaniment
.
The horns of the victors sounded merry and
cheerful flourishes, until the last laggard of the camp
was at his post; but the instant the British fifes had
blown their shrill signal, they became mute. In the
mean time the day had dawned, and when the line of
the French army was ready to receive its general, the
rays of a brilliant sun were glancing along its glittering
array. Then, that success which was already so well
known, was officially announced; the favoured band,
who were selected to guard the gates of the fort, were
detailed, and defiled before their chief; the signal of
their approach was given, and all the usual
preparations
for a change of masters, were ordered and
executed
directly under the guns of the contested works.
A very different scene presented itself within
the lines of the Anglo-American army. As soon as
the warning signal was given, it exhibited all the signs
of a hurried and forced departure. The sullen
soldiers
shouldered their empty tubes, and fell into their
places, like men whose blood had been heated by
the past contest, and who only desired the
opportunity
to revenge an indignity, which was still
wounding
to their pride, concealed, as it was, under all the
observances of military etiquette. Women and
children
ran from place, to place, some bearing the scanty
remnants of their baggage, and others searching, in
the ranks, for those countenances they looked up to
for protection.
Munro appeared among his silent troops, firm, but
dejected. It was evident that the unexpected blow
had struck deep into his heart, though he struggled to
sustain his misfortune with the port of a man.
Duncan was touched at the quiet and impressive
exhibition of his grief. He had discharged his own
24*
duty, and he now pressed to the side of the old man,
to know in what particular he might serve him.
My daughters, was the brief, but expressive
reply.
Good heavens! Are not arrangements already
made for their convenience?
To-day I am only a soldier, Major Heyward,
said the veteran. All that you see here, claim alike
to be my children.
Duncan had heard enough. Without losing one
of those moments which had now become so
precious
,
he flew towards the quarters of Munro, in quest
of the sisters. He found them on the threshold of
the low edifice, already prepared to depart, and
surrounded
by a clamorous and weeping assemblage of
their own sex, that had gathered about the place,
with a sort of instinctive consciousness, that it was
the point most likely to be protected. Though the
cheeks of Cora were pale, and her countenance
anxious
,
she had lost none of her firmness; but the eyes
of Alice were inflamed, and betrayed how long and
bitterly she had wept. They both, however,
received
the young man with undisguised pleasure; the
former, for a novelty, being the first to speak.
The fort is lost, she said, with a melancholy
smile; though our good name, I trust, remains!
'Tis brighter than ever! But, dearest Miss
Munro
,
it is time to think less of others, and to make some
provision for yourself. Military usagepridethat
pride on which you so much value yourself, demands
that your father and I should, for a little while,
continue
with the troops. Then where to seek a proper
protecter for you, against the confusion and chances
of such a scene!
None is necessary, returned Cora; who
will dare to injure or insult the daughter of such a
father, at a time like this!
I would not leave you alone, continued the
youth, looking about him in a hurried manner, for
the command of the best regiment in the pay of the
king! Remember, our Alice is not gifted with all your
firmness, and God only knows the terror she might
endure.
You may be right, Cora replied, smiling again,
but far more sadly than before. Listen; chance
has already sent us a friend when he is most needed.
Duncan did listen, and on the instant
comprehended
her meaning. The low, and serious sounds of the
sacred music, so well known to the eastern provinces,
caught his ear, and instantly drew him to an apartment
in an adjacent building, which had, already, been
deserted
by its customary tenants. There he found
David
,
pouring out his pious feelings, through the only
medium in which he ever indulged. Duncan waited,
until by the cessation of the movement of the hand,
he believed the strain was ended, when, by touching
his shoulder, he drew the attention of the other to
himself, and in a few words explained his wishes.
Even so, replied the single minded disciple of
the King of Israel, when the young man had ended; I
have found much that is comely and melodious in the
maidens, and it is fitting that we, who have consorted
in so much peril, should abide together in peace.
I will attend them, when I have completed my
morning praise, to which nothing is now wanting,
but the doxology. Wilt thou bear a part, friend?
The metre is common, and the tune known as
`Southwell.'
Then, extending the little volume, and giving the
pitch of the air, anew, with considerate attention.
David re-commenced and finished his strains, with a
fixedness of manner that it was not easy to interrupt.
Heyward was fain to wait until the verse was ended;
when seeing David relieving himself from the
spectacles
,
and replacing the book, he continued
It will be your duty, to see that none dare to
approach
the ladies, with any rude intention, or to offer
insult or taunt at the misfortune of their brave father.
In this task, you will be seconded by the domestics
of their household.
Even so.
It is possible, that the Indians and stragglers of the
enemy may intrude; in which case, you will remind
them of the terms of the capitulation, and threaten
to report their conduct to Montcalm. A word will
suffice.
If not, I have that here which shall, returned
David
,
exhibiting his book, with an air, in which
meekness
and confidence were singularly blended. Here
are words, which uttered, or rather thundered, with
proper emphasis, and in measured time, shall quiet
the most unruly temper.
Why rage the heathen furiously!
Enough, said Heyward, interrupting the burst
of his musical invocation; we understand each
other; it is time that we should, now, assume our
respective duties.
Gamut cheerfully assented, and together they
immediately
sought the maidens. Cora received her new,
and somewhat extraordinary, protector, courteously at
least; and even the pallid features of Alice lighted,
again, with some of their native archness, as she
thanked
Heyward for his care. Duncan took occasion to
assure them he had done the best that
circumstances
permitted, and, as he believed, quite enough
for the security of their feelings; of danger there was
none. He then spoke gladly of his intention to rejoin
them, the moment he had led the advance a few miles
towards the Hudson, and immediately took his leave.
By this time the signal of departure had been given,
and the head of the English column was in motion.
The sisters started at the sound, and glancing their
eyes around, they saw the white uniforms of the
French grenadiers, who had, already, taken
possession
of the gates of the fort. At that moment, an
enormous cloud seemed to pass suddenly above their
heads, and looking upward, they discovered that they
stood beneath the wide folds of the spotless standard
of France.
Let us go, said Cora; this is no longer a fit
place for the children of an English officer!
Alice clung to the arm of her sister, and together
they left the parade, accompanied by the moving
throng, that still surrounded them.
As they passed the gates, the French officers, who
had learned their rank, bowed often and low,
forbearing
,
however, to intrude those attentions, which
they saw, with peculiar tact, might not be
agreeable
.
As every vehicle, and each beast of burthen,
was occupied by the sick and wounded, Cora had
decided to endure the fatigues of a foot march, rather
than interfere with their comforts. Indeed, many
a maimed and feeble soldier was compelled to drag
his exhausted limbs, in the rear of the columns, for
the want of the necessary means of conveyance, in
that wilderness. The whole, however, was in
motion
;
the weak and wounded, groaning, and in
suffering
;
their comrades, silent, and sullen; and the
women and children in terror, though they knew not
of what.
As the confused and timid throng, left the
protecting
mounds of the fort, and issued on the open
plain, the whole scene was, at once, presented to
their eyes. At a little distance on the right, and
somewhat in the rear, the French army stood to their
arms, Montcalm having collected his parties, so soon
as his guards had possession of the works. They
were attentive, but silent observers of the proceedings
of the vanquished, failing in none of the stipulated
military honours, and offering no taunt or insult,
in their success, to their less fortunate foes. Living
masses of the English, to the amount, in the whole,
of near three thousand, were moving slowly across
the plain, towards the common center, and
gradually
approached each other, as they converged to the
point of their march, a vista cut through the lofty
trees, where the road to the Hudson entered the
forest. Along the sweeping borders of the woods,
hung a dark cloud of savages, eyeing the passage of
their enemies, and hovering, at a distance, like
vultures
,
who were only kept from stooping on their
prey, by the presence and restraint of a superior
army. A few had straggled among the conquered
columns, where they stalked, in sullen discontent;
attentive
,
though, as yet, passive observers of all that
moving multitude.
The advance, with Heyward at its head, had
already
reached the defile, and was slowly disappearing,
when the attention of Cora was drawn to a collection
of stragglers, by the sounds of contention. A
truant
provincial was paying the forfeit of his
disobedience
,
by being plundered of those very effects,
which had caused him to desert his place in the
ranks. The man was of powerful frame, and too
avaricious to part with his goods, without a
struggle
.
Individuals from either party interfered; the
one side to prevent, and the other to aid in the
robbery
.
Voices grew loud and angry, and a hundred
savages appeared, as it were, by magic, where a
dozen
only had been seen, a few minutes before. It
was, then, that Cora saw the form of Magua, gliding
among his countrymen, and speaking, with his fatal
and artful eloquence. The mass of women and
children
stopped, and hovered together, like alarmed
and fluttering birds. But the cupidity of the Indian
was soon gratified, and the different bodies, again,
moved slowly onward.
The savages now fell back, and seemed
content
to let their enemies advance, without further
molestation. But as the female crowd approached
them, the gaudy colours of a shawl attracted the eyes
of a wild and untutored Huron. He advanced to
seize it, without the least hesitation. The woman,
more in terror, than through love of the ornament,
wrapped her child in the coveted article, and folded
both more closely to her bosom. Cora was in the
act of speaking, with an intent to advise the woman
to abandon the trifle, when the savage relinquished
his hold of the shawl, and tore the screaming infant
from her arms. Abandoning every thing to the
greedy grasp of those around her, the mother darted,
with distraction in her mien, to reclaim her child.
The Indian smiled grimly, and extended one hand,
in sign of a willingness to exchange, while, with the
other, he flourished the babe above his head, holding
it by the feet, as if to enhance the value of the
ransom
.
Hereherethereallanyevery thing!
exclaimed the breathless woman; tearing the lighter
articles of dress from her person, with ill-directed and
trembling fingersTake all, but give me my babe!
The savage spurned the worthless rags, and
perceiving
that the shawl had already become a prize
to another, his bantering, but sullen smile, changing
to a gleam of ferocity, he dashed the head of the
infant
against a rock, and cast its quivering remains to
her very feet. For an instant, the mother stood, like
a statue of despair, looking wildly down at the
unseemly
object, which had so lately nestled in her bosom
and smiled in her face; and then she raised her eyes
and countenance towards heaven, as if calling on God
to curse the perpetrator of the foul deed. She was
spared the sin of such a prayer; for, maddened at his
disappointment, and excited by the sight of blood,
the Huron mercifully drove his tomahawk into her
own brain. The mother sunk under the blow, and
fell, grasping at her child, in death, with the same
engrossing love, that had caused her to cherish it,
when living.
At that dangerous moment Magua placed his hands
to his mouth, and raised the fatal and appalling whoop.
The scattered Indians started at the well known cry,
as coursers bound at the signal to quit the goal; and,
directly, there arose such a yell along the plain, and
through the arches of the wood, as seldom bursted from
human lips before. They who heard it, listened with
a curdling horror at the heart, little inferior to that
dread which may be expected to attend the blasts of
the final summons.
More than two thousand raging savages broke from
the forest at the signal, and threw themselves across
the fatal plain with instinctive alacrity. We shall
not dwell on the revolting horrors that succeeded.
Death was every where, and in his most terrific
and disgusting aspects. Resistance only served to
inflame the murderers, who inflicted their furious
blows long after their victims were beyond the
power
of their resentment. The flow of blood might be
likened to the outbreaking of a gushing torrent; and
as the natives became heated and maddened by the
sight, many among them even kneeled to the earth,
and drank freely, exultingly, hellishly, of the crimson
tide.
The trained bodies of the troops threw themselves,
quickly, into solid masses, endeavouring to awe their
assailants by the imposing appearance of a military
front. The experiment in some measure succeeded,
though far too many suffered their unloaded muskets
to be torn from their hands, in the vain hope of
appeasing
the savages.
Vol.. I. 25
In such a scene, none had leisure to note
the fleeting moments. It might have been ten
minutes
,
(it seemed an age,) that the sisters had stood,
rivetted to one spot, horror-stricken, and nearly
helpless
.
When the first blow was struck, their
screaming
companions had pressed upon them in a body,
rendering flight impossible; and now that fear or
death had scattered most, if not all, from around
them, they saw no avenue open, but such as
conducted
to the tomahawks of their foes. On every side
arose shrieks, groans, exhortations, and curses. At
this moment, Alice caught a glimpse of the vast
form of her father, moving rapidly across the plain,
in the direction of the French army. Ha was, in
truth, proceeding to Montcalm, fearless of every
danger
,
to claim the tardy escort, for which he had
before
conditioned. Fifty glittering axes, and barbed
spears, were offered unheeded at his life, but the
savages respected his rank and calmness, even in their
greatest fury. The dangerous weapons were
brushed
aside by the still nervous arm of the veteran, or
fell of themselves, after menacing an act, that it would
seem no one had courage to perform. Fortunately,
the vindictive Magua was searching his victim in the
very band the veteran had just quitted.
Fatherfatherwe are here! shrieked Alice,
as he passed, at no great distance, without appearing
to heed them. Come to us, father, or we die!
The cry was repeated, and in terms and tones, that
might have melted a heart of stone, but it was
unanswered
.
Once, indeed, the old man appeared to
catch the sounds, for he paused, and listened; but
Alice had dropped senseless on the earth, and Cora
had sunk at her side, hovering, in untiring tenderness,
over her lifeless form. Munro shook his head, in
disappointment, and proceeded, bent on the high
duty of his responsible station.
Lady, said Gamut, who, helpless and useless as
he was, had not yet dreamed of deserting his trust,
it is the jubilee of the devils, and this is not a
meet place for christians to tarry in. Let us up and
fly!
Go, said Cora, still gazing at her unconscious
sister; save thyself. To me thou canst not be
of further use.
David comprehended the unyielding character of
her resolution, by the simple, but expressive,
gesture
,
that accompanied her words. He gazed,
for a moment, at the dusky forms that were acting
their hellish rites on every side of him, and his tall
person grew more erect, while his chest heaved, and
every feature swelled, and seemed to speak with the
power of the feelings by which he was gorerned.
If the Jewish boy might tame the evil spirit of
Saul, by the sound of his harp, and the words of
sacred
song, it may not be amiss, he said, to try the
potency of music here.
Then raising his voice to its highest tones, he
poured out a strain so powerful as to be heard, even
amid the din of that bloody field. More that one savage
rushed towards them, thinking to rifle the
unprotected
sisters of their attire, and bear away their scalps;
but when they found this strange and unmoved figure,
rivetted to his post, they paused to listen.
Astonishment
soon changed to admiration, and they passed
on to other, and less courageous victims, openly
expressing their satisfaction at the firmness with which
the white warrior sung his death song. Encouraged
and deluded by his success, David exerted all his
powers to extend what he believed so holy an
influence
.
The unwonted sounds caught the ears of a
distant savage, who flew, raging from groupe to
groupe, like one who, scorning to touch the vulgar
herd, hunted for some victim more worthy of his
renown. It was Magua, who uttered a yell of
pleasure
when he beheld his ancient prisoners again at
his mercy.
Come, he said, laying his soiled hand on the
dress of Cora, the wigwam of the Huron is open.
Is it not better than this place?
Away! cried Cora, veiling her eyes from his
revolting aspect.
The Indian laughed tauntingly as he held up his
reeking hand, and answeredIt is red, but it comes
from white veins!
Monster! there is blood, oceans of blood, upon
thy soul; thy spirit has moved this scene.
Magua is a great chief! returned the exulting
savagewill the dark-hair go to his tribe!
Never! strike, if thou wilt, and complete thy
hellish revenge.
He hesitated a moment; and then catching the
light and senseless form of Alice in his arms, the
subtle Indian moved swiftly across the plain toward
the woods.
Hold! shrieked Cora, following wildly on his
footsteps, release the child! wretch! what is't
you do!
But Magua was deaf to her voice; or rather he knew
his power, and was determined to maintain it.
Stayladystay, called Gamut, after the
unconscious
Cora. The holy charm is beginning to be
felt, and soon shalt thou see this horrid tumult stilled.
Perceiving that, in his turn, he was unheeded, the
faithful David followed the distracted sister, raising
his voice again in sacred song, and sweeping the air
to the measure, with his long arm, in diligent
accompaniment
.
In this manner they traversed the plain,
through the flying, the wounded, and the dead. The
fierce Huron was, at any time, sufficient for himself
and the victim that he bore; though Cora would have
fallen, more than once, under the blows of her savage
enemies, but for the extraordinary being who stalked
in her rear, and who now appeared to the astonished
natives gifted with the protecting spirit of madness.
Magua, who knew how to avoid the more pressing
dangers, and, also, to elude pursuit, entered the woods
through a low ravine, where he quickly found the
Narragansetts, which the travellers had abandoned
so shortly before, awaiting his appearance, in custody
of a savage as fierce and as malign in his expression
as himself. Laying Alice on one of the horses, he
made a sign for Cora to mount the other.
Notwithstanding the horror excited by the
presence
of her captor, there was a present relief in
escaping from the bloody scene enacting on the plain,
to which the maiden could not be altogether
insensible
.
She took her seat, and held forth her arms
for her sister, with an air of entreaty and love, that
even the Huron could not deny. Placing Alice,
then, on the same animal with Cora, he seized the
bridle, and commenced his route by plunging
deeper
into the forest. David, perceiving that he was left
alone, utterly disregarded, as a subject too
worthless
even to destroy, threw his long limb across the
saddle of the beast they had deserted, and made
such progress in the pursuit, as the difficulties of the
path permitted.
They soon began to ascend; but as the motion had
a tendency to revive the dormant faculties of her
sister
,
the attention of Cora was too much divided
between
the tenderest solicitude in her behalf, and in
listening to the cries, which were still too
audible
on the plain, to note the direction in which
they journeyed. When, however, they gained the
flattened surface of the mountain top, and
approached
the eastern precipice, she recognised the spot to
which she had, once before, been led, under the more
friendly auspices of the scout. Here Magua suffered
them to dismount, and, notwithstanding their own
captivity, the curiosity which seems inseparable from
horror, induced them to gaze at the sickening sight
below.
The cruel work was still unchecked. On every
side the captured were flying before their relentless
persecutors, while the armed columns of the
Christian
King stood fast, in an apathy which has never
been explained, and which has left an immoveable
blot on the, otherwise, fair escutcheon of their leader.
Nor was the sword of death stayed, until cupidity got
the mastery of revenge. Then, indeed, the shriaks
of the wounded, and the yells of their murderers,
grew less frequent, until finally the cries of horror
were lost to their ear, or were drowned in the loud,
long and piercing whoops of the triumphant savages.
END OF VOLUME FIRST.